Florida, session 2026, HB607.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
347
348 Section 1. Section 20.165, Florida Statutes, is amended to
349 read:
350 20.165 Department of Business and Professional
Page 14 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
351 Regulation.—There is created a Department of Business and
352 Professional Regulation.
353 (1) The head of the Department of Business and
354 Professional Regulation is the Secretary of Business and
355 Professional Regulation. The secretary shall be appointed by the
356 Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The secretary
357 shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
358 (2) The following divisions of the Department of Business
359 and Professional Regulation are established:
360 (a) Division of Administration.
361 (b) Division of Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco.
362 (c) Division of Certified Public Accounting.
363 1. The director of the division shall be appointed by the
364 secretary of the department, subject to approval by a majority
365 of the Board of Accountancy.
366 2. Effective at the termination of any lease in effect on
367 December 31, 2025, the offices of the division shall be located
368 in Tallahassee Gainesville. Such a lease may not be extended or
369 renewed.
370 (d) Division of Drugs, Devices, and Cosmetics.
371 (e) Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and
372 Mobile Homes.
373 (f) Division of Hotels and Restaurants.
374 (g) Division of Professions.
375 (h) Division of Real Estate.
Page 15 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
376 1. The director of the division shall be appointed by the
377 secretary of the department, subject to approval by a majority
378 of the Florida Real Estate Commission.
379 2. Effective at the termination of any lease in effect on
380 December 31, 2025, the offices of the division shall be located
381 in Tallahassee Orlando. Such a lease may not be extended or
382 renewed.
383 (i) Division of Regulation.
384 (j) Division of Technology.
385 (k) Division of Service Operations.
386 (3) The secretary shall appoint a director for each
387 division established within this section. Each division director
388 shall directly administer the division and shall be responsible
389 to the secretary. The secretary may appoint deputy and assistant
390 secretaries as necessary to aid the secretary in fulfilling the
391 secretary's statutory obligations.
392 (4)(a) The following boards and programs are established
393 within the Division of Professions:
394 (a)1. Board of Architecture and Interior Design licensing
395 program, created under parts part I and II of chapter 481.
396 (b)2. Florida Board of Auctioneers licensing program,
397 created under part VI of chapter 468.
398 (c)3. Barbers' licensing program Board, created under
399 chapter 476.
400 (d)4. Florida Building Code Administrators and Inspectors
Page 16 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
401 licensing program Board, created under part XII of chapter 468.
402 (e)5. Construction Industry licensing program Board,
403 created under part I of chapter 489.
404 (f)6. Board of Cosmetology licensing program, created
405 under chapter 477.
406 (g)7. Electrical Contractors' licensing program Board,
407 created under part II of chapter 489.
408 (h)8. Board of Employee Leasing Companies licensing
409 program, created under part XI of chapter 468.
410 (i)9. Board of Landscape Architecture licensing program,
411 created under part II of chapter 481.
412 (j)10. Board of Pilot Commissioners licensing program,
413 created under chapter 310.
414 (k)11. Board of Professional Engineers, created under
415 chapter 471.
416 (l)12. Board of Professional Geologists licensing program,
417 created under chapter 492.
418 (m)13. Board of Veterinary Medicine licensing program,
419 created under chapter 474.
420 (n)14. Home inspection services licensing program, created
421 under part XV of chapter 468.
422 (o)15. Mold-related services licensing program, created
423 under part XVI of chapter 468.
424 (p) Talent agency licensing program, created under part
425 VII of chapter 468.
Page 17 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
426 (q) The Florida Building Commission, created under chapter
427 553.
428 (r) The Community Association Managers licensing program,
429 created under part VIII of chapter 468.
430 (s) Yacht and ship brokers licensing program, created
431 under chapter 326.
432 (b) The following board and commission are established
433 within the Division of Real Estate:
434 1. Florida Real Estate Appraisal Board, created under part
435 II of chapter 475.
436 2. Florida Real Estate Commission, created under part I of
437 chapter 475.
438 (c) The following board is established within the Division
439 of Certified Public Accounting: Board of Accountancy, created
440 under chapter 473.
441 (5) The members of each board established pursuant to
442 subsection (4) shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to
443 confirmation by the Senate. Consumer members on the board shall
444 be appointed pursuant to subsection (6). Members shall be
445 appointed for 4-year terms, and such terms shall expire on
446 October 31. However, a term of less than 4 years may be utilized
447 to ensure that:
448 (a) No more than two members' terms expire during the same
449 calendar year for boards consisting of seven or eight members.
450 (b) No more than 3 members' terms expire during the same
Page 18 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
451 calendar year for boards consisting of 9 to 12 members.
452 (c) No more than 5 members' terms expire during the same
453 calendar year for boards consisting of 13 or more members.
454
455 A member whose term has expired shall continue to serve on the
456 board until such time as a replacement is appointed. A vacancy
457 on the board shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the
458 term in the same manner as the original appointment. No member
459 may serve for more than the remaining portion of a previous
460 member's unexpired term, plus two consecutive 4-year terms of
461 the member's own appointment thereafter.
462 (6) Each board with five or more members shall have at
463 least two consumer members who are not, and have never been,
464 members or practitioners of the profession regulated by such
465 board or of any closely related profession. Each board with
466 fewer than five members shall have at least one consumer member
467 who is not, and has never been, a member or practitioner of the
468 profession regulated by such board or of any closely related
469 profession.
470 (7) No board, with the exception of joint
471 coordinatorships, shall be transferred from its present location
472 unless authorized by the Legislature in the General
473 Appropriations Act.
474 (5)(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
475 department shall is authorized to establish uniform application
Page 19 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
476 forms and certificates of licensure for use by the divisions
477 within the department. However, Nothing in this subsection does
478 not authorize authorizes the department to vary any substantive
479 requirements, duties, or eligibilities for licensure or
480 certification as provided by law.
481 (6)(9)(a) All employees authorized by the Division of
482 Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco shall have access to, and shall
483 have the right to inspect, premises licensed by the division, to
484 collect taxes and remit them to the officers entitled to them,
485 and to examine the books and records of all licensees. The
486 authorized employees shall require of each licensee strict
487 compliance with the laws of this state relating to the
488 transaction of such business.
489 (b) Each employee serving as a law enforcement officer for
490 the division must meet the qualifications for employment or
491 appointment as a law enforcement officer set forth under s.
492 943.13 and must be certified as a law enforcement officer by the
493 Department of Law Enforcement under chapter 943. Upon
494 certification, each law enforcement officer is subject to and
495 has the same authority as provided for law enforcement officers
496 generally in chapter 901 and has statewide jurisdiction. Each
497 officer also has arrest authority as provided for state law
498 enforcement officers in s. 901.15. Each officer possesses the
499 full law enforcement powers granted to other peace officers of
500 this state, including the authority to make arrests, carry
Page 20 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
501 firearms, serve court process, and seize contraband and the
502 proceeds of illegal activities.
503 1. The primary responsibility of each officer appointed
504 under this section is to investigate, enforce, and prosecute,
505 throughout this the state, violations and violators of parts I
506 and II of chapter 210, part VII of chapter 559, and chapters
507 561-569, and the rules adopted thereunder, as well as other
508 state laws that the division, all state law enforcement
509 officers, or beverage enforcement agents are specifically
510 authorized to enforce.
511 2. The secondary responsibility of each officer appointed
512 under this section is to enforce all other state laws, provided
513 that the enforcement is incidental to exercising the officer's
514 primary responsibility as provided in subparagraph 1., and the
515 officer exercises the powers of a deputy sheriff, only after
516 consultation or coordination with the appropriate local
517 sheriff's office or municipal police department or when the
518 division participates in the Florida Mutual Aid Plan during a
519 declared state emergency.
520 (7) The Department of Business and Professional Regulation
521 shall provide, via e-mail, to each person licensed by the
522 department, as promptly as possible after the adjournment sine
523 die of the regular session of the Legislature, a summary of
524 changes to existing law relating to each business and profession
525 and the effective date of each change.
Page 21 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
526 Section 2. Sections 310.011, 310.032, 310.042, 455.2124,
527 455.2228, 468.384, 468.399, 468.4315, 468.4337, 468.4338,
528 468.521, 468.522, 468.523, 468.605, 468.8316, 468.8416,
529 471.0195, 472.007, 472.008, 472.009, 472.017, 472.018, 472.019,
530 473.303, 474.204, 474.205, 474.206, 475.02, 475.03, 475.04,
531 475.045, 475.05, 475.10, 476.054, 476.064, 477.015, 481.205,
532 481.2055, 481.305, 482.243, 489.107, 489.507, 492.103,
533 499.01211, 559.9221, and 570.81, Florida Statutes, are repealed.
534 Section 3. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
535 120.54, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
536 120.54 Rulemaking.—
537 (3) ADOPTION PROCEDURES.—
538 (c) Hearings.—
539 1. If the intended action concerns any rule other than one
540 relating exclusively to procedure or practice, the agency shall,
541 on the request of any affected person received within 21 days
542 after the date of publication of the notice of intended agency
543 action, give affected persons an opportunity to present evidence
544 and argument on all issues under consideration. The agency may
545 schedule a public hearing on the rule and, if requested by any
546 affected person, shall schedule a public hearing on the rule.
547 When a public hearing is held, the agency must ensure that staff
548 are available to explain the agency's proposal and to respond to
549 questions or comments regarding the rule. If the agency head is
550 a board, licensing program, or commission or other collegial
Page 22 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
551 body created under s. 20.165(4) or s. 20.43(3)(g), and one or
552 more requested public hearings is scheduled, the board,
553 licensing program, or commission or other collegial body shall
554 conduct at least one of the public hearings itself and may not
555 delegate this responsibility without the consent of those
556 persons requesting the public hearing. Any material pertinent to
557 the issues under consideration submitted to the agency within 21
558 days after the date of publication of the notice or submitted to
559 the agency between the date of publication of the notice and the
560 end of the final public hearing shall be considered by the
561 agency and made a part of the record of the rulemaking
562 proceeding.
563 2. Rulemaking proceedings shall be governed solely by the
564 provisions of this section unless a person timely asserts that
565 the person's substantial interests will be affected in the
566 proceeding and affirmatively demonstrates to the agency that the
567 proceeding does not provide adequate opportunity to protect
568 those interests. If the agency determines that the rulemaking
569 proceeding is not adequate to protect the person's interests, it
570 shall suspend the rulemaking proceeding and convene a separate
571 proceeding under the provisions of ss. 120.569 and 120.57.
572 Similarly situated persons may be requested to join and
573 participate in the separate proceeding. Upon conclusion of the
574 separate proceeding, the rulemaking proceeding shall be resumed.
575 Section 4. Paragraph (ttt) of subsection (7) of section
Page 23 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
576 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
577 212.08 Sales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and
578 storage tax; specified exemptions.—The sale at retail, the
579 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the
580 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following
581 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this
582 chapter.
583 (7) MISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.—Exemptions provided to any
584 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is
585 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a
586 representative or employee of the entity by any means,
587 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even
588 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed
589 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by
590 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is
591 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has
592 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department
593 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as
594 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made
595 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this
596 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an
597 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict
598 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and
599 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer
600 this subsection.
Page 24 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
601 (ttt) Small private investigative agencies.—
602 1. As used in this paragraph, the term:
603 a. "Private investigation services" has the same meaning
604 as "private investigation," as defined in s. 493.6101(17).
605 b. "Small private investigative agency" means a private
606 investigator licensed under s. 493.6201 which:
607 (I) Employs three or fewer full-time or part-time
608 employees, including those performing services pursuant to an
609 employee leasing arrangement as defined in s. 468.520 s.
610 468.520(4), in total; and
611 (II) During the previous calendar year, performed private
612 investigation services otherwise taxable under this chapter in
613 which the charges for the services performed were less than
614 $150,000 for all its businesses related through common
615 ownership.
616 2. The sale of private investigation services by a small
617 private investigative agency to a client is exempt from the tax
618 imposed by this chapter.
619 3. The exemption provided by this paragraph may not apply
620 in the first calendar year a small private investigative agency
621 conducts sales of private investigation services taxable under
622 this chapter.
623 Section 5. Paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of section
624 215.5586, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
625 215.5586 My Safe Florida Home Program.—There is
Page 25 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
626 established within the Department of Financial Services the My
627 Safe Florida Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal
628 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership
629 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does
630 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the
631 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of
632 residential property in this state. Implementation of this
633 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is
634 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability
635 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed
636 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of
637 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects
638 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in
639 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by
640 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other
641 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of
642 available funds. If, after applications are processed and
643 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept
644 applications up to the available amount. The program shall
645 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach
646 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements
647 provided in this section.
648 (1) HURRICANE MITIGATION INSPECTIONS.—
649 (f) To qualify for selection by the department as a wind
650 certification entity to provide hurricane mitigation
Page 26 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
651 inspections, the entity must, at a minimum, meet the following
652 requirements:
653 1. Use hurricane mitigation inspectors who are licensed or
654 certified as:
655 a. A building inspector under s. 468.607;
656 b. A general, building, or residential contractor under s.
657 489.111;
658 c. A professional engineer under s. 471.015;
659 d. A professional architect under s. 481.213; or
660 e. A home inspector under s. 468.8314 and who have
661 completed at least 3 hours of hurricane mitigation training
662 approved by the department Construction Industry Licensing
663 Board, which training must include hurricane mitigation
664 techniques, compliance with the uniform mitigation verification
665 form, and completion of a proficiency exam.
666 2. Use hurricane mitigation inspectors who also have
667 undergone drug testing and a background screening. The
668 department may conduct criminal record checks of inspectors used
669 by wind certification entities. Inspectors must submit a set of
670 fingerprints to the department for state and national criminal
671 history checks and must pay the fingerprint processing fee set
672 forth in s. 624.501. The fingerprints must be sent by the
673 department to the Department of Law Enforcement and forwarded to
674 the Federal Bureau of Investigation for processing. The results
675 must be returned to the department for screening. The
Page 27 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
676 fingerprints must be taken by a law enforcement agency,
677 designated examination center, or other department-approved
678 entity.
679 3. Provide a quality assurance program including a
680 reinspection component.
681 Section 6. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
682 215.55871, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
683 215.55871 My Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program.—There
684 is established within the Department of Financial Services the
685 My Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program to be implemented
686 pursuant to appropriations. The department shall provide fiscal
687 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership
688 for the pilot program, consistent with this section. This
689 section does not create an entitlement for associations or unit
690 owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the inspection
691 or retrofitting of condominiums in the state. Implementation of
692 this pilot program is subject to annual legislative
693 appropriations. It is the intent of the Legislature that the My
694 Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program provide licensed
695 inspectors to perform inspections for and grants to eligible
696 associations as funding allows.
697 (3) HURRICANE MITIGATION INSPECTORS.—
698 (b) The department shall contract with wind certification
699 entities to provide hurricane mitigation inspections. To qualify
700 for selection by the department as a wind certification entity
Page 28 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
701 to provide hurricane mitigation inspections, the entity must, at
702 a minimum, meet all of the following requirements:
703 1. Use hurricane mitigation inspectors who are licensed or
704 certified as:
705 a. A building inspector under s. 468.607;
706 b. A general, building, or residential contractor under s.
707 489.111;
708 c. A professional engineer under s. 471.015;
709 d. A professional architect under s. 481.213; or
710 e. A home inspector under s. 468.8314 who has completed at
711 least 3 hours of hurricane mitigation training approved by the
712 department Construction Industry Licensing Board, which must
713 include hurricane mitigation techniques, compliance with the
714 uniform mitigation verification form, and completion of a
715 proficiency exam.
716 2. Use hurricane mitigation inspectors who have undergone
717 drug testing and a background screening. The department may
718 conduct criminal record checks of inspectors used by wind
719 certification entities. Inspectors must submit a full set of
720 fingerprints to the department or to a vendor, an entity, or an
721 agency authorized under s. 943.053(13). The department, vendor,
722 entity, or agency shall forward the fingerprints to the
723 Department of Law Enforcement for state processing, and the
724 Department of Law Enforcement shall forward the fingerprints to
725 the Federal Bureau of Investigation for national processing.
Page 29 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
726 Fees for state and federal fingerprint processing shall be borne
727 by the inspector. The state cost for fingerprint processing
728 shall be as provided in s. 943.053(3)(e). The results must be
729 returned to the department for screening. The fingerprints must
730 be taken by a law enforcement agency, designated examination
731 center, or other department-approved entity.
732 3. Provide a quality assurance program including a
733 reinspection component.
734 Section 7. Subsection (1) of section 309.01, Florida
735 Statutes, is amended to read:
736 309.01 Deposit of material in tidewater regulated.—
737 (1) It is not lawful for any person to discharge or cause
738 to be discharged or deposit or cause to be deposited, in the
739 tide or salt waters of any bay, port, harbor, or river of this
740 state, any ballast or material of any kind other than clear
741 stone or rock, free from gravel or pebbles, which said clear
742 stone or rock shall be deposited or discharged only in the
743 construction of enclosures in connection with wharves, piers,
744 quays, jetties, or in the construction of permanent bulkheads
745 connecting the solid and permanent portion of wharves. It is
746 lawful to construct three characters of bulkheads for retention
747 of material in solid wharves. First, clear stone or rock
748 enclosures, or bulkheads, may be built upon all sides to a
749 height not less than 2 1/2 feet above high watermark; and after
750 the enclosures have been made so solid, tight, and permanent as
Page 30 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
751 to prevent any sand, mud, gravel, or other material that may be
752 discharged or deposited in them from drifting or escaping
753 through such enclosures, any kind of ballast may be discharged
754 or deposited within the enclosures. The enclosures may be
755 constructed of wood, stone, and rock combined, the stone and
756 rocks to be placed on the outside of the wood to a height not
757 less at any point than 2 1/2 feet above high watermark. Second,
758 a bulkhead may be built by a permanent wharf consisting of
759 thoroughly creosoted piles not less than 12 inches in diameter
760 at the butt end, to be driven close together and to be capped
761 with timber not less than 10 or 14 inches drift, bolted to each
762 pile, and one or more longitudinal stringers to be placed on the
763 outside of the bulkhead and securely anchored by means of iron
764 rods to piles driven within the bulkheads, clear rock to be on
765 the inside of the bulkhead, to a height of not less than 2 1/2
766 feet above high water; and after this is done, ballast or other
767 material may be deposited within the permanent enclosure so
768 constructed. Third, a bulkhead may be constructed to consist of
769 creosoted piles, as described herein, driven not exceeding 4
770 feet apart from center to center, inside of which two or more
771 longitudinal stringers may be placed and securely bolted to the
772 piles. Inside of these longitudinal pieces, two thicknesses of
773 creosoted sheet piling are to be driven, each course of the
774 sheet piling to make a joint with the other so as to form an
775 impenetrable wharf; and within this permanent bulkhead so
Page 31 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
776 constructed, any ballast or other material may be deposited. No
777 Such an enclosure, pier, quay, or jetty may not begin shall be
778 begun until the point at which whereat it is to be built shall
779 have been connected by a substantial wharf with a shore or with
780 a permanent wharf; except that the owners of wharves may at any
781 time, with the consent of the Board of Pilot Commissioners of
782 the Division of Professions of the Department of Business and
783 Professional Regulation, build wharves of clear stone or rock,
784 or creosoted walls as hereinafter provided, on each side of
785 their wharves from the shore to a point at which the water is
786 not more than 15 feet deep, and when such walls have attained a
787 height of 2 1/2 feet above high watermark and have been securely
788 closed at the deepwater end by stone or creosoted walls of the
789 same height, any kind of ballast may be deposited in them.
790 Nothing contained in this section shall interfere with any
791 rights or privileges now enjoyed by riparian owners. While this
792 section empowers those who desire to construct the several
793 characters of wharves, piers, quays, jetties, and bulkheads
794 provided for and described herein, nothing in this section shall
795 be so construed as to require any person not desiring to
796 construct a permanent wharf by filling up with ballast, stone,
797 or other material to construct under the specifications
798 contained herein; and nothing in this chapter shall be so
799 construed as to prevent any person from constructing any wharf
800 or placing any pilings, logs, or lumber in any waters where the
Page 32 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
801 person would have heretofore had the right so to do.
802 Section 8. Subsection (3) of section 310.0015, Florida
803 Statutes, is amended to read:
804 310.0015 Piloting regulation; general provisions.—
805 (3) The rate-setting process, the issuance of licenses
806 only in numbers deemed necessary or prudent by the department
807 board, and other aspects of the economic regulation of piloting
808 established in this chapter are intended to protect the public
809 from the adverse effects of unrestricted competition which would
810 result from an unlimited number of licensed pilots being allowed
811 to market their services on the basis of lower prices rather
812 than safety concerns. This system of regulation benefits and
813 protects the public interest by maximizing safety, avoiding
814 uneconomic duplication of capital expenses and facilities, and
815 enhancing state regulatory oversight. The system seeks to
816 provide pilots with reasonable revenues, taking into
817 consideration the normal uncertainties of vessel traffic and
818 port usage, sufficient to maintain reliable, stable piloting
819 operations. Pilots have certain restrictions and obligations
820 under this system, including, but not limited to, the following:
821 (a) Pilots may not refuse to provide piloting services to
822 any person or entity that may lawfully request such services,
823 except for justifiable concerns relating to safety, or, in the
824 case of a vessel planning a departure, for nonpayment of
825 pilotage.
Page 33 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
826 (b) Pilots may not unilaterally determine the pilotage
827 rates they charge. Such pilotage rates shall instead be
828 determined by the Pilotage Rate Review Committee, in the public
829 interest, as set forth in s. 310.151.
830 (c) Pilots shall maintain or secure adequate pilot boats,
831 office facilities and equipment, dispatch systems, communication
832 equipment and other facilities, and equipment and support
833 services necessary for a modern, dependable piloting operation.
834 (d) The pilot or pilots in a port shall train and
835 compensate all member deputy pilots in that port. Failure to
836 train or compensate such deputy pilots constitutes a ground for
837 disciplinary action under s. 310.101. Nothing in this subsection
838 may be deemed to create an agency or employment relationship
839 between a pilot or deputy pilot and the pilot or pilots in a
840 port.
841 (e) In any instance of a payment or transfer of funds, a
842 request for the payment or transfer of funds, or a contractual
843 obligation assumed in respect to the payment or transfer of
844 funds from a licensee payor to a pilot or group of pilots, or to
845 any legal entity or fund administered or controlled by or under
846 common control with such pilot or group of pilots, the pilot or
847 group of pilots shall provide to the licensee payor, at the time
848 the payment or transfer or request for the payment or transfer
849 is made or the obligation is assumed in respect to the payment
850 or transfer, a detailed accounting of the specific assets,
Page 34 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
851 tangible or intangible, in which an interest is being directly
852 or indirectly purchased or for which the licensee payor is being
853 granted an interest in return for such payment or transfer of
854 funds or such contractual obligation. This paragraph does not
855 apply to either payments or transfers of funds if their
856 aggregate amounts are less than $1,000. As used in this
857 paragraph, "licensee payor" means any current or prospective
858 state pilot or deputy pilot.
859 Section 9. Subsection (3) of section 310.002, Florida
860 Statutes, is amended to read:
861 310.002 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, except where
862 the context clearly indicates otherwise:
863 (3) "Board" means the Board of Pilot Commissioners.
864 Section 10. Section 310.051, Florida Statutes, is amended
865 to read:
866 310.051 Personnel; employment.—
867 (1) The department may appoint or employ such personnel as
868 may be necessary to assist the department and the board in doing
869 and performing any and all of the powers, duties, and
870 obligations set forth in this chapter. Such personnel need not
871 be licensed state pilots or members of the department board.
872 Such personnel shall be authorized to do and perform such duties
873 and work as may be assigned by the department. Except as
874 otherwise provided in this chapter, the department shall provide
875 all legal services necessary in carrying out the provisions of
Page 35 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
876 this chapter.
877 (2) The department shall hire a person knowledgeable and
878 experienced in matters related to piloting. Such person shall
879 act for the department on matters of examination and
880 investigation and, when he or she deems it necessary, in the
881 selection of legal counsel qualified in admiralty law. On an
882 annual basis, the board shall recommend to the department a
883 person knowledgeable and experienced in matters related to
884 piloting to fill this post, and the department may accept or
885 reject the recommendation. If the department rejects the board's
886 recommendation, the board shall continue to submit
887 recommendations until one is accepted by the department. Unless
888 there is affirmative action by both the board and the
889 department, at the end of each year, the position shall be
890 declared vacant and the board shall submit a new recommendation
891 for a person to fill such position.
892 Section 11. Section 310.061, Florida Statutes, is amended
893 to read:
894 310.061 State pilots; number; cross licensing.—The
895 department board shall determine the number of pilots based on
896 the supply and demand for piloting services and the public
897 interest in maintaining efficient and safe piloting services.
898 Based on the economic conditions of the port, the department
899 board may adopt rules authorizing cross licensing between ports,
900 if this will best serve the public interest.
Page 36 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
901 Section 12. Paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (1)
902 and subsections (2) and (3) of section 310.071, Florida
903 Statutes, are amended to read:
904 310.071 Deputy pilot certification.—
905 (1) In addition to meeting other requirements specified in
906 this chapter, each applicant for certification as a deputy pilot
907 must:
908 (b) Have successfully completed 12 years of formal
909 education, as evidenced by a high school diploma or by
910 equivalent evidence thereof that is satisfactory to the
911 department board.
912 (c) Be in good physical and mental health, as evidenced by
913 documentary proof of having satisfactorily passed a complete
914 physical examination administered by a licensed physician within
915 the preceding 6 months. The department board shall adopt rules
916 to establish requirements for passing the physical examination,
917 which rules shall establish minimum standards for the physical
918 or mental capabilities necessary to carry out the professional
919 duties of a certificated deputy pilot. Such standards shall
920 include zero tolerance for any controlled substance regulated
921 under chapter 893 unless that individual is under the care of a
922 physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician
923 assistant and that controlled substance was prescribed by that
924 physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician
925 assistant. To maintain eligibility as a certificated deputy
Page 37 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
926 pilot, each certificated deputy pilot must annually provide
927 documentary proof of having satisfactorily passed a complete
928 physical examination administered by a licensed physician. The
929 physician must know the minimum standards and certify that the
930 certificateholder satisfactorily meets the standards. The
931 standards for certificateholders shall include a drug test.
932 (d) Have had maritime experience satisfactory to the
933 department before board prior to taking the examination required
934 under s. 310.081(2), as evidenced by documentation of the
935 following service while holding a United States Coast Guard
936 license:
937 1. At least 2 years of service at sea during the 5-year
938 period immediately preceding the examination, 1 year of which
939 must have been in at least the capacity of an unlimited second
940 mate;
941 2. At least 2 years of service during the 5-year period
942 immediately preceding the examination in a deepwater United
943 States port as an active first-class unlimited pilot serving on
944 at least an unlimited second mate's license or a license as
945 master of freight and towing vessel of at least 1,600 gross
946 registered tons upon oceans, and acting under authority of a
947 duly constituted governmental regulatory entity;
948 3. At least 2 years of service during the 5-year period
949 immediately preceding the examination as an active first-class
950 unlimited pilot serving on a Great Lakes unlimited master's
Page 38 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
951 license;
952 4. At least 2 years of towing experience during the 5-year
953 period immediately preceding the examination, 1 year of which
954 must have been in the capacity of master of a tugboat/barge
955 combination of at least 5,000 gross registered tons, combined
956 tonnage, while holding a license as master of freight and towing
957 vessel of at least 1,600 gross registered tons upon oceans; or
958 5. At least 3 years of experience as a deck watch officer
959 during the 10-year period immediately preceding the examination,
960 1 year of which in the 5-year period immediately preceding the
961 exam must have been as the commanding officer, executive
962 officer, or operations officer of a United States Navy vessel or
963 a United States Coast Guard vessel of at least 1,600 gross tons,
964 and must currently hold a United States Coast Guard license of
965 at least an unlimited second mate.
966 (2) The department board may adopt rules authorizing
967 equivalent combinations of service from two or more of the areas
968 specified in subparagraphs (1)(d)1., 2., 3., 4., and 5. However,
969 the department board may waive the maritime experience
970 requirements prescribed in paragraph (1)(d) when necessary to
971 fill an opening, provided an applicant meeting such requirements
972 has not applied for the opening and the opening has been
973 advertised more than once.
974 (3) The initial certificate issued to a deputy pilot shall
975 be valid for a period of 12 months, and at the end of this
Page 39 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
976 period, the certificate shall automatically expire and may shall
977 not be renewed. During this period, the department board shall
978 thoroughly evaluate the deputy pilot's performance for
979 suitability to continue training and shall make appropriate
980 recommendations to the department. Upon the finding receipt of a
981 favorable evaluation recommendation by the board, the department
982 shall issue a certificate to the deputy pilot, which shall be
983 valid for a period of 2 years. The certificate may be renewed
984 only two times, except in the case of a fully licensed pilot who
985 is cross-licensed as a deputy pilot in another port, and
986 provided the deputy pilot meets the requirements specified for
987 pilots in paragraph (1)(c).
988 Section 13. Section 310.073, Florida Statutes, is amended
989 to read:
990 310.073 State pilot licensing.—In addition to meeting
991 other requirements specified in this chapter, each applicant for
992 license as a state pilot must:
993 (1) Be at least 21 years of age, as evidenced by a copy of
994 a birth certificate or other legal proof of age.
995 (2) Have successfully completed 12 years of formal
996 education, as evidenced by a high school diploma or by
997 equivalent evidence thereof that is satisfactory to the
998 department board.
999 (3) Be in good physical and mental health, as evidenced by
1000 documentary proof of having satisfactorily passed a complete
Page 40 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1001 physical examination administered by a licensed physician within
1002 the preceding 6 months. The department board shall adopt rules
1003 to establish requirements for passing the physical examination,
1004 which rules shall establish minimum standards for the physical
1005 or mental capabilities necessary to carry out the professional
1006 duties of a licensed state pilot. Such standards shall include
1007 zero tolerance for any controlled substance regulated under
1008 chapter 893 unless that individual is under the care of a
1009 physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician
1010 assistant and that controlled substance was prescribed by that
1011 physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician
1012 assistant. To maintain eligibility as a licensed state pilot,
1013 each licensed state pilot must annually provide documentary
1014 proof of having satisfactorily passed a complete physical
1015 examination administered by a licensed physician. The physician
1016 must know the minimum standards and certify that the licensee
1017 satisfactorily meets the standards. The standards for licensees
1018 shall include a drug test.
1019 (4) Have had at least 2 years of service as a deputy pilot
1020 in the port in which license as a licensed state pilot is
1021 desired, which service must have been attained during the period
1022 immediately preceding the examination required under s.
1023 310.081(1). Further, at the time of application, each applicant
1024 must have a valid United States Coast Guard first-class
1025 unlimited pilot's license covering all of the waters of the port
Page 41 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1026 in which license as a state pilot is desired and must have
1027 successfully completed the department-approved board-approved
1028 deputy pilot training program in the port in which license as a
1029 state pilot is desired.
1030 Section 14. Section 310.075, Florida Statutes, is amended
1031 to read:
1032 310.075 Deputy pilot training program.—The licensed state
1033 pilots in each port shall submit to the department board for its
1034 approval a deputy pilot training program of not less than 2
1035 years' duration, applicable to all deputy pilots appointed to
1036 serve at such port. The following requirements constitute the
1037 parameters within which deputy pilot training programs are to be
1038 established and carried out by the licensed state pilots at all
1039 ports in this state:
1040 (1) Upon receiving his or her appointment, a deputy pilot
1041 must report to the licensed state pilots at the port he or she
1042 is appointed to serve and must serve a period of not less than
1043 90 days as an observer trainee. During such period:
1044 (a) The observer trainee must accompany licensed state
1045 pilots, becoming thoroughly familiar with all of the waters, the
1046 channels, the harbor, and the port under varied conditions.
1047 (b) The observer trainee must obtain a valid United States
1048 Coast Guard first-class unlimited pilot's license covering all
1049 of the waters of the port before the department board may
1050 authorize him or her to pilot vessels within the limits and
Page 42 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1051 specifications established by the licensed state pilots of the
1052 port.
1053 (2) Upon completion of the observer-trainee period, the
1054 deputy pilot must submit to the department board a deputy pilot
1055 vessel handling form for each vessel upon which he or she has
1056 accompanied a licensed state pilot. Each such form must be
1057 signed by the pilot in charge who accompanied the deputy pilot
1058 and must accurately recite:
1059 (a) The vessel's registry, length, gross tonnage, and
1060 draft;
1061 (b) The name of the berth from which or to which the
1062 vessel was piloted;
1063 (c) The weather and sea conditions encountered;
1064 (d) The time of day;
1065 (e) Any marine incidents required to be reported under s.
1066 310.111; and
1067 (f) The comments of the pilot in charge, including
1068 whether, under his or her supervision, the pilot in charge
1069 turned the navigation of the vessel over to the deputy pilot.
1070 (3) Each request to increase the limits and specifications
1071 under which a deputy pilot is authorized to pilot must be
1072 submitted to the department board and must be accompanied by a
1073 deputy pilot vessel handling form as provided in subsection (2)
1074 for each vessel the deputy pilot has piloted since his or her
1075 limits and specifications were last increased by the department
Page 43 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1076 board.
1077 (4) For successful completion of the deputy pilot training
1078 program, a deputy pilot must have gradually been increased in
1079 his or her authorized limits and specifications until the deputy
1080 pilot has been authorized by the department board to pilot
1081 vessels with a maximum draft of not more than 3 feet less than
1082 the normal maximum draft allowable in the port in which the
1083 deputy pilot is authorized to pilot, as proposed by the licensed
1084 state pilots in that port and approved by the department board.
1085 Section 15. Section 310.081, Florida Statutes, is amended
1086 to read:
1087 310.081 Department to examine and license state pilots and
1088 certificate deputy pilots; vacancies.—
1089 (1) The department shall examine persons who file
1090 application as state pilot in all matters pertaining to the
1091 management of vessels and in regard to their knowledge of the
1092 channels, waters, harbors, and port where they wish to serve,
1093 and, if upon examination to determine proficiency the department
1094 finds them qualified to pilot all classes of vessels liable to
1095 enter that port and thoroughly familiar with the waters, the
1096 channels, the harbor, and the port, the department shall appoint
1097 and license as state pilots such number of pilots as in the
1098 discretion of the department board are required to act in the
1099 ports of the state. However, the number of pilots appointed and
1100 licensed by the department may shall not exceed the number
Page 44 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1101 provided for in s. 310.061.
1102 (2) The department shall similarly examine persons who
1103 file applications for certificate as deputy pilot, and, if upon
1104 examination to determine proficiency the department finds them
1105 qualified, the department must certify as qualified all
1106 applicants who pass the examination, provided that not more than
1107 five persons who passed the examination are certified for each
1108 declared opening. If more than five applicants per opening pass
1109 the examination, the persons having the highest scores must be
1110 certified as qualified up to the number of openings times five.
1111 The department shall appoint and certificate such number of
1112 deputy pilots from those applicants deemed qualified as in the
1113 discretion of the department board are required in the
1114 respective ports of the state. A deputy pilot shall be
1115 authorized by the department to pilot vessels within the limits
1116 and specifications established by the licensed state pilots at
1117 the port where the deputy is appointed to serve.
1118 (3) Pilots shall hold their licenses or certificates
1119 pursuant to the requirements of this chapter so long as they:
1120 (a) Possess the qualifications set out in this chapter.
1121 (b) Are in good physical and mental health as evidenced by
1122 documentary proof of having satisfactorily passed a physical
1123 examination administered by a licensed physician or physician
1124 assistant within each calendar year. The department board shall
1125 adopt rules to establish requirements for passing the physical
Page 45 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1126 examination, which rules shall establish minimum standards for
1127 the physical or mental capabilities necessary to carry out the
1128 professional duties of a licensed state pilot or a certificated
1129 deputy pilot. Such standards shall include zero tolerance for
1130 any controlled substance regulated under chapter 893 unless that
1131 individual is under the care of a physician, an advanced
1132 practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant and that
1133 controlled substance was prescribed by that physician, advanced
1134 practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. To maintain
1135 eligibility as a certificated deputy pilot or licensed state
1136 pilot, each certificated deputy pilot or licensed state pilot
1137 must annually provide documentary proof of having satisfactorily
1138 passed a complete physical examination administered by a
1139 licensed physician. The physician must know the minimum
1140 standards and certify that the certificateholder or licensee
1141 satisfactorily meets the standards. The standards for
1142 certificateholders and for licensees shall include a drug test.
1143 (c) Are subject to a substance abuse program that has been
1144 approved by the department board, which includes provisions for
1145 drug testing.
1146 (d) Attend a board-approved seminar for continuing
1147 education which includes radar certification.
1148 (d)(e) Remain in active service in the ports for which
1149 they are appointed.
1150
Page 46 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1151 Upon resignation or in the case of disability permanently
1152 affecting a pilot's ability to serve, the state license or
1153 certificate issued under this chapter shall be revoked by the
1154 department.
1155 Section 16. Paragraphs (d), (g), and (h) of subsection (1)
1156 and subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 310.101, Florida
1157 Statutes, are amended to read:
1158 310.101 Grounds for disciplinary action by the department
1159 board.—
1160 (1) Any act of misconduct, inattention to duty,
1161 negligence, or incompetence; any willful violation of any law or
1162 rule, including the rules of the road, applicable to a licensed
1163 state pilot or certificated deputy pilot; or any failure to
1164 exercise that care which a reasonable and prudent licensed state
1165 pilot or certificated deputy pilot would exercise under the same
1166 or similar circumstances may result in disciplinary action.
1167 Examples of acts by a licensed state pilot or certificated
1168 deputy pilot which constitute grounds for disciplinary action
1169 include, but are not limited to:
1170 (d) Navigating in channels where the depth of water under
1171 the keel is less than the prescribed bottom clearance as
1172 recommended by the licensed state pilots of that port and
1173 approved by the department board.
1174 (g) Making or filing, or inducing another person to make
1175 or file, a report which the pilot knows to be false or
Page 47 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1176 intentionally or negligently failing to file, or willfully
1177 impeding or obstructing the filing of, a report or record
1178 required by state law or by rule of the board or the department.
1179 Such reports or records include only those which are signed by
1180 the pilot in his or her capacity as a licensed state pilot or
1181 certificated deputy pilot.
1182 (h) Being unable to perform the duties of a pilot with
1183 reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness or use of
1184 alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of
1185 material or as a result of any mental or physical condition such
1186 as, but not limited to, poor eyesight or hearing, heart disease,
1187 or diabetes. In enforcing this paragraph, the department shall
1188 have authority, upon recommendation of the probable cause panel
1189 of the department board, to compel a licensed state pilot or
1190 certificated deputy pilot to submit to a mental or physical
1191 examination by physicians designated by the department. The
1192 failure of a pilot to submit to such an examination when so
1193 directed constitutes an admission of the allegations against the
1194 pilot, unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond his or
1195 her control, consequent upon which an emergency suspension order
1196 may be entered by the department suspending the pilot's license
1197 until he or she complies with the order for a compulsory mental
1198 or physical examination. A licensed state pilot or certificated
1199 deputy pilot affected under this paragraph must be afforded, at
1200 reasonable intervals, an opportunity to demonstrate that he or
Page 48 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1201 she can resume the competent practice of piloting with
1202 reasonable skill and safety.
1203 (2) When the department board finds any person has
1204 committed any act set forth in subsection (1), it may enter an
1205 order imposing one or more of the following penalties:
1206 (a) Refusing to certify to the department an application
1207 for license or certification.
1208 (b) Revoking or suspending the license or certificate.
1209 (c) Restricting the practice of the violator.
1210 (d) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000
1211 for each count or separate offense.
1212 (e) Issuing a reprimand.
1213 (f) Placing the licensed state pilot or certificated
1214 deputy pilot on probation for such period of time and subject to
1215 such conditions as the department board may specify, including,
1216 but not limited to, requiring the pilot to submit to treatment,
1217 submit to additional or remedial training, submit to
1218 reexamination, or undergo a complete physical examination.
1219 (3) The department board shall not reinstate the license
1220 or certificate of a state pilot or deputy pilot or cause a
1221 license or certificate to be issued to a person whom it has
1222 determined to be unqualified until the department board is
1223 satisfied that such person has complied with all the terms and
1224 conditions set forth in the final order and that such person is
1225 capable of safely engaging in the practice of piloting.
Page 49 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1226 (4) In any foreign vessel or foreign trading vessel
1227 movement that an individual holding a state pilot license or
1228 deputy pilot certificate is engaged in directing, whether
1229 movement of the vessel in or out of the port or movement in
1230 close proximity to a dock or any other movement undertaken in
1231 furtherance of his or her piloting duties, such individual is
1232 operating under the authority of his or her state license or
1233 certificate and is accountable to the department board for his
1234 or her actions.
1235 Section 17. Subsections (4) and (6) of section 310.102,
1236 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1237 310.102 Treatment programs for impaired pilots and deputy
1238 pilots.—
1239 (4) In any disciplinary action for a violation other than
1240 impairment, if a pilot or deputy pilot establishes that the
1241 violation for which the pilot or deputy pilot is being
1242 prosecuted was due to or connected with impairment and further
1243 establishes that the pilot or deputy pilot is satisfactorily
1244 progressing through or has successfully completed an approved
1245 treatment program pursuant to this section, such information may
1246 be considered by the department board as a mitigating factor in
1247 determining the appropriate penalty. This subsection does not
1248 limit mitigating factors the department board may consider.
1249 (6) A consultant, licensee, or approved treatment provider
1250 who makes a disclosure pursuant to this section is not subject
Page 50 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1251 to civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences. The
1252 provisions of s. 766.101 apply to any officer, employee, or
1253 agent of the department or the board and to any officer,
1254 employee, or agent of any entity with which the department has
1255 contracted pursuant to this section.
1256 Section 18. Section 310.111, Florida Statutes, is amended
1257 to read:
1258 310.111 Marine incident reports.—Each collision,
1259 grounding, stranding, or other marine peril sustained or caused
1260 by a vessel on which there was employed a licensed state pilot
1261 or certificated deputy pilot shall be reported to the department
1262 office of the board or the piloting consultant within 48 hours
1263 after of the occurrence. In addition, a written report shall be
1264 submitted to the department on forms and in the manner
1265 prescribed by the department within 7 days after of the
1266 occurrence. However, any marine incident involving oil spillage,
1267 pollution, physical injury, or death shall be reported to the
1268 department board or the piloting consultant by telephone or
1269 telegram within 24 hours after of the occurrence in addition to
1270 submission of the required written report.
1271 Section 19. Section 310.121, Florida Statutes, is amended
1272 to read:
1273 310.121 Application, examination, and biennial fees.—
1274 (1) The department shall, in accordance with rules set by
1275 the department board, assess and collect the following fees:
Page 51 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1276 (a) A fee not to exceed $300 for each application for
1277 licensure as a state pilot or certification as a deputy pilot.
1278 This fee shall be nonrefundable.
1279 (b) A fee not to exceed $300 for each examination for
1280 licensure as a state pilot or certification as a deputy pilot.
1281 (c) A fee not to exceed $300 for each examination review.
1282 (2) The department shall assess and collect biennially
1283 from each licensed state pilot and each certificated deputy
1284 pilot a fee, not to exceed $200 in the case of a licensed state
1285 pilot or $100 in the case of a certificated deputy pilot, such
1286 fees to be set by the department board.
1287 Section 20. Section 310.131, Florida Statutes, is amended
1288 to read:
1289 310.131 Assessment of percentage of gross pilotage.—The
1290 department shall assess the licensed state pilots in the
1291 respective ports of the state a percentage of the gross amount
1292 of pilotage earned by such pilots during each year, which
1293 percentage will be established by the department board not to
1294 exceed 2 percent, to be paid into the Professional Regulation
1295 Trust Fund by such pilots at such time and in such manner as the
1296 department board prescribes or as is set forth in the General
1297 Appropriations Act. The financial records of all pilots and
1298 deputy pilots relating to pilotage are subject to audit by the
1299 department and the Auditor General. The department shall by rule
1300 set a procedure for verifying the amount of pilotage at each
Page 52 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1301 port and may charge costs to the appropriate port if the port
1302 does not comply with such procedure.
1303 Section 21. Section 310.142, Florida Statutes, is amended
1304 to read:
1305 310.142 Pilotage at St. Marys Entrance.—The department may
1306 exercise board is authorized to enter into an agreement with the
1307 Board of Pilotage Commissioners for the corporate authority of
1308 St. Marys, Georgia, for reciprocal pilotage of vessels in the
1309 boundary waters and tributaries of St. Marys Entrance.
1310 Section 22. Subsections (1) and (7) of section 310.151,
1311 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1312 310.151 Rates of pilotage; Pilotage Rate Review
1313 Committee.—
1314 (1)(a) As used in this section, the term:
1315 1. "committee" means the Pilotage Rate Review Committee
1316 established under this section as part of the Board of Pilot
1317 Commissioners.
1318 2. "Board" means the Board of Pilot Commissioners.
1319 (b) To carry out the provisions of this section, the
1320 Pilotage Rate Review Committee is established as part of the
1321 Board of Pilot Commissioners within the department of Business
1322 and Professional Regulation. The committee shall consist of the
1323 following seven members of the board: two board members who are
1324 licensed state pilots actively practicing their profession, who
1325 shall be appointed by majority vote of the licensed state pilots
Page 53 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1326 serving on the board; two board members who are actively
1327 involved in a professional or business capacity in the maritime
1328 industry, marine shipping industry, or commercial passenger
1329 cruise industry; one board member who is a certified public
1330 accountant with at least 5 years of experience in financial
1331 management; and two board members who are citizens of the state.
1332 (c) Committee members shall comply with the disclosure
1333 requirements of s. 112.3143(4) if participating in any matter
1334 that would result in special private gain or loss as described
1335 in that subsection.
1336 (d) The committee may has authority to adopt rules
1337 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement provisions of
1338 this section conferring duties upon it. The department shall
1339 provide the staff required by the committee to carry out its
1340 duties under this section.
1341 (e) All funds received pursuant to this section shall be
1342 placed in the account of the department Board of Pilot
1343 Commissioners, and the department Board of Pilot Commissioners
1344 shall pay for all expenses incurred pursuant to this section.
1345 (7) The decisions of the committee regarding rates are not
1346 appealable to the department board.
1347 Section 23. Section 310.183, Florida Statutes, is amended
1348 to read:
1349 310.183 Immediate inactivation of license or certificate
1350 for certain violations.—The department shall issue an emergency
Page 54 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1351 order placing on inactive status, for a period not to exceed 15
1352 days, the license of any pilot or certificate of any deputy
1353 pilot who, while providing piloting services, is involved in a
1354 marine incident that results in the death of a human or, as
1355 determined by rule of the board, substantial physical injury to
1356 a human or significant property or environmental damage, unless
1357 the department determines that the incident is clearly not the
1358 result of the actions of the pilot or deputy pilot.
1359 Section 24. Subsection (1) of section 310.185, Florida
1360 Statutes, is amended to read:
1361 310.185 Rulemaking.—
1362 (1) The department may board has authority to adopt rules
1363 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the
1364 provisions of this chapter.
1365 Section 25. Subsection (2) of section 326.002, Florida
1366 Statutes, is amended to read:
1367 326.002 Definitions.—As used in ss. 326.001-326.006, the
1368 term:
1369 (2) "Division" means the Division of Professions Florida
1370 Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes of the Department of
1371 Business and Professional Regulation.
1372 Section 26. Subsection (3) of section 326.006, Florida
1373 Statutes, is amended to read:
1374 326.006 Powers and duties of division.—
1375 (3) All fees must be deposited in the Professional
Page 55 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1376 Regulation Division of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and
1377 Mobile Homes Trust Fund as provided by law.
1378 Section 27. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1379 376.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1380 376.303 Powers and duties of the Department of
1381 Environmental Protection.—
1382 (3) INSPECTION OF POLLUTANT STORAGE TANKS.—
1383 (a) The department may inspect the installation of any
1384 pollutant storage tank. Any person installing a pollutant
1385 storage tank, as defined in s. 489.105(16) s. 489.105(17), shall
1386 certify that such installation is in accordance with the
1387 standards adopted pursuant to this section. The department shall
1388 promulgate a form for such certification which shall at a
1389 minimum include:
1390 1. A signed statement by the certified pollutant storage
1391 systems contractor, as defined in s. 489.105(2)(p) s.
1392 489.105(3)(p), that such installation is in accordance with
1393 standards adopted pursuant to this section; and
1394 2. Signed statements by the onsite persons performing or
1395 supervising the installation of a pollutant storage tank, which
1396 statements shall be required of tasks that are necessary for the
1397 proper installation of such tank.
1398 Section 28. Paragraph (n) of subsection (3) of section
1399 381.0065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1400 381.0065 Onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems;
Page 56 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1401 regulation.—
1402 (3) DUTIES AND POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL
1403 PROTECTION.—The department shall:
1404 (n) Regulate and permit maintenance entities for
1405 performance-based treatment systems and aerobic treatment unit
1406 systems. To ensure systems are maintained and operated according
1407 to manufacturer's specifications and designs, the department
1408 shall establish by rule minimum qualifying criteria for
1409 maintenance entities. The criteria shall include training,
1410 access to approved spare parts and components, access to
1411 manufacturer's maintenance and operation manuals, and service
1412 response time. The maintenance entity shall employ a contractor
1413 licensed under s. 489.105(2)(m) s. 489.105(3)(m), or part III of
1414 chapter 489, or a state-licensed wastewater plant operator, who
1415 is responsible for maintenance and repair of all systems under
1416 contract.
1417 Section 29. Section 403.868, Florida Statutes, is amended
1418 to read:
1419 403.868 Requirements by a utility.—A utility may have more
1420 stringent requirements than set by law, including certification
1421 requirements for water distribution systems and domestic
1422 wastewater collection systems operations, except that a utility
1423 may not require a licensed contractor, as defined in s.
1424 489.105(2) s. 489.105(3) to have any additional license for work
1425 in water distribution systems or domestic wastewater collection
Page 57 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1426 systems.
1427 Section 30. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
1428 403.9329, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1429 403.9329 Professional mangrove trimmers.—
1430 (1) For purposes of ss. 403.9321-403.9333, the following
1431 persons are considered professional mangrove trimmers:
1432 (e) Persons licensed under part II of chapter 481. The
1433 Department of Business and Professional Regulation Board of
1434 Landscape Architecture shall establish appropriate standards and
1435 continuing legal education requirements to assure the competence
1436 of licensees to conduct the activities authorized under ss.
1437 403.9321-403.9333. Trimming by landscape architects as
1438 professional mangrove trimmers is not allowed until the
1439 establishment of standards by the department board. The
1440 department board shall also establish penalties for violating
1441 ss. 403.9321-403.9333. Only those landscape architects who are
1442 certified in the state may qualify as professional mangrove
1443 trimmers under ss. 403.9321-403.9333, notwithstanding any
1444 reciprocity agreements that may exist between this state and
1445 other states;
1446 Section 31. Paragraph (a) of subsection (19) of section
1447 440.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1448 440.02 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, unless the
1449 context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms shall
1450 have the following meanings:
Page 58 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1451 (19)(a) "Employer" means the state and all political
1452 subdivisions thereof, all public and quasi-public corporations
1453 therein, every person carrying on any employment, and the legal
1454 representative of a deceased person or the receiver or trustees
1455 of any person. The term also includes employee leasing
1456 companies, as defined in s. 468.520(4) s. 468.520(5), and
1457 employment agencies that provide their own employees to other
1458 persons. If the employer is a corporation, parties in actual
1459 control of the corporation, including, but not limited to, the
1460 president, officers who exercise broad corporate powers,
1461 directors, and all shareholders who directly or indirectly own a
1462 controlling interest in the corporation, are considered the
1463 employer for the purposes of ss. 440.105, 440.106, and 440.107.
1464 Section 32. Section 448.26, Florida Statutes, is amended
1465 to read:
1466 448.26 Application.—Nothing in this part shall exempt any
1467 client of any labor pool or temporary help arrangement entity as
1468 defined in s. 468.520(3)(a) s. 468.520(4)(a) or any assigned
1469 employee from any other license requirements of state, local, or
1470 federal law. Any employee assigned to a client who is licensed,
1471 registered, or certified pursuant to law shall be deemed an
1472 employee of the client for such licensure purposes but shall
1473 remain an employee of the labor pool or temporary help
1474 arrangement entity for purposes of chapters 440 and 443.
1475 Section 33. Section 455.203, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 59 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1476 to read:
1477 455.203 Department; powers and duties.—Notwithstanding any
1478 other law, for each profession under the jurisdiction of the
1479 department, and for the boards under its jurisdiction, the
1480 department shall:
1481 (1) Adopt rules establishing a procedure for the biennial
1482 renewal of licenses every 4 years; however, the department may
1483 issue up to a 4-year license to selected licensees
1484 notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary.
1485 Fees for such renewal shall not exceed the fee caps for
1486 individual professions on an annualized basis as authorized by
1487 law.
1488 (2) Appoint the executive director of each board, subject
1489 to the approval of the board.
1490 (3) Submit an annual budget to the Legislature at a time
1491 and in the manner provided by law.
1492 (4) Develop a training program for persons newly appointed
1493 to membership on any board. The program shall familiarize such
1494 persons with the substantive and procedural laws and rules and
1495 fiscal information relating to the regulation of the appropriate
1496 profession and with the structure of the department.
1497 (5) Adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to
1498 implement the provisions of this chapter.
1499 (6) Establish by rule procedures by which the department
1500 shall use the expert or technical advice of the appropriate
Page 60 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1501 board for the purposes of investigation, inspection, evaluation
1502 of applications, other duties of the department, or any other
1503 areas the department may deem appropriate.
1504 (7) Require all proceedings of any board or panel thereof
1505 and all formal or informal proceedings conducted by the
1506 department, an administrative law judge, or a hearing officer
1507 with respect to licensing or discipline to be electronically
1508 recorded in a manner sufficient to assure the accurate
1509 transcription of all matters so recorded.
1510 (8) Select only those investigators, or consultants who
1511 undertake investigations, who meet criteria established with the
1512 advice of the respective boards.
1513 (9) Work cooperatively with the Department of Revenue to
1514 implement an automated method for periodically disclosing
1515 information relating to current licensees to the Department of
1516 Revenue. The purpose of this subsection is to promote the public
1517 policy of this state as established in s. 409.2551. The
1518 department shall, when directed by the court or the Department
1519 of Revenue pursuant to s. 409.2598, suspend or deny the license
1520 of any licensee found not to be in compliance with a support
1521 order, subpoena, order to show cause, or written agreement
1522 entered into by the licensee with the Department of Revenue. The
1523 department shall issue or reinstate the license without
1524 additional charge to the licensee when notified by the court or
1525 the Department of Revenue that the licensee has complied with
Page 61 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1526 the terms of the support order. The department shall not be held
1527 liable for any license denial or suspension resulting from the
1528 discharge of its duties under this subsection.
1529 (10) Have authority to:
1530 (a) Close and terminate deficient license application
1531 files 2 years after the board or the department notifies the
1532 applicant of the deficiency; and
1533 (b) Approve applications for professional licenses that
1534 meet all statutory and rule requirements for licensure.
1535 Section 34. Subsections (8) and (9) of section 455.271,
1536 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1537 455.271 Inactive and delinquent status.—
1538 (8) Each board, or the department when there is no board,
1539 shall, by rule, impose an additional fee, not to exceed the
1540 biennial renewal fee for an active status license, for
1541 processing a licensee's request to change licensure status at
1542 any time other than at the beginning of a licensure cycle.
1543 (9) Each board, or the department when there is no board,
1544 may, by rule, impose reasonable conditions, excluding full
1545 reexamination but including part of a national examination or a
1546 special purpose examination to assess current competency,
1547 necessary to ensure that a licensee who has been on inactive
1548 status for more than one two consecutive biennial licensure
1549 cycle cycles and who applies for active status can practice with
1550 the care and skill sufficient to protect the health, safety, and
Page 62 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1551 welfare of the public. Reactivation requirements may differ
1552 depending on the length of time licensees are inactive. The
1553 costs to meet reactivation requirements shall be borne by
1554 licensees requesting reactivation.
1555 Section 35. Subsection (4) of section 468.382, Florida
1556 Statutes, is amended to read:
1557 468.382 Definitions.—As used in this act, the term:
1558 (4) "Board" means the Florida Board of Auctioneers.
1559 Section 36. Subsections (1) and (3) through (7) of section
1560 468.385, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1561 468.385 Licenses required; qualifications; examination.—
1562 (1) The department shall license any applicant who the
1563 board certifies is qualified to practice auctioneering.
1564 (3) A No person may not shall be licensed as an auctioneer
1565 or apprentice if he or she:
1566 (a) Is under 18 years of age; or
1567 (b) Has committed any act or offense in this state or any
1568 other jurisdiction which would constitute a basis for
1569 disciplinary action under s. 468.389.
1570 (4) A Any person seeking a license as an auctioneer must
1571 pass a written examination approved by the department board
1572 which tests his or her general knowledge of the laws of this
1573 state relating to provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code that
1574 are relevant to auctions, the laws of agency, and the provisions
1575 of this act.
Page 63 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1576 (5) Each apprentice application and license shall name a
1577 licensed auctioneer who has agreed to serve as the supervisor of
1578 the apprentice. An No apprentice may not conduct, or contract to
1579 conduct, an auction without the express approval of his or her
1580 supervisor. The supervisor shall regularly review the
1581 apprentice's records, which are required by the department board
1582 to be maintained, to determine whether if such records are
1583 accurate and current.
1584 (6) A No person may not shall be licensed as an auctioneer
1585 unless he or she:
1586 (a) Has held an apprentice license and has served as an
1587 apprentice for 1 year or more, or has completed a course of
1588 study, consisting of not less than 80 classroom hours of
1589 instruction, that meets standards adopted by the department
1590 board;
1591 (b) Has passed the required examination; and
1592 (c) Is approved by the department board.
1593 (7)(a) Any auction that is subject to the provisions of
1594 this part must be conducted by an auctioneer who has an active
1595 license or an apprentice who has an active apprentice auctioneer
1596 license and who has received prior written sponsor consent.
1597 (b) A No business may not shall auction or offer to
1598 auction any property in this state unless it is licensed as an
1599 auction business by the department board or is exempt from
1600 licensure under this act. An Each application for licensure must
Page 64 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1601 shall include the names of the owner and the business, the
1602 business mailing address and location, and any other information
1603 which the department board may require. The owner of an auction
1604 business shall report to the department board within 30 days
1605 after of any change in this required information.
1606 Section 37. Subsection (2) of section 468.3851, Florida
1607 Statutes, is amended to read:
1608 468.3851 Renewal of license.—
1609 (2) The department shall adopt a procedure for the
1610 biennial renewal of licenses every 4 years.
1611 Section 38. Section 468.3852, Florida Statutes, is amended
1612 to read:
1613 468.3852 Reactivation of license; fee.—The department
1614 board shall prescribe a fee not to exceed $250 for the
1615 reactivation of an inactive license. The fee shall be in
1616 addition to the current biennial renewal fee.
1617 Section 39. Subsections (2) through (5) and (8) of section
1618 468.3855, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1619 468.3855 Apprenticeship training requirements.—
1620 (2) Any auctioneer who undertakes the sponsorship of an
1621 apprentice shall ensure that the apprentice receives training as
1622 required by department board rule.
1623 (3) An apprentice must actively participate in auction
1624 sales as required by department board rule, and a record of each
1625 auction for which participation credit is claimed must be made
Page 65 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1626 as required by department board rule.
1627 (4) Apprentices are prohibited from conducting any auction
1628 without the prior express written consent of the sponsor. The
1629 apprentice's sponsor must be present at the auction site at any
1630 time the apprentice is actively participating in the conduct of
1631 the auction. If the apprentice's sponsor cannot attend a
1632 particular auction, the sponsor may appoint a qualified
1633 auctioneer who meets the requirements of department board rule
1634 to attend the auction in his or her place. Prior written consent
1635 must be given by the apprentice's sponsor for each substitution.
1636 (5) Each apprentice and sponsor shall file reports as
1637 required by department board rule.
1638 (8) All apprentice applications shall be valid for a
1639 period of 6 months after department board approval. Any
1640 applicant who fails to complete the licensure process within
1641 that time shall be required to make application as a new
1642 applicant.
1643 Section 40. Subsection (1) of section 468.386, Florida
1644 Statutes, is amended to read:
1645 468.386 Fees; local licensing requirements.—
1646 (1) The department board by rule may establish
1647 application, examination, licensure, renewal, and other
1648 reasonable and necessary fees, based upon the department's
1649 estimate of the costs to the board in administering this act.
1650 Section 41. Section 468.387, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 66 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1651 to read:
1652 468.387 Licensing of nonresidents; endorsement;
1653 reciprocity.—The department shall issue a license by endorsement
1654 to practice auctioneering to an applicant who, upon applying to
1655 the department and remitting the required fee, set by the
1656 department board, demonstrates to the department board that he
1657 or she satisfies the requirements of s. 468.385(3) and holds a
1658 valid license to practice auctioneering in another state,
1659 provided that the requirements for licensure in that state are
1660 substantially equivalent to or more stringent than those
1661 existing in this state. The endorsement and reciprocity
1662 provisions of this section shall apply to auctioneers only and
1663 not to professions or occupations regulated by other statutes.
1664 Section 42. Subsections (3) and (9) and paragraph (b) of
1665 subsection (10) of section 468.388, Florida Statutes, are
1666 amended to read:
1667 468.388 Conduct of an auction.—
1668 (3) Each auctioneer or auction business shall maintain a
1669 record book of all sales. The record book shall be open to
1670 inspection by the department board at reasonable times.
1671 (9) The auction business under which the auction is
1672 conducted is responsible for all other aspects of the auction as
1673 required by department board rule. The auction business may
1674 delegate in whole, or in part, different aspects of the auction
1675 only to the extent that such delegation is permitted by law and
Page 67 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1676 that such delegation will not impede the principal auctioneer's
1677 ability to ensure the proper conduct of his or her independent
1678 responsibility for the auction. The auction business under whose
1679 auspices the auction is conducted is responsible for ensuring
1680 compliance as required by department board rule.
1681 (10)
1682 (b) Each auction business shall maintain, for not less
1683 than 2 years, a separate ledger showing the funds held for
1684 another person deposited and disbursed by the auction business
1685 for each auction. The escrow or trust account must be reconciled
1686 monthly with the bank statement. A signed and dated record shall
1687 be maintained for a 2-year period and be available for
1688 inspection by the department or at the request of the board.
1689 Section 43. Paragraph (j) of subsection (1), subsection
1690 (2), and paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 468.389,
1691 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1692 468.389 Prohibited acts; penalties.—
1693 (1) The following acts shall be grounds for the
1694 disciplinary activities provided in subsections (2) and (3):
1695 (j) Violating a statute or administrative rule regulating
1696 practice under this part or a lawful disciplinary order of the
1697 board or the department.
1698 (2) When the department board finds any person guilty of
1699 any of the prohibited acts set forth in subsection (1), it may
1700 enter an order imposing one or more of the following penalties:
Page 68 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1701 (a) Refusal to certify to the department an application
1702 for licensure.
1703 (b) Revocation or suspension of a license.
1704 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
1705 $1,000 for each count or separate offense.
1706 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
1707 (e) Placement of the auctioneer on probation for a period
1708 of time and subject to conditions as the department board may
1709 specify, including requiring the auctioneer to successfully
1710 complete the licensure examination.
1711 (f) Requirement that the person in violation make
1712 restitution to each consumer affected by that violation. Proof
1713 of such restitution shall be a signed and notarized release
1714 executed by the consumer or the consumer's estate.
1715 (3)(a) Failure to pay a fine within a reasonable time, as
1716 prescribed by department board rule, may be grounds for
1717 disciplinary action.
1718 Section 44. Section 468.392, Florida Statutes, is amended
1719 to read:
1720 468.392 Auctioneer Recovery Fund.—There is created the
1721 Auctioneer Recovery Fund as a separate account in the
1722 Professional Regulation Trust Fund. The fund shall be
1723 administered by the department Florida Board of Auctioneers.
1724 (1) The Chief Financial Officer shall invest the money not
1725 currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
Page 69 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1726 manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that
1727 accrues from these investments shall be deposited to the credit
1728 of the Auctioneer Recovery Fund and shall be available for the
1729 same purposes as other moneys deposited in the Auctioneer
1730 Recovery Fund.
1731 (2) All payments and disbursements from the Auctioneer
1732 Recovery Fund shall be made by the Chief Financial Officer upon
1733 a voucher signed by the Secretary of Business and Professional
1734 Regulation or the secretary's designee.
1735 (3) If at any time the moneys in the Auctioneer Recovery
1736 Fund are insufficient to satisfy any valid claim or portion
1737 thereof, the department board shall satisfy such unpaid claim or
1738 portion thereof as soon as a sufficient amount has been
1739 deposited in or transferred to the fund. When there is more than
1740 one unsatisfied claim outstanding, such claims shall be paid in
1741 the order in which the claims were made.
1742 (4) Upon the payment of any amount from the Auctioneer
1743 Recovery Fund in settlement of a claim in satisfaction of a
1744 judgment against an auctioneer or auction business as described
1745 in s. 468.395, the license of such auctioneer or auction
1746 business shall be automatically suspended until the licensee has
1747 complied with s. 468.398. A discharge of bankruptcy does shall
1748 not relieve a person from the penalties and disabilities
1749 provided in this section.
1750 (5) Moneys in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall
Page 70 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1751 be retained in the fund and shall accrue for the benefit of
1752 auctioneers and auction businesses. When the fund exceeds the
1753 amount as set forth in s. 468.393(2), all surcharges shall be
1754 suspended until such time as the fund is reduced below the
1755 amount as set forth in s. 468.393(3).
1756 Section 45. Subsections (1), (3), and (4) of section
1757 468.393, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1758 468.393 Surcharge to license fee; assessments.—
1759 (1) At the time of licensure under s. 468.385, s.
1760 468.3851, or s. 468.3852, each licensee shall pay, in addition
1761 to an application and license fee, a surcharge in an amount to
1762 be determined by the department board, not to exceed $300, which
1763 shall be deposited in the Auctioneer Recovery Fund.
1764 (3) After October 1, 1995, if the total amount in the
1765 Auctioneer Recovery Fund, including principal and interest, is
1766 less than $200,000 at the end of the fiscal year after the
1767 payment of all claims and expenses, the department board shall
1768 assess, in addition to any other fees under s. 468.3852, a
1769 surcharge against a licensee at the time of initial licensure or
1770 at the time of license renewal, according to the following
1771 formula in order to maintain the fund at $500,000:
1772 (a) Determine the amount remaining in the fund at the end
1773 of the state fiscal year after all expenses and claims have been
1774 paid.
1775 (b) Subtract the amount determined under paragraph (a)
Page 71 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1776 from $500,000.
1777 (c) Determine the number of initial licenses and license
1778 renewals in the fiscal year that precedes the current fiscal
1779 year.
1780 (d) Divide the amount determined under paragraph (b) by
1781 the number determined under paragraph (c).
1782 (4) The department board shall assess the surcharge
1783 described in subsection (3) against each licensee who receives
1784 an initial license or receives a renewal license during the
1785 fiscal year that follows the year in which the amount remaining
1786 in the fund was less than $200,000.
1787 Section 46. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 468.395,
1788 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1789 468.395 Conditions of recovery; eligibility.—
1790 (1) Recovery from the Auctioneer Recovery Fund may be
1791 obtained as follows:
1792 (a) Any aggrieved person is eligible to receive recovery
1793 from the Auctioneer Recovery Fund if the department Florida
1794 Board of Auctioneers has issued a final order directing an
1795 offending licensee to pay restitution to the claimant as the
1796 result of the licensee violating, within this state, any
1797 provision of s. 468.389 or any rule adopted by the department
1798 board and if the department board determined that the order of
1799 restitution cannot be enforced; or
1800 (b) Any aggrieved person who obtains a final judgment in
Page 72 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1801 any court against any licensee to recover damages for any actual
1802 loss that results from the violation, within this state, by a
1803 licensee of any provision of s. 468.389 or any rule adopted by
1804 the department board may, upon termination of all proceedings,
1805 including appeals and proceedings supplemental to judgment for
1806 collection purposes, file a verified application to the
1807 department board for an order directing payment out of the
1808 Auctioneer Recovery Fund of the amount of actual loss in the
1809 transaction that remains unpaid upon the judgment. The amount of
1810 actual loss may include court costs, but may shall not include
1811 attorney attorney's fees or punitive damages awarded.
1812 (4) The department may board shall not issue an order for
1813 payment of a claim from the Auctioneer Recovery Fund unless the
1814 claimant has reasonably established to the department board that
1815 she or he has taken proper and reasonable action to collect the
1816 amount of her or his claim from the licensee responsible for the
1817 loss and that any recovery made has been applied to reduce the
1818 amount of the claim on the Auctioneer Recovery Fund.
1819 Section 47. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 468.396,
1820 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1821 468.396 Claims against a single licensee in excess of
1822 dollar limitation; joinder of claims, payment; insufficient
1823 funds.—
1824 (2) Upon petition of the department board, the court may
1825 require all claimants and prospective claimants against one
Page 73 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1826 licensee to be joined in one action, to the end that the
1827 respective rights of all the claimants to the department board
1828 may be equitably adjudicated and settled.
1829 (3) On June 30 and December 31 of each year, the
1830 department board shall identify each claim that the court orders
1831 to be paid during the 6-month period that ended on that day. The
1832 department board shall pay the part of each claim that is so
1833 identified within 15 days after the end of the 6-month period in
1834 which the claim is ordered paid. However, if the balance in the
1835 fund is insufficient to pay the full payable amount of each
1836 claim that is ordered to be paid during a 6-month period, the
1837 department board shall pay a prorated portion of each claim that
1838 is ordered to be paid during the period. Any part of the payable
1839 amount of a claim left unpaid due to the prorating of payments
1840 under this subsection shall be paid, subject to the $50,000
1841 limit described in s. 468.395, before the payment of claims
1842 ordered to be paid during the following 6 months.
1843 Section 48. Section 468.397, Florida Statutes, is amended
1844 to read:
1845 468.397 Payment of claim.—Upon a final order of the court
1846 directing that payment be made out of the Auctioneer Recovery
1847 Fund, the department board shall, subject to the provisions of
1848 this part, make the payment out of the Auctioneer Recovery Fund
1849 as provided in s. 468.395.
1850 Section 49. Section 468.398, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 74 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1851 to read:
1852 468.398 Suspension of judgment debtor's license; repayment
1853 by licensee; interest.—If the department board is required to
1854 make any payment from the Auctioneer Recovery Fund in settlement
1855 of a claim or toward the satisfaction of a judgment under this
1856 part, the department board shall suspend the judgment debtor's
1857 license. The licensee is not eligible to be licensed again as
1858 either an auctioneer or auction business until the licensee has
1859 repaid in full the amount paid from the Auctioneer Recovery
1860 Fund, with interest at the current applicable rate.
1861 Section 50. Subsection (1) of section 468.404, Florida
1862 Statutes, is amended to read:
1863 468.404 License; fees; renewals.—
1864 (1) The department shall establish biennial fees for
1865 initial licensing, renewal of license every 4 years, and
1866 reinstatement of license, none of which fees shall exceed $400.
1867 The department may establish a delinquency fee of no more than
1868 $50. The fees shall be adequate to proportionately fund the
1869 expenses of the department which are allocated to the regulation
1870 of talent agencies and shall be based on the department's
1871 estimate of the revenue required to administer this part.
1872 Section 51. Subsection (1) of section 468.407, Florida
1873 Statutes, is amended to read:
1874 468.407 License; content; posting.—
1875 (1) The talent agency license shall be valid for the
Page 75 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1876 biennial period in which issued and shall be in such form as may
1877 be determined by the department, but shall at least specify the
1878 name under which the applicant is to operate, the address of the
1879 place of business, the expiration date of the license, the full
1880 names and titles of the owner and the operator, and the number
1881 of the license.
1882 Section 52. Subsection (5) of section 468.431, Florida
1883 Statutes, is amended to read:
1884 468.431 Definitions.—As used in this part:
1885 (5) "Council" means the Regulatory Council of Community
1886 Association Managers.
1887 Section 53. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) and subsection
1888 (3) of section 468.433, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1889 468.433 Licensure by examination.—
1890 (2) The department shall examine each applicant who is at
1891 least 18 years of age, who has successfully completed all
1892 prelicensure education requirements, and who the department
1893 certifies is of good moral character.
1894 (d) The department council shall establish by rule the
1895 required amount of prelicensure education, which shall consist
1896 of not more than 24 hours of in-person instruction by a
1897 department-approved provider and which shall cover all areas of
1898 the examination specified in subsection (3). Such instruction
1899 shall be completed within 12 months before prior to the date of
1900 the examination. Prelicensure education providers shall be
Page 76 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1901 considered continuing education providers for purposes of
1902 establishing provider approval fees. A licensee shall not be
1903 required to comply with the continuing education requirements of
1904 s. 468.4337 prior to the first license renewal. The department
1905 shall, by rule, set standards for exceptions to the requirement
1906 of in-person instruction in cases of hardship or disability.
1907 (3) The department council shall approve an examination
1908 for licensure. The examination must demonstrate that the
1909 applicant has a fundamental knowledge of state and federal laws
1910 relating to the operation of all types of community associations
1911 and state laws relating to corporations and nonprofit
1912 corporations, proper preparation of community association
1913 budgets, proper procedures for noticing and conducting community
1914 association meetings, insurance matters relating to community
1915 associations, and management skills.
1916 Section 54. Subsection (1) of section 468.4336, Florida
1917 Statutes, is amended to read:
1918 468.4336 Renewal of license.—
1919 (1) The department shall renew a license upon receipt of
1920 the renewal application and fee and upon proof of compliance
1921 with the continuing education requirements of s. 468.4337.
1922 Section 55. Section 468.435, Florida Statutes, is amended
1923 to read:
1924 468.435 Fees; establishment; disposition.—
1925 (1) The department council shall establish fees for the
Page 77 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1926 described purposes and within the ranges specified in this
1927 section:
1928 (a) Application fee: not less than $25, or more than $50.
1929 (b) Examination fee: not less than $25, or more than $100.
1930 (c) Initial license fee: not less than $25, or more than
1931 $100.
1932 (d) Renewal of license fee: not less than $25, or more
1933 than $100.
1934 (e) Delinquent license fee: not less than $25, or more
1935 than $50.
1936 (f) Inactive license fee: not less than $10, or more than
1937 $25.
1938 (2) Until the department council establishes fees under
1939 subsection (1), the lower amount in each range shall apply.
1940 (3) Fees collected under this section shall be deposited
1941 to the credit of the Professional Regulation Trust Fund.
1942 (4) The department council shall establish fees that are
1943 adequate to fund the cost to implement the provisions of this
1944 part. Fees shall be based on the department estimates of the
1945 revenue required to implement this part and the provisions of
1946 law with respect to the regulation of community association
1947 managers.
1948 Section 56. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection
1949 (3) of section 468.436, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1950 468.436 Disciplinary proceedings.—
Page 78 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1951 (2) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
1952 disciplinary actions in subsection (4) may be taken:
1953 (b)1. Violation of this part.
1954 2. Violation of any lawful order or rule rendered or
1955 adopted by the department or the council.
1956 3. Being convicted of or pleading nolo contendere to a
1957 felony in any court in the United States.
1958 4. Obtaining a license or certification or any other
1959 order, ruling, or authorization by means of fraud,
1960 misrepresentation, or concealment of material facts.
1961 5. Committing acts of gross misconduct or gross negligence
1962 in connection with the profession.
1963 6. Contracting, on behalf of an association, with any
1964 entity in which the licensee has a financial interest that is
1965 not disclosed.
1966 7. Failing to disclose any conflict of interest as
1967 required by s. 468.4335.
1968 8. Violating chapter 718, chapter 719, or chapter 720
1969 during the course of performing community association management
1970 services pursuant to a contract with a community association as
1971 defined in s. 468.431(1).
1972 (3) The department council shall specify by rule the acts
1973 or omissions that constitute a violation of subsection (2).
1974 Section 57. Subsection (2) of section 468.520, Florida
1975 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 79 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
1976 468.520 Definitions.—As used in this part:
1977 (2) "Board" means the Board of Employee Leasing Companies.
1978 Section 58. Section 468.522, Florida Statutes, is amended
1979 to read:
1980 468.522 Rules of the department board.—The department may
1981 board has authority to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1)
1982 and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this part. Every
1983 licensee shall be governed and controlled by this part and the
1984 rules adopted by the department board.
1985 Section 59. Subsection (2) and paragraph (b) of subsection
1986 (4) of section 468.524, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1987 468.524 Application for license.—
1988 (2) The department board may require information and
1989 certifications necessary to determine that the applicant is of
1990 good moral character and meets other licensure requirements of
1991 this part.
1992 (4) An applicant or licensee is ineligible to reapply for
1993 a license for a period of 1 year following final agency action
1994 on the denial or revocation of a license applied for or issued
1995 under this part. This time restriction does not apply to
1996 administrative denials or revocations entered because:
1997 (b) The experience documented to the department board was
1998 insufficient at the time of the previous application;
1999 Section 60. Section 468.5245, Florida Statutes, is amended
2000 to read:
Page 80 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2001 468.5245 Change of ownership.—
2002 (1) A license or registration issued to any entity under
2003 this part may not be transferred or assigned. The department
2004 board shall adopt rules to provide for a licensee's or
2005 registrant's change of name or location.
2006 (2) A person or entity that seeks to purchase or acquire
2007 control of an employee leasing company or group licensed or
2008 registered under this part must first apply to the department
2009 board for a certificate of approval for the proposed change of
2010 ownership. However, prior approval is not required if, at the
2011 time the purchase or acquisition occurs, a controlling person of
2012 the employee leasing company or group maintains a controlling
2013 person license under this part. Notification must be provided to
2014 the department board within 30 days after the purchase or
2015 acquisition of such company in the manner prescribed by the
2016 department board.
2017 (3) Any application that is submitted to the department
2018 board under this section shall be deemed approved if the
2019 department board has not approved the application or rejected
2020 the application, and provided the applicant with the basis for a
2021 rejection, within 90 days after the receipt of the completed
2022 application.
2023 (4) The department board shall establish filing fees for a
2024 change-of-ownership application in accordance with s.
2025 468.524(1).
Page 81 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2026 Section 61. Subsection (2) and paragraphs (c) through (f)
2027 of subsection (3) of section 468.525, Florida Statutes, are
2028 amended to read:
2029 468.525 License requirements.—
2030 (2)(a) As used in this part, "good moral character" means
2031 a personal history of honesty, trustworthiness, fairness, a good
2032 reputation for fair dealings, and respect for the rights of
2033 others and for the laws of this state and nation. A thorough
2034 background investigation of the individual's good moral
2035 character shall be instituted by the department. Such
2036 investigation shall require:
2037 1. The submission of fingerprints, for processing through
2038 appropriate law enforcement agencies, by the applicant and the
2039 examination of police records by the department board.
2040 2. Such other investigation of the individual as the
2041 department board may deem necessary.
2042 (b) The department board may deny an application for
2043 licensure or renewal citing lack of good moral character.
2044 Conviction of a crime within the last 7 years may shall not
2045 automatically bar any applicant or licensee from obtaining a
2046 license or continuing as a licensee. The department board shall
2047 consider the type of crime committed, the crime's relevancy to
2048 the employee leasing industry, the length of time since the
2049 conviction, and any other factors deemed relevant by the
2050 department board.
Page 82 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2051 (3) Each employee leasing company licensed by the
2052 department shall have a registered agent for service of process
2053 in this state and at least one licensed controlling person. In
2054 addition, each licensed employee leasing company shall comply
2055 with the following requirements:
2056 (c) An applicant for initial or renewal license of an
2057 employee leasing company license or employee leasing company
2058 group shall have an accounting net worth or shall have
2059 guaranties, letters of credit, or other security acceptable to
2060 the department board in sufficient amounts to offset any
2061 deficiency. A guaranty will not be acceptable to satisfy this
2062 requirement unless the applicant submits sufficient evidence to
2063 satisfy the department board that the guarantor has adequate
2064 resources to satisfy the obligation of the guaranty.
2065 (d) Each employee leasing company shall maintain an
2066 accounting net worth and positive working capital, as determined
2067 in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, or
2068 shall have guaranties, letters of credit, or other security
2069 acceptable to the department board in sufficient amounts to
2070 offset any deficiency. A guaranty will not be acceptable to
2071 satisfy this requirement unless the licensee submits sufficient
2072 evidence, as defined by rule, that the guarantor has adequate
2073 resources to satisfy the obligation of the guaranty. In
2074 determining the amount of working capital, a licensee shall
2075 include adequate reserves for all taxes and insurance, including
Page 83 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2076 plans of self-insurance or partial self-insurance for claims
2077 incurred but not paid and for claims incurred but not reported.
2078 Compliance with the requirements of this paragraph is subject to
2079 verification by department or board audit.
2080 (e) Each employee leasing company or employee leasing
2081 company group shall submit annual financial statements audited
2082 by an independent certified public accountant, with the
2083 application and within 120 days after the end of each fiscal
2084 year, in a manner and time prescribed by the department board,
2085 provided, however, that any employee leasing company or employee
2086 leasing company group with gross Florida payroll of less than
2087 $2.5 million during any fiscal year may submit financial
2088 statements reviewed by an independent certified public
2089 accountant for that year.
2090 (f) The licensee shall notify the department or board in
2091 writing within 30 days after any change in the application or
2092 status of the license.
2093 Section 62. Subsections (3) and (5) of section 468.526,
2094 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2095 468.526 License required; fees.—
2096 (3) Each employee leasing company and employee leasing
2097 company group licensee shall pay to the department upon the
2098 initial issuance of a license and upon each renewal thereafter a
2099 license fee not to exceed $2,500 to be established by the
2100 department board. In addition to the license fee, the department
Page 84 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2101 board shall establish an annual assessment for each employee
2102 leasing company and each employee leasing company group
2103 sufficient to cover all costs for regulation of the profession
2104 pursuant to this chapter, chapter 455, and any other applicable
2105 provisions of law. The annual assessment shall:
2106 (a) Be due and payable upon initial licensure and
2107 subsequent renewals thereof and 1 year before the expiration of
2108 any licensure period; and
2109 (b) Be based on a fixed percentage, variable classes, or a
2110 combination of both, as determined by the department board, of
2111 gross Florida payroll for employees leased to clients by the
2112 applicant or licensee during the period beginning five quarters
2113 before and ending one quarter before each assessment. It is the
2114 intent of the Legislature that the greater weight of total fees
2115 for licensure and assessments should be on larger companies and
2116 groups.
2117 (5) Each controlling person licensee shall pay to the
2118 department upon the initial issuance of a license and upon each
2119 renewal thereafter a license fee to be established by the
2120 department board in an amount not to exceed $2,000.
2121 Section 63. Subsection (1) of section 468.527, Florida
2122 Statutes, is amended to read:
2123 468.527 Licensure and license renewal.—
2124 (1) The department shall license any applicant who the
2125 department board certifies is qualified to practice employee
Page 85 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2126 leasing as an employee leasing company, employee leasing company
2127 group, or controlling person.
2128 Section 64. Subsection (2) of section 468.5275, Florida
2129 Statutes, is amended to read:
2130 468.5275 Registration and exemption of de minimis
2131 operations.—
2132 (2) A registration is valid for 1 year. Each registrant
2133 shall pay to the department upon initial registration, and upon
2134 each renewal thereafter, a registration fee to be established by
2135 the department board in an amount not to exceed:
2136 (a) Two hundred and fifty dollars for an employee leasing
2137 company.
2138 (b) Five hundred dollars for an employee leasing company
2139 group.
2140 Section 65. Subsections (2), (4), and (5) of section
2141 468.529, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2142 468.529 Licensee's insurance; employment tax; benefit
2143 plans.—
2144 (2) An initial or renewal license may not be issued to any
2145 employee leasing company unless the employee leasing company
2146 first files with the department board evidence of workers'
2147 compensation coverage for all leased employees in this state.
2148 Each employee leasing company shall maintain and make available
2149 to its workers' compensation carrier the following information:
2150 (a) The correct name and federal identification number of
Page 86 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2151 each client company.
2152 (b) A listing of all covered employees provided to each
2153 client company, by classification code.
2154 (c) The total eligible wages by classification code and
2155 the premiums due to the carrier for the employees provided to
2156 each client company.
2157 (4) An initial or renewal license may not be issued to any
2158 employee leasing company unless the employee leasing company
2159 first provides evidence to the department board, as required by
2160 department board rule, that the employee leasing company has
2161 paid all of the employee leasing company's obligations for
2162 payroll, payroll-related taxes, workers' compensation insurance,
2163 and employee benefits. All disputed amounts must be disclosed in
2164 the application.
2165 (5) The provisions of this section are subject to
2166 verification by department or board audit.
2167 Section 66. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 468.530,
2168 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2169 468.530 License, contents; posting.—
2170 (3) A No license is not shall be valid for any person or
2171 entity who engages in the business under any name other than
2172 that specified in the license. A license issued under this part
2173 is shall not be assignable, and a no licensee may not conduct a
2174 business under a fictitious name without prior written
2175 authorization of the department board to do so. The department
Page 87 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2176 board may not authorize the use of a name which is so similar to
2177 that of a public officer or agency, or of that used by another
2178 licensee, that the public may be confused or misled thereby. A
2179 No licensee may not shall be permitted to conduct business under
2180 more than one name unless it has obtained a separate license. A
2181 licensee desiring to change its licensed name at any time except
2182 upon license renewal shall notify the department board and pay a
2183 fee not to exceed $50 for each authorized change of name.
2184 (4) Each employee leasing company or employee leasing
2185 company group licensed under this part shall be properly
2186 identified in all advertisements, which must include the license
2187 number, licensed business name, and other appropriate
2188 information in accordance with rules established by the
2189 department board.
2190 Section 67. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
2191 468.531, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2192 468.531 Prohibitions; penalties.—
2193 (1) No person or entity shall:
2194 (e) Knowingly give false or forged evidence to the
2195 department board or a member thereof; or
2196 Section 68. Section 468.532, Florida Statutes, is amended
2197 to read:
2198 468.532 Discipline.—
2199 (1) The following constitute grounds for which
2200 disciplinary action against a licensee may be taken by the
Page 88 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2201 department board:
2202 (a) Being convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea
2203 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, bribery,
2204 fraud, or willful misrepresentation in obtaining, attempting to
2205 obtain, or renewing a license.
2206 (b) Being convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea
2207 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in
2208 any jurisdiction which relates to the operation of an employee
2209 leasing business or the ability to engage in business as an
2210 employee leasing company.
2211 (c) Being convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea
2212 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, fraud,
2213 deceit, or misconduct in the classification of employees
2214 pursuant to chapter 440.
2215 (d) Being convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea
2216 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, fraud,
2217 deceit, or misconduct in the establishment or maintenance of
2218 self-insurance, be it health insurance or workers' compensation
2219 insurance.
2220 (e) Being convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea
2221 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, fraud,
2222 deceit, or misconduct in the operation of an employee leasing
2223 company.
2224 (f) Conducting business without an active license.
2225 (g) Failing to maintain workers' compensation insurance as
Page 89 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2226 required in s. 468.529.
2227 (h) Transferring or attempting to transfer a license
2228 issued pursuant to this part.
2229 (i) Violating any provision of this part or any lawful
2230 order or rule issued under the provisions of this part or
2231 chapter 455.
2232 (j) Failing to notify the department board, in writing, of
2233 any change of the primary business address or the addresses of
2234 any of the licensee's offices in the state.
2235 (k) Having been confined in any county jail,
2236 postadjudication, or being confined in any state or federal
2237 prison or mental institution, or when through mental disease or
2238 deterioration, the licensee can no longer safely be entrusted to
2239 deal with the public or in a confidential capacity.
2240 (l) Having been found guilty for a second time of any
2241 misconduct that warrants suspension or being found guilty of a
2242 course of conduct or practices which shows that the licensee is
2243 so incompetent, negligent, dishonest, or untruthful that the
2244 money, property, transactions, and rights of investors, or those
2245 with whom the licensee may sustain a confidential relationship,
2246 may not safely be entrusted to the licensee.
2247 (m) Failing to inform the department board in writing
2248 within 30 days after being convicted or found guilty of, or
2249 entering a plea of nolo contendere to, any felony, regardless of
2250 adjudication.
Page 90 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2251 (n) Failing to conform to any lawful order of the
2252 department board.
2253 (o) Being determined liable for civil fraud by a court in
2254 any jurisdiction.
2255 (p) Having adverse material final action taken by any
2256 state or federal regulatory agency for violations within the
2257 scope of control of the licensee.
2258 (q) Failing to inform the department board in writing
2259 within 30 days after any adverse material final action by a
2260 state or federal regulatory agency.
2261 (r) Failing to meet or maintain the requirements for
2262 licensure as an employee leasing company or controlling person.
2263 (s) Engaging as a controlling person any person who is not
2264 licensed as a controlling person by the department board.
2265 (t) Attempting to obtain, obtaining, or renewing a license
2266 to practice employee leasing by bribery, misrepresentation, or
2267 fraud.
2268 (2) When the department board finds any violation of
2269 subsection (1), it may do one or more of the following:
2270 (a) Deny an application for licensure.
2271 (b) Permanently revoke, suspend, restrict, or not renew a
2272 license.
2273 (c) Impose an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000 for
2274 every count or separate offense.
2275 (d) Issue a reprimand.
Page 91 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2276 (e) Place the licensee on probation for a period of time
2277 and subject to such conditions as the department board may
2278 specify.
2279 (f) Assess costs associated with investigation and
2280 prosecution.
2281 (3) Upon revocation or suspension of a license, the
2282 licensee must immediately return to the department the license
2283 that was revoked or suspended.
2284 (4) The department board shall specify the penalties for
2285 any violation of this part.
2286 Section 69. Subsection (1) of section 468.603, Florida
2287 Statutes, is amended to read:
2288 468.603 Definitions.—As used in this part:
2289 (1) "Board" means the Florida Building Code Administrators
2290 and Inspectors Board.
2291 Section 70. Section 468.606, Florida Statutes, is amended
2292 to read:
2293 468.606 Authority of the department board.—The department
2294 may board is authorized to:
2295 (1) Adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to
2296 implement the provisions of this part.
2297 (2) Certify individuals as being qualified under the
2298 provisions of this part to be building code administrators,
2299 plans examiners, and building code inspectors.
2300 Section 71. Section 468.607, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 92 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2301 to read:
2302 468.607 Certification of building code administration and
2303 inspection personnel.—The department board shall issue a
2304 certificate to any individual whom the department board
2305 determines to be qualified, within such class and level as
2306 provided in this part and with such limitations as the
2307 department board may place upon it. A No person may not be
2308 employed by a state agency or local governmental authority to
2309 perform the duties of a building code administrator, plans
2310 examiner, or building code inspector after October 1, 1993,
2311 without possessing the proper valid certificate issued in
2312 accordance with the provisions of this part. A Any person who
2313 acts as an inspector and plans examiner under s. 1013.37 while
2314 conducting activities authorized by certification under that
2315 section is certified to continue to conduct inspections for a
2316 local enforcement agency until the person's UBCI certification
2317 expires, after which time such person must possess the proper
2318 valid certificate issued in accordance with this part.
2319 Section 72. Section 468.613, Florida Statutes, is amended
2320 to read:
2321 468.613 Certification by endorsement.—The department board
2322 shall examine other certification or training programs, as
2323 applicable, upon submission to the department board for its
2324 consideration of an application for certification by
2325 endorsement. The department board shall waive its examination,
Page 93 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2326 qualification, education, or training requirements, to the
2327 extent that such examination, qualification, education, or
2328 training requirements of the applicant are determined by the
2329 department board to be comparable with those established by the
2330 department board. The department board shall waive its
2331 examination, qualification, education, or training requirements
2332 if an applicant for certification by endorsement is at least 18
2333 years of age; is of good moral character; has held a valid
2334 building administrator, inspector, plans examiner, or the
2335 equivalent, certification issued by another state or territory
2336 of the United States for at least 10 years before the date of
2337 application; and has successfully passed an applicable
2338 examination administered by the International Code Council. Such
2339 application must be made either when the license in another
2340 state or territory is active or within 2 years after such
2341 license was last active.
2342 Section 73. Subsections (5) and (7) of section 468.619,
2343 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2344 468.619 Building code enforcement officials' bill of
2345 rights.—
2346 (5) The enforcement official shall be considered an agent
2347 of the governmental entity employing him or her and as such
2348 shall be defended by that entity in any action brought by the
2349 department or the board, provided the enforcement official is
2350 working within the scope of his or her employment.
Page 94 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2351 (7) If any action taken against the enforcement official
2352 by the department or the board is found to be without merit by a
2353 court of competent jurisdiction, or if judgment in such an
2354 action is awarded to the enforcement official, the department or
2355 the board, or the assignee of the department or board, shall
2356 reimburse the enforcement official or his or her employer, as
2357 appropriate, for reasonable legal costs and reasonable attorney
2358 attorney's fees incurred. The amount awarded may shall not
2359 exceed the limit provided in s. 120.595.
2360 Section 74. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and
2361 subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 468.621, Florida
2362 Statutes, are amended to read:
2363 468.621 Disciplinary proceedings.—
2364 (1) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
2365 disciplinary actions in subsection (2) may be taken:
2366 (a) Violating or failing to comply with any provision of
2367 this part, or a valid rule or lawful order of the board or
2368 department pursuant thereto.
2369 (2) When the department board finds any person guilty of
2370 any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1), it may enter an
2371 order imposing one or more of the following penalties:
2372 (a) Denial of an application for certification.
2373 (b) Permanent revocation.
2374 (c) Suspension of a certificate.
2375 (d) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
Page 95 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2376 $5,000 for each separate offense. Such fine must be rationally
2377 related to the gravity of the violation.
2378 (e) Issuance of a reprimand.
2379 (f) Placement of the certificateholder on probation for a
2380 period of time and subject to such conditions as the department
2381 board may impose, including alteration of performance level.
2382 (g) Satisfactory completion of continuing education.
2383 (h) Issuance of a citation.
2384 (3) Where a certificate is suspended, placed on probation,
2385 or has conditions imposed, the department board shall reinstate
2386 the certificate of a disciplined building code administrator,
2387 plans examiner, or building code inspector upon proof the
2388 disciplined individual has complied with all terms and
2389 conditions set forth in the final order.
2390 (4) A No person may not be allowed to apply for
2391 certification under this part for a minimum of 5 years after the
2392 date of revocation of any certificate issued pursuant to this
2393 part. The department board may by rule establish additional
2394 criteria for certification following revocation.
2395 Section 75. Subsections (1) and (5) of section 468.627,
2396 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2397 468.627 Application; examination; renewal; fees.—
2398 (1) The department board shall establish by rule fees to
2399 be paid for application, examination, reexamination,
2400 certification and certification renewal, inactive status
Page 96 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2401 application, and reactivation of inactive certificates. The
2402 department board may establish by rule a late renewal penalty.
2403 The department board shall establish fees which are adequate,
2404 when combined with revenue generated by the provisions of s.
2405 468.631, to ensure the continued operation of this part. Fees
2406 shall be based on department estimates of the revenue required
2407 to implement this part.
2408 (5) The certificateholder shall provide proof, in a form
2409 established by board rule, that the certificateholder has
2410 completed at least 14 classroom hours of at least 50 minutes
2411 each of continuing education courses during each biennium since
2412 the issuance or renewal of the certificate, including the
2413 specialized or advanced coursework approved by the Florida
2414 Building Commission, as part of the building code training
2415 program established pursuant to s. 553.841, appropriate to the
2416 licensing category sought. A minimum of 3 of the required 14
2417 classroom hours must be on state law, rules, and ethics relating
2418 to professional standards of practice, duties, and
2419 responsibilities of the certificateholder. The board shall by
2420 rule establish criteria for approval of continuing education
2421 courses and providers, and may by rule establish criteria for
2422 accepting alternative nonclassroom continuing education on an
2423 hour-for-hour basis.
2424 Section 76. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
2425 468.629, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 97 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2426 468.629 Prohibitions; penalties.—
2427 (1) No person may:
2428 (d) Give false or forged evidence to the board or the
2429 department, or a member, an employee, or an officer thereof, for
2430 the purpose of obtaining a certificate.
2431 Section 77. Subsection (1) of section 468.631, Florida
2432 Statutes, is amended to read:
2433 468.631 Building Code Administrators and Inspectors Fund.—
2434 (1) This part shall be funded through a surcharge, to be
2435 assessed pursuant to s. 125.56(4) or s. 166.201 at the rate of
2436 1.5 percent of all permit fees associated with enforcement of
2437 the Florida Building Code as defined by the uniform account
2438 criteria and specifically the uniform account code for building
2439 permits adopted for local government financial reporting
2440 pursuant to s. 218.32. The minimum amount collected on any
2441 permit issued shall be $2. The unit of government responsible
2442 for collecting permit fees pursuant to s. 125.56 or s. 166.201
2443 shall collect such surcharge and shall remit the funds to the
2444 department on a quarterly calendar basis beginning not later
2445 than December 31, 2010, for the preceding quarter, and
2446 continuing each third month thereafter; and such unit of
2447 government shall retain 10 percent of the surcharge collected to
2448 fund the participation of building departments in the national
2449 and state building code adoption processes and to provide
2450 education related to enforcement of the Florida Building Code.
Page 98 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2451 There is created within the Professional Regulation Trust Fund a
2452 separate account to be known as the Building Code Administrators
2453 and Inspectors Fund, which shall deposit and disburse funds as
2454 necessary for the implementation of this part. The proceeds from
2455 this surcharge shall be allocated equally to fund the Florida
2456 Homeowners' Construction Recovery Fund established by s. 489.140
2457 and the functions of the Building Code Administrators and
2458 Inspectors Board. The department may transfer excess cash to the
2459 Florida Homeowners' Construction Recovery Fund that it
2460 determines is not required to fund the implementation of this
2461 part board from the board's account within the Professional
2462 Regulation Trust Fund. However, the department may not transfer
2463 excess cash that would exceed the amount appropriated in the
2464 General Appropriations Act, and any amount approved by the
2465 Legislative Budget Commission pursuant to s. 216.181, to be used
2466 for the payment of claims from the Florida Homeowners'
2467 Construction Recovery Fund.
2468 Section 78. Subsections (4) and (7) of section 468.8312,
2469 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2470 468.8312 Fees.—
2471 (4) The biennial renewal fee shall not exceed $200.
2472 (7) The fee for applications from providers of continuing
2473 education may not exceed $500.
2474 Section 79. Section 468.8315, Florida Statutes, is amended
2475 to read:
Page 99 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2476 468.8315 Renewal of license.—
2477 (1) The department shall renew a license upon receipt of
2478 the renewal application and upon certification by the department
2479 that the licensee has satisfactorily completed the continuing
2480 education requirements of s. 468.8316.
2481 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
2482 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses every 4 years.
2483 Section 80. Subsection (5) of section 468.8412, Florida
2484 Statutes, is amended to read:
2485 468.8412 Fees.—
2486 (5) The fee for a biennial license renewal shall not
2487 exceed $400.
2488 Section 81. Section 468.8415, Florida Statutes, is amended
2489 to read:
2490 468.8415 Renewal of license.—
2491 (1) The department shall renew a license upon receipt of
2492 the renewal application and fee and upon certification by the
2493 department that the licensee has satisfactorily completed the
2494 continuing education requirements of s. 468.8416.
2495 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
2496 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses every 4 years.
2497 Section 82. Subsection (2) of section 468.8417, Florida
2498 Statutes, is amended to read:
2499 468.8417 Inactive license.—
2500 (2) A license that becomes inactive may be reactivated
Page 100 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2501 upon application to the department. The department may prescribe
2502 by rule continuing education requirements as a condition of
2503 reactivating a license. The rules may not require more than one
2504 renewal cycle of continuing education to reactivate a license.
2505 Section 83. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
2506 (d) of subsection (2) of section 468.8419, Florida Statutes, are
2507 amended to read:
2508 468.8419 Prohibitions; penalties.—
2509 (1) A person may not:
2510 (d) Perform or offer to perform any mold remediation to a
2511 structure on which the mold assessor or the mold assessor's
2512 company provided a mold assessment within the last 12 months.
2513 This paragraph does not apply to a certified contractor who is
2514 classified in s. 489.105(2) s. 489.105(3) as a Division I
2515 contractor. However, the department may adopt rules requiring
2516 that, if such contractor performs the mold assessment and offers
2517 to perform the mold remediation, the contract for mold
2518 remediation provided to the homeowner discloses that he or she
2519 has the right to request competitive bids.
2520 (2) A mold remediator, a company that employs a mold
2521 remediator, or a company that is controlled by a company that
2522 also has a financial interest in a company employing a mold
2523 remediator may not:
2524 (d) Perform or offer to perform any mold assessment to a
2525 structure on which the mold remediator or the mold remediator's
Page 101 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2526 company provided a mold remediation within the last 12 months.
2527 This paragraph does not apply to a certified contractor who is
2528 classified in s. 489.105(2) s. 489.105(3) as a Division I
2529 contractor. However, the department may adopt rules requiring
2530 that, if such contractor performs the mold remediation and
2531 offers to perform the mold assessment, the contract for mold
2532 assessment provided to the homeowner discloses that he or she
2533 has the right to request competitive bids.
2534 Section 84. Subsection (4) of section 469.004, Florida
2535 Statutes, is amended to read:
2536 469.004 License; asbestos consultant; asbestos
2537 contractor.—
2538 (4) A license issued under this chapter must be renewed
2539 every 4 2 years. Before an asbestos contractor's license may be
2540 renewed, the licensee must complete a 1-day course of continuing
2541 education during each of the preceding 2 years. Before an
2542 asbestos consultant's license may be renewed, the licensee must
2543 complete a 2-day course of continuing education during each of
2544 the preceding 2 years.
2545 Section 85. Subsection (5) of section 469.012, Florida
2546 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (4), and subsection (1)
2547 and present subsection (4) of that section are amended to read:
2548 469.012 Course requirements for onsite supervisors and
2549 asbestos abatement workers.—
2550 (1) Each asbestos contractor's onsite supervisor must
Page 102 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2551 complete an asbestos contractor/supervisor course of not less
2552 than 5 days before prior to engaging in onsite supervision. Such
2553 training shall cover the nature of the health risks, the medical
2554 effects of exposure, federal and state asbestos laws and
2555 regulations, worker protection, and work area protection. Each
2556 onsite supervisor must also complete a continuing education
2557 course of not less than 1 day in length each year.
2558 (4) All asbestos abatement workers, including onsite
2559 supervisors, must complete, as a condition of renewal of
2560 accreditation, such courses of continuing education each year as
2561 are approved and required by the department.
2562 Section 86. Subsection (1) of section 469.013, Florida
2563 Statutes, is amended to read:
2564 469.013 Course requirements for asbestos surveyors,
2565 management planners, project monitors, and project designers.—
2566 (1) All asbestos surveyors, management planners, and
2567 project monitors must comply with the requirements under set
2568 forth in this section before prior to commencing such activities
2569 and must also complete the continuing education necessary to
2570 maintain accreditation each year.
2571 (a) Management planners must complete all requirements of
2572 s. 469.005(2)(b) and (d).
2573 (b) Asbestos surveyors must complete all requirements of
2574 s. 469.005(2)(a).
2575 (c) Project monitors must complete all requirements of s.
Page 103 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2576 469.005(3)(a) and must also complete an asbestos sampling course
2577 which is equivalent to NIOSH Course 582.
2578 (d) Project designers must complete all requirements of s.
2579 469.005(2)(d).
2580 Section 87. Subsection (5) of section 471.011, Florida
2581 Statutes, is amended to read:
2582 471.011 Fees.—
2583 (5) The biennial renewal fee shall not exceed $125.
2584 Section 88. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 471.017,
2585 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2586 471.017 Renewal of license.—
2587 (2) The board shall adopt rules establishing a procedure
2588 for the biennial renewal of licenses every 4 years.
2589 (3)(a) The board shall require a demonstration of
2590 continuing professional competency of engineers as a condition
2591 of license renewal or relicensure. Every licensee must complete
2592 9 continuing education hours for each year of the license
2593 renewal period, totaling 18 continuing education hours for the
2594 license renewal period. For each renewal period for such
2595 continuing education:
2596 1. One hour must relate to this chapter and the rules
2597 adopted under this chapter.
2598 2. One hour must relate to professional ethics.
2599 3. Four hours must relate to the licensee's area of
2600 practice.
Page 104 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2601 4. The remaining hours may relate to any topic pertinent
2602 to the practice of engineering.
2603
2604 Continuing education hours may be earned by presenting or
2605 attending seminars, in-house or nonclassroom courses, workshops,
2606 or professional or technical presentations made at meetings,
2607 webinars, conventions, or conferences, including those presented
2608 by vendors with specific knowledge related to the licensee's
2609 area of practice. Up to 4 hours may be earned by serving as an
2610 officer or actively participating on a committee of a board-
2611 recognized professional or technical engineering society. The 2
2612 required continuing education hours relating to this chapter,
2613 the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, and ethics may be
2614 earned by serving as a member of the Legislature or as an
2615 elected state or local official. The hours required pursuant to
2616 s. 471.0195 may apply to any requirements of this section except
2617 for those required under subparagraph 1.
2618 (b) The board shall adopt rules that are substantially
2619 consistent with the most recent published version of the
2620 Continuing Professional Competency Guidelines of the National
2621 Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying, and shall
2622 allow nonclassroom hours to be credited. The board may, by rule,
2623 exempt from continuing professional competency requirements
2624 retired professional engineers who no longer sign and seal
2625 engineering documents and licensees in unique circumstances that
Page 105 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2626 severely limit opportunities to obtain the required continuing
2627 education hours.
2628 Section 89. Section 471.019, Florida Statutes, is amended
2629 to read:
2630 471.019 Reactivation.—The board shall establish by rule a
2631 reinstatement process for void licenses. The rule shall
2632 prescribe appropriate continuing education requirements for
2633 reactivating a license. The continuing education requirements
2634 for reactivating a license for a licensed engineer may not
2635 exceed the continuing education requirements prescribed pursuant
2636 to s. 471.017 for each year the license was inactive.
2637 Section 90. Section 471.045, Florida Statutes, is amended
2638 to read:
2639 471.045 Professional engineers performing building code
2640 inspector duties.—Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
2641 person who is currently licensed under this chapter to practice
2642 as a professional engineer may provide building code inspection
2643 services described in s. 468.603(4) and (7) s. 468.603(5) and
2644 (8) to a local government or state agency upon its request,
2645 without being certified by the Florida Building Code
2646 Administrators and Inspectors licensing program Board under part
2647 XII of chapter 468. When performing these building code
2648 inspection services, the professional engineer is subject to the
2649 disciplinary guidelines of this chapter and s. 468.621(1)(c)-
2650 (h). Any complaint processing, investigation, and discipline
Page 106 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2651 that arise out of a professional engineer's performing building
2652 code inspection services shall be conducted by the Board of
2653 Professional Engineers rather than the Florida Building Code
2654 Administrators and Inspectors licensing program Board. A
2655 professional engineer may not perform plans review as an
2656 employee of a local government upon any job that the
2657 professional engineer or the professional engineer's company
2658 designed.
2659 Section 91. Subsection (4) of section 472.003, Florida
2660 Statutes, is amended to read:
2661 472.003 Persons not affected by ss. 472.001-472.037.—
2662 Sections 472.001-472.037 do not apply to:
2663 (4) Persons employed by county property appraisers, as
2664 defined at s. 192.001(3), and persons employed by the Department
2665 of Revenue, to prepare maps for property appraisal purposes
2666 only, but only to the extent that they perform mapping services
2667 which do not include any surveying activities as described in s.
2668 472.005(3)(a) and (b) s. 472.005(4)(a) and (b).
2669 Section 92. Subsection (1) of section 472.005, Florida
2670 Statutes, is amended to read:
2671 472.005 Definitions.—As used in ss. 472.001-472.037:
2672 (1) "Board" means the Board of Professional Surveyors and
2673 Mappers.
2674 Section 93. Subsection (1) of section 472.006, Florida
2675 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 107 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2676 472.006 Department; powers and duties.—The department
2677 shall:
2678 (1) Adopt rules establishing a procedure for the biennial
2679 renewal of licenses every 4 years. However, the department may
2680 issue up to a 4-year license to selected licensees
2681 notwithstanding any other law to the contrary. Fees for such
2682 renewal may not exceed the fee caps for individual professions
2683 on an annualized basis as authorized by law.
2684 Section 94. Subsection (5) of section 472.011, Florida
2685 Statutes, is amended to read:
2686 472.011 Fees.—
2687 (5) The biennial renewal fee shall not exceed $500.
2688 Section 95. Subsections (7) through (10) of section
2689 472.0202, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2690 472.0202 Inactive and delinquent status.—
2691 (7) The board, by rule, shall impose an additional
2692 delinquency fee, not to exceed the biennial renewal fee for an
2693 active status license, on a delinquent status licensee when such
2694 licensee applies for active or inactive status.
2695 (8) The board, by rule, shall impose an additional fee,
2696 not to exceed the biennial renewal fee for an active status
2697 license, for processing a licensee's request to change licensure
2698 status at any time other than at the beginning of a licensure
2699 cycle.
2700 (9) The board, by rule, may impose reasonable conditions,
Page 108 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2701 excluding full reexamination but including part of a national
2702 examination or a special purpose examination to assess current
2703 competency, necessary to ensure that a licensee who has been on
2704 inactive status for more than one two consecutive biennial
2705 licensure cycle cycles and who applies for active status can
2706 practice with the care and skill sufficient to protect the
2707 health, safety, and welfare of the public. Reactivation
2708 requirements may differ depending on the length of time
2709 licensees are inactive. The costs to meet reactivation
2710 requirements shall be borne by licensees requesting
2711 reactivation.
2712 (10) Before reactivation, an inactive or delinquent
2713 licensee shall meet the same continuing education requirements,
2714 if any, imposed on an active status licensee for all biennial
2715 licensure periods in which the licensee was inactive or
2716 delinquent.
2717 Section 96. Subsection (2) of section 472.0203, Florida
2718 Statutes, is amended to read:
2719 472.0203 Renewal and cancellation notices.—
2720 (2) Each licensure renewal notification and each notice of
2721 pending cancellation of licensure must state conspicuously that
2722 a licensee who remains on inactive status for more than one two
2723 consecutive biennial licensure cycle cycles and who wishes to
2724 reactivate the license may be required to demonstrate the
2725 competency to resume active practice by sitting for a special
Page 109 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2726 purpose examination or by completing other reactivation
2727 requirements, as defined by rule of the board.
2728 Section 97. Section 473.302, Florida Statutes, is amended
2729 to read:
2730 473.302 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
2731 (1) "Board" means the Board of Accountancy.
2732 (1)(2) "Department" means the Department of Business and
2733 Professional Regulation.
2734 (2)(3) "Division" means the Division of Certified Public
2735 Accounting.
2736 (3)(4) "Certified public accountant" means an individual
2737 who holds a license to practice public accounting in this state
2738 or an individual who is practicing public accounting in this
2739 state pursuant to the practice privilege granted in s. 473.3141.
2740 The term "Florida certified public accountant" means an
2741 individual holding a license under the authority of this
2742 chapter.
2743 (4)(5) "Firm" means any legal entity that is engaged in
2744 the practice of public accounting.
2745 (5)(6) "Home office" means the principal headquarters of
2746 an entity. An entity may have only one principal headquarters.
2747 (6)(7) "Licensed firm" or "public accounting firm" means a
2748 sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability
2749 company, firm, or any other legal entity licensed under s.
2750 473.3101.
Page 110 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2751 (7)(8) "Practice of," "practicing public accountancy," or
2752 "public accounting" means:
2753 (a) Offering to perform or performing for the public one
2754 or more types of services involving the expression of an opinion
2755 on financial statements, the attestation as an expert in
2756 accountancy to the reliability or fairness of presentation of
2757 financial information, the utilization of any form of opinion or
2758 financial statements that provide a level of assurance, the
2759 utilization of any form of disclaimer of opinion which conveys
2760 an assurance of reliability as to matters not specifically
2761 disclaimed, or the expression of an opinion on the reliability
2762 of an assertion by one party for the use by a third party;
2763 (b) Offering to perform or performing for the public one
2764 or more types of services involving the use of accounting
2765 skills, or one or more types of tax, management advisory, or
2766 consulting services, by any person who is a certified public
2767 accountant who holds an active license, issued pursuant to this
2768 chapter, or who is authorized to practice public accounting
2769 pursuant to the practice privileges granted in s. 473.3141,
2770 including the performance of such services by a certified public
2771 accountant in the employ of a person or firm;
2772 (c) Offering to perform or performing for the public one
2773 or more types of service involving the preparation of financial
2774 statements not included within paragraph (a), by a certified
2775 public accountant who holds an active license, issued pursuant
Page 111 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2776 to this chapter, or who is authorized to practice public
2777 accounting pursuant to the practice privileges granted in s.
2778 473.3141; by a firm of certified public accountants; or by a
2779 firm in which a certified public accountant has an ownership
2780 interest, including the performance of such services in the
2781 employ of another person. The department board shall adopt rules
2782 establishing standards of practice for such reports and
2783 financial statements; provided, however, that nothing in this
2784 paragraph shall be construed to permit the department board to
2785 adopt rules that have the result of prohibiting Florida
2786 certified public accountants employed by unlicensed firms from
2787 preparing financial statements as authorized by this paragraph;
2788 or
2789 (d) Offering to perform or performing for the public one
2790 or more types of services involving any attestation engagements
2791 in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Attestation
2792 Engagements.
2793 (8)(9) "Uniform Accountancy Act" means the Uniform
2794 Accountancy Act, Eighth Edition, dated January 2018 and
2795 published by the American Institute of Certified Public
2796 Accountants and the National Association of State Boards of
2797 Accountancy.
2798
2799 However, these terms may shall not include services provided by
2800 the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or the
Page 112 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2801 Florida Institute of Certified Public Accountants, or any full
2802 service association of certified public accounting firms whose
2803 plans of administration have been approved by the department
2804 board, to their members or services performed by these entities
2805 in reviewing the services provided to the public by members of
2806 these entities.
2807 Section 98. Section 473.3035, Florida Statutes, is amended
2808 to read:
2809 473.3035 Division of Certified Public Accounting.—
2810 (1) All services concerning this chapter, including, but
2811 not limited to, recordkeeping services, examination services,
2812 legal services, and investigative services, and those services
2813 in chapter 455 necessary to perform the duties of this chapter
2814 shall be provided by the Division of Certified Public
2815 Accounting. The department board may, by majority vote, delegate
2816 a duty or duties to the appropriate division within the
2817 department. The department board may, by majority vote, rescind
2818 any such delegation of duties at any time.
2819 (2) The Division of Certified Public Accounting shall be
2820 funded by fees and assessments of the department board, and
2821 funds collected by the department board shall be used only to
2822 fund public accounting regulation. Funding for the Division of
2823 Certified Public Accounting shall be governed by ss. 215.37 and
2824 455.219.
2825 Section 99. Section 473.304, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 113 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2826 to read:
2827 473.304 Rules of department board; powers and duties;
2828 legal services.—
2829 (1) The department board shall adopt rules pursuant to ss.
2830 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this act.
2831 Every certified public accountant and firm shall be governed and
2832 controlled by this act and the rules adopted by the department
2833 board.
2834 (2) Subject to the prior approval of the Attorney General,
2835 the department board may retain independent legal counsel to
2836 provide legal advice to the department board on a specific
2837 matter.
2838 (3) An attorney employed or used by the department board
2839 may not both prosecute a matter and provide legal services to
2840 the department board with respect to the same matter.
2841 Section 100. Section 473.305, Florida Statutes, is amended
2842 to read:
2843 473.305 Fees.—The department board, by rule, may establish
2844 fees to be paid for applications, examination, reexamination,
2845 licensing and renewal, reinstatement, and recordmaking and
2846 recordkeeping. The fee for the examination shall be established
2847 at an amount that covers the costs for the procurement or
2848 development, administration, grading, and review of the
2849 examination. The fee for the examination is refundable if the
2850 applicant is found to be ineligible to sit for the examination.
Page 114 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2851 The fee for initial application is nonrefundable, and the
2852 combined fees for application and examination may not exceed
2853 $250 plus the actual per applicant cost to the department for
2854 purchase of the examination from the American Institute of
2855 Certified Public Accountants or a similar national organization.
2856 The biennial renewal fee may not exceed $250. The department
2857 board may also establish, by rule, a reactivation fee, and a
2858 delinquency fee not to exceed $50 for continuing professional
2859 education reporting forms. The department board shall establish
2860 fees which are adequate to ensure the continued operation of the
2861 department board and to fund the proportionate expenses incurred
2862 by the department which are allocated to the regulation of
2863 public accountants. Fees shall be based on department estimates
2864 of the revenue required to implement this chapter and the
2865 provisions of law with respect to the regulation of certified
2866 public accountants.
2867 Section 101. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) and
2868 subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section 473.306, Florida
2869 Statutes, are amended to read:
2870 473.306 Examinations.—
2871 (3) An applicant is entitled to take the licensure
2872 examination to practice in this state as a certified public
2873 accountant if:
2874 (b) The applicant shows that she or he has good moral
2875 character. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "good moral
Page 115 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2876 character" has the same meaning as provided in s. 473.308(6)(a)
2877 s. 473.308(7)(a). The department board may refuse to allow an
2878 applicant to take the licensure examination for failure to
2879 satisfy this requirement if:
2880 1. The department board finds a reasonable relationship
2881 between the lack of good moral character of the applicant and
2882 the professional responsibilities of a certified public
2883 accountant; and
2884 2. The finding by the department board of lack of good
2885 moral character is supported by competent substantial evidence.
2886
2887 If an applicant is found pursuant to this paragraph to be
2888 unqualified to take the licensure examination because of a lack
2889 of good moral character, the department board shall furnish to
2890 the applicant a statement containing the findings of the
2891 department board, a complete record of the evidence upon which
2892 the determination was based, and a notice of the rights of the
2893 applicant to a rehearing and appeal.
2894 (4) The department board shall have the authority to
2895 establish the standards for determining and shall determine:
2896 (a) What constitutes a passing grade for each subject or
2897 part of the licensure examination;
2898 (b) Which educational institutions, in addition to the
2899 universities in the State University System of Florida, shall be
2900 deemed to be accredited colleges or universities;
Page 116 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2901 (c) What courses and number of hours constitute a major in
2902 accounting; and
2903 (d) What courses and number of hours constitute additional
2904 accounting courses acceptable under s. 473.308(4).
2905 (5) The department board may adopt an alternative
2906 licensure examination for persons who have been licensed to
2907 practice public accountancy or its equivalent in a foreign
2908 country so long as the International Qualifications Appraisal
2909 Board of the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy
2910 has ratified an agreement with that country for reciprocal
2911 licensure.
2912 (6) For the purposes of maintaining the proper educational
2913 qualifications for licensure under this chapter, the department
2914 board may appoint an Educational Advisory Committee, which shall
2915 be composed of one member of the department board, two persons
2916 in public practice who are licensed under this chapter, and four
2917 academicians on faculties of universities in this state.
2918 Section 102. Subsections (1), (2), and (3) of section
2919 473.309, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2920 473.309 Practice requirements for partnerships,
2921 corporations, and limited liability companies; business entities
2922 practicing public accounting.—
2923 (1) A partnership may not engage in the practice of public
2924 accounting, as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) s. 473.302(8)(a), or
2925 meet the requirements of s. 473.3101(1)(b), unless:
Page 117 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2926 (a) It is a form of partnership recognized by Florida law.
2927 (b) Partners owning at least 51 percent of the financial
2928 interest and voting rights of the partnership are certified
2929 public accountants in some state. However, each partner who is a
2930 certified public accountant in another state and is domiciled in
2931 this state must be a certified public accountant of this state
2932 and hold an active license.
2933 (c) At least one general partner is a certified public
2934 accountant of this state and holds an active license or, in the
2935 case of a firm that must have a license pursuant to s.
2936 473.3101(1)(c), at least one general partner is a certified
2937 public accountant in some state and meets the requirements of s.
2938 473.3141(1) s. 473.3141(1)(a) or (b).
2939 (d) All partners who are not certified public accountants
2940 in any state are engaged in the business of the partnership as
2941 their principal occupation.
2942 (e) It is in compliance with rules adopted by the
2943 department board pertaining to minimum capitalization, letters
2944 of credit, and adequate public liability insurance.
2945 (2) A corporation may not engage in the practice of public
2946 accounting, as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) s. 473.302(8)(a), or
2947 meet the requirements of s. 473.3101(1)(b), unless:
2948 (a) It is a corporation duly organized in this or some
2949 other state.
2950 (b) Shareholders of the corporation owning at least 51
Page 118 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2951 percent of the financial interest and voting rights of the
2952 corporation are certified public accountants in some state and
2953 are principally engaged in the business of the corporation.
2954 However, each shareholder who is a certified public accountant
2955 in another state and is domiciled in this state must be a
2956 certified public accountant of this state and hold an active
2957 license.
2958 (c) The principal officer of the corporation is a
2959 certified public accountant in some state.
2960 (d) At least one shareholder of the corporation is a
2961 certified public accountant and holds an active license in this
2962 state or, in the case of a firm that must have a license
2963 pursuant to s. 473.3101(1)(c), at least one shareholder is a
2964 certified public accountant in some state and meets the
2965 requirements of s. 473.3141(1) s. 473.3141(1)(a) or (b).
2966 (e) All shareholders who are not certified public
2967 accountants in any state are engaged in the business of the
2968 corporation as their principal occupation.
2969 (f) It is in compliance with rules adopted by the
2970 department board pertaining to minimum capitalization, letters
2971 of credit, and adequate public liability insurance.
2972 (3) A limited liability company may not engage in the
2973 practice of public accounting, as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) s.
2974 473.302(8)(a), or meet the requirements of s. 473.3101(1)(b),
2975 unless:
Page 119 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
2976 (a) It is a limited liability company duly organized in
2977 this or some other state.
2978 (b) Members of the limited liability company owning at
2979 least 51 percent of the financial interest and voting rights of
2980 the company are certified public accountants in some state.
2981 However, each member who is a certified public accountant in
2982 some state and is domiciled in this state must be a certified
2983 public accountant of this state and hold an active license.
2984 (c) At least one member of the limited liability company
2985 is a certified public accountant and holds an active license in
2986 this state or, in the case of a firm that must have a license
2987 pursuant to s. 473.3101(1)(c), at least one member is a
2988 certified public accountant in some state and meets the
2989 requirements of s. 473.3141(1) s. 473.3141(1)(a) or (b).
2990 (d) All members who are not certified public accountants
2991 in any state are engaged in the business of the company as their
2992 principal occupation.
2993 (e) It is in compliance with rules adopted by the
2994 department board pertaining to minimum capitalization, letters
2995 of credit, and adequate public liability insurance.
2996 (f) It is currently licensed as required by s. 473.3101.
2997 Section 103. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 473.3101,
2998 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2999 473.3101 Licensure of firms or public accounting firms.—
3000 (1) The following must hold a license issued under this
Page 120 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3001 section:
3002 (a) Any firm with an office in this state which performs
3003 services as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) s. 473.302(8)(a);
3004 (b) Any firm with an office in this state which uses the
3005 title "CPA," "CPA firm," or any other title, designation, words,
3006 letters, abbreviations, or device tending to indicate that it is
3007 a CPA firm. The department board shall define by rule what
3008 constitutes a CPA firm; or
3009 (c)1. Any firm that does not have an office in this state
3010 but performs the services described in s. 473.3141(4) for a
3011 client having its home office in this state, unless it:
3012 a. Complies with the qualifications described in s.
3013 473.309.
3014 b. Is enrolled in a peer review program pursuant to s.
3015 473.3125(4).
3016 c. Performs services through an individual with practice
3017 privileges under s. 473.3141.
3018 d. Lawfully performs services in a state where an
3019 individual with practice privileges granted under s. 473.3141
3020 has his or her principal place of business.
3021 2. The department board shall define by rule what
3022 constitutes an office.
3023 (4) The department board shall determine whether the firm
3024 or public accounting firm meets the requirements for practice
3025 and, pending that determination, may certify to the department
Page 121 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3026 the firm or public accounting firm for provisional licensure.
3027 Section 104. Subsection (2) of section 473.311, Florida
3028 Statutes, is amended to read:
3029 473.311 Renewal of license.—
3030 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
3031 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses issued pursuant
3032 to this section every 4 years.
3033 Section 105. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and
3034 subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 473.3125, Florida
3035 Statutes, are amended to read:
3036 473.3125 Peer review.—
3037 (1) As used in this section, the term:
3038 (a) "Licensee" means a licensed firm or public accounting
3039 firm as defined in s. 473.302 s. 473.302(7) and engaged in the
3040 practice of public accounting as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) s.
3041 473.302(8)(a) that is required to be licensed under s. 473.3101.
3042 (2) The department board shall adopt rules establishing
3043 minimum standards for peer review programs, including, but not
3044 limited to, standards for administering, performing, and
3045 reporting peer reviews. The department board shall also adopt
3046 rules establishing minimum criteria for the department's board's
3047 approval of one or more organizations that facilitate and
3048 administer peer review programs.
3049 (3) For the purposes of maintaining oversight of the
3050 license renewal requirements of s. 473.311(2), the department
Page 122 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3051 board may establish a peer review oversight committee, which
3052 shall be composed of at least three, but no more than five,
3053 members who are licensed under this chapter and whose firms are
3054 subject to s. 473.311(2) and have received a review rating of
3055 "pass" on the most recent peer review.
3056 (4) Effective January 1, 2015, a licensed firm or public
3057 accounting firm as defined in s. 473.302 s. 473.302(7) and
3058 licensed under s. 473.3101 and engaged in the practice of public
3059 accounting as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) s. 473.302(8)(a),
3060 except for the performance of compilations and reviews as those
3061 terms are defined by the department board, must be enrolled in a
3062 peer review program.
3063 Section 106. Section 473.313, Florida Statutes, is amended
3064 to read:
3065 473.313 Inactive status; retired status.—
3066 (1) A Florida certified public accountant may request that
3067 her or his license be placed in an inactive status by making
3068 application to the department. The department board may
3069 prescribe by rule fees for placing a license on inactive status,
3070 renewal of inactive status, and reactivation of an inactive
3071 license.
3072 (a) A license that has become inactive under this
3073 subsection or for failure to complete the requirements in s.
3074 473.312 may be reactivated under s. 473.311 upon application to
3075 the department. The department board may prescribe by rule
Page 123 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3076 continuing education requirements as a condition of reactivating
3077 a license. The maximum continuing education requirements for
3078 reactivating a license are 120 hours, including at least 30
3079 hours in accounting-related and auditing-related subjects, not
3080 more than 30 hours in behavioral subjects, and a minimum of 8
3081 hours in ethics subjects approved by the department board, for
3082 the reactivation of a license that is inactive or delinquent.
3083 (b) A license that is delinquent for failure to report
3084 completion of the requirements in s. 473.312 may be reactivated
3085 under s. 473.311 upon application to the department.
3086 Reactivation requires the payment of an application fee as
3087 determined by the department board and certification by the
3088 Florida certified public accountant that the applicant
3089 satisfactorily completed the continuing education requirements
3090 set forth under s. 473.311. If the license is delinquent on
3091 January 1 because of failure to report completed continuing
3092 education requirements, the applicant must submit a complete
3093 application to the department board by March 15 immediately
3094 after the delinquent period.
3095 (c) Any Florida certified public accountant holding an
3096 inactive license may be permitted to reactivate such license in
3097 a conditional manner. The conditions of reactivation shall
3098 require the payment of fees and the completion of required
3099 continuing education.
3100 (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 455.271, the
Page 124 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3101 department board may, at its discretion, reinstate the license
3102 of an individual whose license has become null and void if the
3103 individual has made a good faith effort to comply with this
3104 section but has failed to comply because of illness or unusual
3105 hardship. The individual shall apply to the department board for
3106 reinstatement in a manner prescribed by rules of the department
3107 board and shall pay an application fee in an amount determined
3108 by rule of the department board. The department board shall
3109 require that the individual meet all continuing education
3110 requirements as provided in paragraph (a), pay appropriate
3111 licensing fees, and otherwise be eligible for renewal of
3112 licensure under this chapter.
3113 (2) A Florida certified public accountant who is at least
3114 65 years of age, currently holds an active or inactive license
3115 in good standing under this chapter, and is not the subject of
3116 any sanction or disciplinary action may request that her or his
3117 license be placed on retired status by making application to the
3118 department. The department board may prescribe by rule the
3119 application for placing a license on retired status, which must
3120 state that the applicant has no association with accounting or
3121 any of the services described in s. 473.302 s. 473.302(8). If a
3122 licensee who has been granted retired status reenters the
3123 workforce in a position that has an association with accounting
3124 or any of the services described in s. 473.302 s. 473.302(8),
3125 the licensee automatically loses her or his retired status.
Page 125 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3126 (a) A retired licensee may, without losing her or his
3127 retired status, serve without compensation on a board of
3128 directors or board of trustees, provide volunteer tax
3129 preparation services, participate in a government-sponsored
3130 business mentoring program such as the Internal Revenue
3131 Service's Volunteer Income Tax Assistance program or the Small
3132 Business Administration's SCORE program, or participate in an
3133 advisory role for a similar charitable, civic, or other
3134 nonprofit non-profit organization.
3135 (b) The department board shall require a retired licensee
3136 to affirm in writing her or his understanding of the limited
3137 types of activities in which she or he may engage while in
3138 retired status and that she or he has a professional duty to
3139 ensure that she or he holds the professional competencies
3140 necessary to participate in such activities.
3141 (c) A retired licensee may accept routine reimbursement
3142 for actual costs of travel and meals associated with volunteer
3143 services or de minimis per diem amounts paid to the licensee to
3144 cover such expenses as allowed by law.
3145 (d) A retired licensee may use the title of "retired CPA"
3146 on any business card or letterhead or any other printed or
3147 electronic document. However, such title must not be applied in
3148 such a manner that could confuse the public as to the current
3149 status of the licensee. The licensee is not required to have a
3150 certificate issued with the word "retired" on the certificate.
Page 126 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3151 (e) A retired licensee is not required to maintain the
3152 continuing education requirements under s. 473.312.
3153 (f) A retired licensee may not offer or render
3154 professional services that require her or his signature and the
3155 use of the CPA title, regardless of whether "retired" is
3156 attached to such title.
3157 (g) A retired licensee may be permitted to reactivate her
3158 or his license in a conditional manner as determined by the
3159 department board. The conditions of reactivation must require
3160 the payment of fees and the completion of required continuing
3161 education. The department board may prescribe by rule an
3162 application for reactivating a license placed on retired status
3163 and continuing education requirements as a condition of
3164 reactivating a license placed on retired status. The minimum
3165 continuing education requirements for reactivating a license
3166 placed on retired status are those of the most recent biennium
3167 plus one-half of the requirements in s. 473.312 for each
3168 biennium or part thereof during which the license was on retired
3169 status.
3170
3171 For the purposes of this subsection, the term "retired licensee"
3172 means a licensee whose license has been placed in retired status
3173 by the department.
3174 Section 107. Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of section
3175 473.314, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
Page 127 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3176 473.314 Temporary license.—
3177 (1) The department board shall adopt rules providing for
3178 the issuance of temporary licenses to certified public
3179 accountants or firms of other states who do not meet the
3180 requirements of s. 473.3141, for the purpose of enabling them or
3181 their employees to perform specific engagements involving the
3182 practice of public accountancy in this state. No temporary
3183 license shall be valid for more than 90 days after its issuance,
3184 and no license shall cover more than one engagement. After the
3185 expiration of 90 days, a new license shall be required.
3186 (2) Each application for a temporary license shall state
3187 the names of all persons who are to enter this state and shall
3188 be accompanied by a fee in an amount established by the
3189 department board not to exceed $400.
3190 (4) Upon certification of the applicant by the board, the
3191 department shall issue a temporary license to the applicant.
3192 Section 108. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 473.315,
3193 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3194 473.315 Independence, technical standards.—
3195 (3) The department board shall adopt rules establishing
3196 the standards of practice of public accounting, including, but
3197 not limited to, independence, competence, and technical
3198 standards.
3199 (4) Attorneys who are admitted to practice law by the
3200 Supreme Court of Florida are exempt from the standards of
Page 128 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3201 practice of public accounting as defined in s. 473.302(7)(b) and
3202 (c) s. 473.302(8)(b) and (c) when such standards conflict with
3203 the rules of The Florida Bar or orders of the Florida Supreme
3204 Court.
3205 Section 109. Subsections (5) and (6) of section 473.316,
3206 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3207 473.316 Communications between the accountant and client
3208 privileged.—
3209 (5) Communications are not privileged from disclosure in
3210 any disciplinary investigation or proceeding conducted pursuant
3211 to this act by the department or before the department board or
3212 in any judicial review of such a proceeding. In any such
3213 proceeding, a certified public accountant or public accountant,
3214 without the consent of her or his client, may testify with
3215 respect to any communication between the accountant and the
3216 accountant's client or be compelled, pursuant to a subpoena of
3217 the department or the board, to testify or produce records,
3218 books, or papers. Such a communication disclosed to the
3219 department board and records of the department board relating to
3220 the communication shall for all other purposes and proceedings
3221 be a privileged communication in all of the courts of this
3222 state.
3223 (6) The proceedings, records, and workpapers of a review
3224 committee are privileged and are not subject to discovery,
3225 subpoena, or other means of legal process or to introduction
Page 129 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3226 into evidence in a civil action or arbitration or an,
3227 administrative proceeding, or state accountancy board
3228 proceeding. A member of a review committee or person who was
3229 involved in a quality review may not testify in a civil action
3230 or arbitration or an, administrative proceeding, or state
3231 accountancy board proceeding as to any matter produced or
3232 disclosed during the quality review or as to any findings,
3233 recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the
3234 review committee or any members thereof. Public records and
3235 materials prepared for a particular engagement are not
3236 privileged merely because they were presented during the quality
3237 review. This privilege does not apply to disputes between a
3238 review committee and a person subject to a quality review.
3239 Section 110. Section 473.319, Florida Statutes, is amended
3240 to read:
3241 473.319 Contingent fees.—Public accounting services as
3242 defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) and (c) s. 473.302(8)(a) and (c),
3243 and those that include tax filings with federal, state, or local
3244 government, may shall not be offered or rendered for a fee
3245 contingent upon the findings or results of such service. This
3246 section does not apply to services involving federal, state, or
3247 other taxes in which the findings are those of the tax
3248 authorities and not those of the certified public accountant or
3249 firm. Fees to be fixed by courts or other public authorities,
3250 which are of an indeterminate amount at the time a public
Page 130 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3251 accounting service is undertaken, may shall not be regarded as
3252 contingent fees for purposes of this section.
3253 Section 111. Section 473.3205, Florida Statutes, is
3254 amended to read:
3255 473.3205 Commissions or referral fees.—A certified public
3256 accountant or firm may not accept or pay a commission or
3257 referral fee in connection with the sale or referral of public
3258 accounting services as defined in s. 473.302(7)(a) and (c) s.
3259 473.302(8)(a) and (c). Any certified public accountant or firm
3260 that is engaged in the practice of public accounting and that
3261 accepts a commission for the sale of a product or service to a
3262 client must disclose that fact to the client in writing in
3263 accordance with rules adopted by the department board. However,
3264 this section may shall not prohibit:
3265 (1) Payments for the purchase of an accounting practice;
3266 (2) Retirement payments to individuals formerly engaged in
3267 the practice of public accounting or payments to their heirs or
3268 estates; or
3269 (3) Payment of fees to a referring certified public
3270 accountant or firm for public accounting services to the
3271 successor certified public accountant or firm or the client in
3272 connection with an engagement.
3273 Section 112. Subsection (3) of section 473.321, Florida
3274 Statutes, is amended to read:
3275 473.321 Fictitious names.—
Page 131 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3276 (3) The department board shall adopt rules for
3277 interpretation of this section.
3278 Section 113. Paragraphs (c) and (e) of subsection (1) of
3279 section 473.322, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3280 473.322 Prohibitions; penalties.—
3281 (1) A person may not knowingly:
3282 (c) Perform or offer to perform any services described in
3283 s. 473.302(7)(a) or (d) s. 473.302(8)(a) or (d) unless such
3284 person holds an active license under this chapter and is a
3285 licensed firm, provides such services through a licensed firm,
3286 or complies with ss. 473.3101 and 473.3141. This paragraph does
3287 not prohibit the performance by persons other than certified
3288 public accountants of other services involving the use of
3289 accounting skills, including the preparation of tax returns and
3290 the preparation of financial statements without expression of
3291 opinion thereon;
3292 (e) Give false or forged evidence to the department board
3293 or a member thereof;
3294 Section 114. Paragraph (m) of subsection (1) and
3295 subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 473.323, Florida
3296 Statutes, are amended to read:
3297 473.323 Disciplinary proceedings.—
3298 (1) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
3299 disciplinary actions in subsection (3) may be taken:
3300 (m) Failing to provide any written disclosure to a client
Page 132 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3301 or the public which is required by this chapter or rule of the
3302 department board.
3303 (2) The department board shall specify, by rule, what acts
3304 or omissions constitute a violation of subsection (1).
3305 (3) When the department board finds any certified public
3306 accountant or firm guilty of any of the grounds set forth in
3307 subsection (1), it may enter an order imposing one or more of
3308 the following penalties:
3309 (a) Denial of an application for licensure.
3310 (b) Revocation or suspension of the certified public
3311 accountant or firm's license or practice privileges in this
3312 state.
3313 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
3314 $5,000 for each count or separate offense.
3315 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
3316 (e) Placement of the certified public accountant on
3317 probation for a period of time and subject to such conditions as
3318 the department board may specify, including requiring the
3319 certified public accountant to attend continuing education
3320 courses or to work under the supervision of another licensee.
3321 (f) Restriction of the authorized scope of practice by the
3322 certified public accountant.
3323 (4) The department shall reissue the license of a
3324 disciplined licensee upon certification by the board that the
3325 disciplined licensee has complied with all of the terms and
Page 133 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3326 conditions set forth in the final order.
3327 Section 115. Subsection (2) of section 474.202, Florida
3328 Statutes, is amended to read:
3329 474.202 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
3330 (2) "Board" means the Board of Veterinary Medicine.
3331 Section 116. Section 474.2065, Florida Statutes, is
3332 amended to read:
3333 474.2065 Fees.—The department board, by rule, shall
3334 establish fees for application and examination, reexamination,
3335 license renewal, inactive status, renewal of inactive status,
3336 license reactivation, periodic inspection of veterinary
3337 establishments, and duplicate copies of licenses, certificates,
3338 and permits. The fee for the initial application and examination
3339 may not exceed $650 plus the actual per applicant cost to the
3340 department for purchase of portions of the examination from the
3341 Professional Examination Service for the American Veterinary
3342 Medical Association or a similar national organization. The fee
3343 for licensure by endorsement may not exceed $500. The fee for
3344 temporary licensure may not exceed $200. The department board
3345 shall establish fees that are adequate to ensure its continued
3346 operation and to fund the proportionate expenses incurred by the
3347 department which are allocated to the regulation of
3348 veterinarians. Fees shall be based on departmental estimates of
3349 the revenue required to administer this chapter and the
3350 provisions relating to the regulation of veterinarians.
Page 134 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3351 Section 117. Subsections (1) through (4) of section
3352 474.207, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3353 474.207 Licensure by examination.—
3354 (1) Any person desiring to be licensed as a veterinarian
3355 shall apply to the department to take a licensure examination.
3356 The department board may by rule adopt use of a national
3357 examination in lieu of part or all of the examination required
3358 by this section, with a reasonable passing score to be set by
3359 rule of the department board.
3360 (2) The department shall license each applicant who the
3361 department board certifies has:
3362 (a) Completed the application form and remitted an
3363 examination fee set by the department board.
3364 (b)1. Graduated from a college of veterinary medicine
3365 accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association
3366 Council on Education; or
3367 2. Graduated from a college of veterinary medicine listed
3368 in the American Veterinary Medical Association Roster of
3369 Veterinary Colleges of the World and obtained a certificate from
3370 the Education Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates or the
3371 Program for the Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence.
3372 (c) Successfully completed the examination provided by the
3373 department for this purpose, or an examination determined by the
3374 department board to be equivalent.
3375 (d) Demonstrated knowledge of the laws and rules governing
Page 135 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3376 the practice of veterinary medicine in Florida in a manner
3377 designated by rules of the department board.
3378
3379 The department may shall not issue a license to any applicant
3380 who is under investigation in any state or territory of the
3381 United States or in the District of Columbia for an act which
3382 would constitute a violation of this chapter until the
3383 investigation is complete and disciplinary proceedings have been
3384 terminated, at which time the provisions of s. 474.214 shall
3385 apply.
3386 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (2)(b), an
3387 applicant shall be deemed to have met the education requirements
3388 for licensure upon submission of evidence that the applicant
3389 meets one of the following:
3390 (a) The applicant was certified for examination before by
3391 the board prior to October 1, 1989; or
3392 (b) The applicant immigrated to the United States after
3393 leaving her or his home country because of political reasons,
3394 provided such country is located in the Western Hemisphere and
3395 lacks diplomatic relations with the United States; and
3396 1. Was a Florida resident immediately preceding her or his
3397 application for licensure;
3398 2. Demonstrates to the department board, through
3399 submission of documentation verified by the applicant's
3400 respective professional association in exile, that she or he
Page 136 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3401 received a professional degree in veterinary medicine from a
3402 college or university located in the country from which she or
3403 he emigrated. However, the department board may not require
3404 receipt transcripts from the Republic of Cuba as a condition of
3405 eligibility under this section; and
3406 3. Lawfully practiced her or his profession for at least 3
3407 years.
3408 (4) Applicants certified for examination or reexamination
3409 under subsection (3) who fail the examination three times
3410 subsequent to October 1, 1989, shall be required to demonstrate
3411 to the department board that they meet the requirements of
3412 paragraph (2)(b) before prior to any further reexamination or
3413 certification for licensure.
3414 Section 118. Section 474.211, Florida Statutes, is amended
3415 to read:
3416 474.211 Renewal of license.—
3417 (1) The department shall renew a license upon receipt of
3418 the renewal application and fee and an affidavit of compliance
3419 with continuing education requirements set by rule of the board.
3420 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
3421 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses every 4 years.
3422 (3) The board may by rule prescribe continuing education,
3423 not to exceed 30 hours biennially, as a condition for renewal of
3424 a license or certificate. The criteria for such programs,
3425 providers, and courses shall be approved by the board.
Page 137 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3426 Section 119. Subsections (1), (2), and (3) of section
3427 474.2125, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3428 474.2125 Temporary license.—
3429 (1) The department board shall adopt rules providing for
3430 the issuance of a temporary license to a licensed veterinarian
3431 of another state for the purpose of enabling her or him to
3432 provide veterinary medical services in this state for the
3433 animals of a specific owner or, as may be needed in an emergency
3434 as defined in s. 252.34(4), for the animals of multiple owners,
3435 provided the applicant would qualify for licensure by
3436 endorsement under s. 474.217. No temporary license shall be
3437 valid for more than 30 days after its issuance, and no license
3438 shall cover more than the treatment of the animals of one owner
3439 except in an emergency as defined in s. 252.34(4). After the
3440 expiration of 30 days, a new license is required.
3441 (2) Each application for a temporary license shall state
3442 the names of all persons who are to enter this state and shall
3443 be accompanied by a fee in an amount established by the
3444 department board.
3445 (3) Upon certification of the applicant by the board, the
3446 department shall issue a temporary license to the applicant.
3447 Section 120. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
3448 474.213, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
3449 474.213 Prohibitions; penalties.—
3450 (1) No person shall:
Page 138 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3451 (d) Give false or forged evidence to the department board
3452 or a member thereof for the purpose of obtaining a license;
3453 Section 121. Paragraphs (a), (f), (h), (j), (v), (aa),
3454 (ee), (jj), and (nn) of subsection (1) and subsections (2) and
3455 (3) of section 474.214, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3456 474.214 Disciplinary proceedings.—
3457 (1) The following acts shall constitute grounds for which
3458 the disciplinary actions in subsection (2) may be taken:
3459 (a) Attempting to procure a license to practice veterinary
3460 medicine by bribery, by fraudulent representations, or through
3461 an error of the department or the board.
3462 (f) Violating any provision of this chapter or chapter
3463 455, a rule of the board or department, or a lawful order of the
3464 board or department previously entered in a disciplinary
3465 hearing, or failing to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of
3466 the department.
3467 (h) Being unable to practice veterinary medicine with
3468 reasonable skill or safety to patients by reason of illness,
3469 drunkenness, use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other
3470 material or substance or as a result of any mental or physical
3471 condition. In enforcing this paragraph, upon a finding by the
3472 secretary, the secretary's designee, or the probable cause panel
3473 of the department board that probable cause exists to believe
3474 that the licensee is unable to practice the profession because
3475 of the reasons stated in this paragraph, the department may
Page 139 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3476 shall have the authority to compel a licensee to submit to a
3477 mental or physical examination by a physician designated by the
3478 department. If the licensee refuses to comply with the
3479 department's order, the department may file a petition for
3480 enforcement in the circuit court of the circuit in which the
3481 licensee resides or does business. The licensee may shall not be
3482 named or identified by initials in any other public court
3483 records or documents and the enforcement proceedings shall be
3484 closed to the public. The department shall be entitled to the
3485 summary procedure provided in s. 51.011. A licensee affected
3486 under this paragraph shall be afforded an opportunity at
3487 reasonable intervals to demonstrate that she or he can resume
3488 the competent practice for which she or he is licensed with
3489 reasonable skill and safety to patients. Neither the record of
3490 proceedings nor the orders entered by the department board in
3491 any proceedings under this paragraph shall be used against a
3492 licensee in any other proceedings.
3493 (j) Knowingly maintaining a professional connection or
3494 association with any person who is in violation of the
3495 provisions of this chapter or the rules of the board or
3496 department. However, if the licensee verifies that the person is
3497 actively participating in a department-approved board-approved
3498 program for the treatment of a physical or mental condition, the
3499 licensee is required only to report such person to the
3500 consultant.
Page 140 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3501 (v) Failing to keep the equipment and premises of the
3502 business establishment in a clean and sanitary condition, having
3503 a premises permit suspended or revoked pursuant to s. 474.215,
3504 or operating or managing premises that do not comply with
3505 requirements established by rule of the department board.
3506 (aa) Failing to report to the department any person the
3507 licensee knows to be in violation of this chapter or of the
3508 rules of the department or board. However, if the licensee
3509 verifies that the person is actively participating in a
3510 department-approved board-approved program for the treatment of
3511 a physical or mental condition, the licensee is required only to
3512 report such person to the consultant.
3513 (ee) Failing to keep contemporaneously written medical
3514 records as required by rule of the department board.
3515 (jj) Failing to report to the department board within 30
3516 days, in writing, any action set forth in paragraph (b) that has
3517 been taken against the practitioner's license to practice
3518 veterinary medicine by any jurisdiction, including any agency or
3519 subdivision thereof.
3520 (nn) Failing to report a change of address to the
3521 department board within 60 days thereafter thereof.
3522 (2) When the department board finds any applicant or
3523 veterinarian guilty of any of the grounds set forth in
3524 subsection (1), regardless of whether the violation occurred
3525 before prior to licensure, it may enter an order imposing one or
Page 141 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3526 more of the following penalties:
3527 (a) Denial of certification for examination or licensure.
3528 (b) Revocation or suspension of a license.
3529 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
3530 $5,000 for each count or separate offense.
3531 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
3532 (e) Placement of the veterinarian on probation for a
3533 period of time and subject to such conditions as the department
3534 board may specify, including requiring the veterinarian to
3535 attend continuing education courses or to work under the
3536 supervision of another veterinarian.
3537 (f) Restricting the authorized scope of practice.
3538 (g) Imposition of costs of the investigation and
3539 prosecution.
3540 (h) Requiring the veterinarian to undergo remedial
3541 education.
3542
3543 In determining appropriate action, the department board must
3544 first consider those sanctions necessary to protect the public.
3545 Only after those sanctions have been imposed may the
3546 disciplining authority consider and include in its order
3547 requirements designed to rehabilitate the veterinarian. All
3548 costs associated with compliance with any order issued under
3549 this subsection are the obligation of the veterinarian.
3550 (3) The department shall reissue the license of a
Page 142 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3551 disciplined veterinarian upon certification by the board that
3552 the disciplined veterinarian has complied with all of the terms
3553 and conditions set forth in the final order and is capable of
3554 competently and safely engaging in the practice of veterinary
3555 medicine.
3556 Section 122. Subsections (1), (5), (7), (8), and (9) of
3557 section 474.215, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3558 474.215 Premises permits.—
3559 (1) Any establishment, permanent or mobile, where a
3560 licensed veterinarian practices must have a premises permit
3561 issued by the department. Upon application and payment of a fee
3562 not to exceed $250, as set by rule of the department board, the
3563 department shall cause such establishment to be inspected. A
3564 premises permit shall be issued if the establishment meets
3565 minimum standards, to be adopted by rule of the department
3566 board, as to sanitary conditions, recordkeeping, equipment,
3567 radiation monitoring, services required, and physical plant.
3568 (5) The department may issue a temporary premises permit
3569 to a responsible veterinarian who has submitted the application
3570 fee and a completed application form affirming compliance with
3571 the standards set by rule of the department board. If the
3572 department inspects the establishment and discovers that it is
3573 not in compliance with the department's standards, the
3574 department shall notify the veterinarian in writing of the
3575 deficiencies and shall provide 30 days for correction of the
Page 143 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3576 deficiencies and reinspection. Such temporary permit shall
3577 become void upon notification by the department that the
3578 establishment has failed, after reinspection, to meet those
3579 standards. Upon receipt of such notice, the responsible
3580 veterinarian shall close the establishment until completion of a
3581 subsequent inspection affirming that the required standards have
3582 been met and until another permit has been issued by the
3583 department.
3584 (7) The department board by rule shall establish minimum
3585 standards for the operation of limited service veterinary
3586 medical practices. Such rules may shall not restrict limited
3587 service veterinary medical practices and shall be consistent
3588 with the type of limited veterinary medical service provided.
3589 (a) Any person that offers or provides limited service
3590 veterinary medical practice shall obtain a biennial permit from
3591 the department board the cost of which may shall not exceed
3592 $250. The limited service permittee shall register each location
3593 where a limited service clinic is held and shall pay a fee set
3594 by rule not to exceed $25 to register each such location.
3595 (b) All permits issued under this subsection are subject
3596 to the provisions of ss. 474.213 and 474.214.
3597 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to
3598 the contrary, any temporary rabies vaccination effort operated
3599 by a county health department in response to a public health
3600 threat, as declared by the State Health Officer in consultation
Page 144 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3601 with the State Veterinarian, is not subject to any
3602 preregistration, time limitation, or fee requirements, but must
3603 adhere to all other requirements for limited service veterinary
3604 medical practice as prescribed by rule. The fee charged to the
3605 public for a rabies vaccination administered during such
3606 temporary rabies vaccination effort may not exceed the actual
3607 cost of administering the rabies vaccine. Such rabies
3608 vaccination efforts may not be used for any purpose other than
3609 to address the public health consequences of the rabies
3610 outbreak. The department board shall be immediately notified in
3611 writing of any temporary rabies vaccination effort operated
3612 under this paragraph.
3613 (8) Any person who is not a veterinarian licensed under
3614 this chapter but who desires to own and operate a veterinary
3615 medical establishment or limited service clinic shall apply to
3616 the department board for a premises permit. If the department
3617 board certifies that the applicant complies with the applicable
3618 laws and rules of the department board, the department shall
3619 issue a premises permit. No permit shall be issued unless a
3620 licensed veterinarian is designated to undertake the
3621 professional supervision of the veterinary medical practice and
3622 the minimum standards set by rule of the department board for
3623 premises where veterinary medicine is practiced. Upon
3624 application, the department shall submit the permittee's name
3625 for a statewide criminal records correspondence check through
Page 145 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3626 the Department of Law Enforcement. The permittee shall notify
3627 the department board within 10 days after any designation of a
3628 new licensed veterinarian responsible for such duties. A
3629 permittee under this subsection is subject to the provisions of
3630 subsection (9) and s. 474.214.
3631 (9)(a) The department or the board may deny, revoke, or
3632 suspend the permit of any permittee under this section and may
3633 fine, place on probation, or otherwise discipline any such
3634 permittee who has:
3635 1. Obtained a permit by misrepresentation or fraud or
3636 through an error of the department or board;
3637 2. Attempted to procure, or has procured, a permit for any
3638 other person by making, or causing to be made, any false
3639 representation;
3640 3. Violated any of the requirements of this chapter or any
3641 rule of the department board; or
3642 4. Been convicted or found guilty of, or entered a plea of
3643 nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a felony in any
3644 court of this state, of any other state, or of the United
3645 States.
3646 (b) If the permit is revoked or suspended, the owner,
3647 manager, or proprietor shall cease to operate the premises as a
3648 veterinary medical practice as of the effective date of the
3649 suspension or revocation. In the event of such revocation or
3650 suspension, the owner, manager, or proprietor shall remove from
Page 146 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3651 the premises all signs and symbols identifying the premises as a
3652 veterinary medical practice. The period of any such suspension
3653 shall be prescribed by rule of the department board, but may not
3654 exceed 1 year. If the permit is revoked, the person owning or
3655 operating the establishment may not apply for a permit to
3656 operate a premises for a period of 1 year after the effective
3657 date of such revocation. Upon the effective date of such
3658 revocation, the permittee must advise the department board of
3659 the disposition of all medicinal drugs and must provide for
3660 ensuring the security, confidentiality, and availability to
3661 clients of all patient medical records.
3662 Section 123. Section 474.216, Florida Statutes, is amended
3663 to read:
3664 474.216 License and premises permit to be displayed.—Each
3665 person to whom a license or premises permit is issued shall keep
3666 such document conspicuously displayed in her or his office,
3667 place of business, or place of employment, whether a permanent
3668 or mobile veterinary establishment or clinic, and shall,
3669 whenever required, exhibit said document to any member or
3670 authorized representative of the department board.
3671 Section 124. Subsections (6), (8), (10), and (11) of
3672 section 474.2165, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3673 474.2165 Ownership and control of veterinary medical
3674 patient records; report or copies of records to be furnished.—
3675 (6) The department may obtain patient records pursuant to
Page 147 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3676 a subpoena without written authorization from the client if the
3677 department finds and the probable cause panel of the board find
3678 reasonable cause to believe that a veterinarian has excessively
3679 or inappropriately prescribed any controlled substance specified
3680 in chapter 893 in violation of this chapter or that a
3681 veterinarian has practiced his or her profession below that
3682 level of care, skill, and treatment required as defined by this
3683 chapter.
3684 (8) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 455.242, records
3685 owners shall notify the department board office when they are
3686 terminating practice, retiring, or relocating and are no longer
3687 available to patients, specifying who the new records owner is
3688 and where the medical records can be found.
3689 (10) Veterinarians in violation of the provisions of this
3690 section shall be disciplined by the department board.
3691 (11) A records owner furnishing copies of reports or
3692 records pursuant to this section shall charge no more than the
3693 actual cost of copying, including reasonable staff time, or the
3694 amount specified in administrative rule by the department board.
3695 Section 125. Subsection (1) of section 474.217, Florida
3696 Statutes, is amended to read:
3697 474.217 Licensure by endorsement.—
3698 (1) The department shall issue a license by endorsement to
3699 any applicant who, upon applying to the department and remitting
3700 a fee set by the department board, demonstrates to the
Page 148 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3701 department board that she or he:
3702 (a) Has demonstrated, in a manner designated by rule of
3703 the department board, knowledge of the laws and rules governing
3704 the practice of veterinary medicine in this state; and
3705 (b)1. Holds, and has held for the 3 years immediately
3706 preceding the application for licensure, a valid, active license
3707 to practice veterinary medicine in another state of the United
3708 States, the District of Columbia, or a territory of the United
3709 States, provided that the applicant has successfully completed a
3710 state, regional, national, or other examination that is
3711 equivalent to or more stringent than the examination required by
3712 the department board; or
3713 2. Meets the qualifications of s. 474.207(2)(b) and has
3714 successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other
3715 examination which is equivalent to or more stringent than the
3716 examination given by the department and has passed the
3717 department's board's clinical competency examination or another
3718 clinical competency examination specified by rule of the
3719 department board.
3720 Section 126. Section 474.221, Florida Statutes, is amended
3721 to read:
3722 474.221 Impaired practitioner provisions; applicability.—
3723 Notwithstanding the transfer of the Division of Medical Quality
3724 Assurance to the Department of Health or any other provision of
3725 law to the contrary, veterinarians licensed under this chapter
Page 149 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3726 shall be governed by the impaired practitioner program
3727 provisions of s. 456.076 as if they were under the jurisdiction
3728 of the Division of Medical Quality Assurance, except that for
3729 veterinarians the Department of Business and Professional
3730 Regulation shall, at its option, exercise any of the powers
3731 granted to the Department of Health by that section, and "board"
3732 shall mean board as defined in this chapter.
3733 Section 127. Subsection (6) of section 475.451, Florida
3734 Statutes, is amended to read:
3735 475.451 Schools teaching real estate practice.—
3736 (6) Any course prescribed by the commission as a condition
3737 precedent to a person's becoming initially licensed as a sales
3738 associate or broker may be taught by a real estate school in a
3739 classroom or via distance learning pursuant to s. 475.17(2) by a
3740 currently permitted instructor from any such school. All other
3741 prescribed courses, except the continuing education course
3742 required by s. 475.182, shall be taught by a currently permitted
3743 school instructor personally in attendance at such course or by
3744 distance learning pursuant to s. 475.17. The continuing
3745 education course required by s. 475.182 may be taught by
3746 distance learning pursuant to s. 475.17 or by an equivalent
3747 correspondence course; however, any such correspondence course
3748 shall be required to have a final examination, prepared and
3749 administered by the school or course provider issuing the
3750 correspondence course. The continuing education requirements
Page 150 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3751 provided in this chapter do not apply to an attorney who is
3752 otherwise qualified under this chapter and who is a member in
3753 good standing of The Florida Bar.
3754 Section 128. Subsection (4) of section 476.034, Florida
3755 Statutes, is amended to read:
3756 476.034 Definitions.—As used in this act:
3757 (4) "Board" means the Barbers' Board.
3758 Section 129. Subsection (2) of section 476.074, Florida
3759 Statutes, is amended to read:
3760 476.074 Legal, investigative, and inspection services.—
3761 (2) The department shall provide all investigative
3762 services required by the board or the department in carrying out
3763 the provisions of this act.
3764 Section 130. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) and
3765 subsection (3) of section 476.114, Florida Statutes, are amended
3766 to read:
3767 476.114 Examination; prerequisites.—
3768 (2) An applicant is eligible for licensure by examination
3769 to practice barbering if the applicant:
3770 (c) Has received a minimum of 900 hours of training in
3771 sanitation, safety, and laws and rules, as established by the
3772 department board, which must include, but is not limited to, the
3773 equivalent of completion of services directly related to the
3774 practice of barbering at one of the following:
3775 1. A school of barbering licensed pursuant to chapter
Page 151 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3776 1005;
3777 2. A barbering program within the public school system; or
3778 3. A government-operated barbering program in this state.
3779
3780 The department board shall establish by rule procedures whereby
3781 the school or program may certify that a person is qualified to
3782 take the required examination after the completion of a minimum
3783 of 600 actual school hours. If the person passes the
3784 examination, she or he has satisfied this requirement,; but if
3785 the person fails the examination, she or he may not be qualified
3786 to take the examination again until the completion of the full
3787 requirements provided by this section.
3788 (3) An applicant who meets the requirements set forth in
3789 paragraph (2)(c) who fails to pass the examination may take
3790 subsequent examinations as many times as necessary to pass,
3791 except that the department board may specify by rule reasonable
3792 timeframes for rescheduling the examination and additional
3793 training requirements for applicants who, after the third
3794 attempt, fail to pass the examination. Before Prior to
3795 reexamination, the applicant must file the appropriate form and
3796 pay the reexamination fee as required by rule.
3797 Section 131. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 476.134,
3798 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3799 476.134 Examinations.—
3800 (1) Examinations of applicants for licenses as barbers
Page 152 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3801 shall be offered not less than four times each year. The
3802 examination of applicants for licenses as barbers shall include
3803 a written test. The department may board shall have the
3804 authority to adopt rules with respect to the examination of
3805 applicants for licensure. The department board may provide rules
3806 with respect to written examinations in such manner as the
3807 department board may deem fit.
3808 (2) The department board shall adopt rules specifying the
3809 areas of competency to be covered by the examination. Such rules
3810 shall include the relative weight assigned in grading each area.
3811 All areas tested shall be reasonably related to the protection
3812 of the public and the applicant's competency to practice
3813 barbering in a manner which will not endanger the public.
3814 Section 132. Subsections (1), (2), (5), and (6) of section
3815 476.144, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3816 476.144 Licensure.—
3817 (1) The department shall license any applicant who the
3818 department board certifies is qualified to practice barbering in
3819 this state.
3820 (2) The department board shall certify for licensure any
3821 applicant who satisfies the requirements of s. 476.114, and who
3822 passes the required examination, achieving a passing grade as
3823 established by department board rule.
3824 (5) The department board shall certify as qualified for
3825 licensure by endorsement as a barber in this state an applicant
Page 153 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3826 who holds a current active license to practice barbering in
3827 another state. The department board shall adopt rules specifying
3828 procedures for the licensure by endorsement of practitioners
3829 desiring to be licensed in this state who hold a current active
3830 license in another country and who have met qualifications
3831 substantially similar to, equivalent to, or greater than the
3832 qualifications required of applicants from this state.
3833 (6) A person may apply for a restricted license to
3834 practice barbering. The department board shall adopt rules
3835 specifying procedures for an applicant to obtain a restricted
3836 license if the applicant:
3837 (a)1. Has successfully completed a restricted barber
3838 course, as established by rule of the department board, at a
3839 school of barbering licensed pursuant to chapter 1005, a
3840 barbering program within the public school system, or a
3841 government-operated barbering program in this state; or
3842 2.a. Holds or has within the previous 5 years held an
3843 active valid license to practice barbering in another state or
3844 country or has held a Florida barbering license which has been
3845 declared null and void for failure to renew the license, and the
3846 applicant fulfilled the requirements of s. 476.114(2)(c) for
3847 initial licensure; and
3848 b. Has not been disciplined relating to the practice of
3849 barbering in the previous 5 years; and
3850 (b) Passes a written examination on the laws and rules
Page 154 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3851 governing the practice of barbering in Florida, as established
3852 by the department board.
3853
3854 The restricted license shall limit the licensee's practice to
3855 those specific areas in which the applicant has demonstrated
3856 competence pursuant to rules adopted by the department board.
3857 Section 133. Section 476.154, Florida Statutes, is amended
3858 to read:
3859 476.154 Biennial Renewal of licenses.—
3860 (1) Each licensed barber who continues in active practice
3861 or service shall renew her or his license every 4 years
3862 biennially and pay the required fee.
3863 (2) Any license or certificate of registration issued
3864 pursuant to this act for a period less than the established
3865 biennial issuance period may be issued for that lesser period of
3866 time, and the department shall adjust the required fee
3867 accordingly. The department board shall adopt rules providing
3868 for such partial period fee adjustments.
3869 (3)(a) The department shall renew a license upon receipt
3870 of the renewal application and fee.
3871 (b) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
3872 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses.
3873 Section 134. Subsection (2) of section 476.155, Florida
3874 Statutes, is amended to read:
3875 476.155 Inactive status; reactivation of inactive
Page 155 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3876 license.—
3877 (2) The department board shall adopt promulgate rules
3878 relating to licenses which have become inactive and for the
3879 renewal of inactive licenses. The department board shall
3880 prescribe by rule a fee not to exceed $100 for the reactivation
3881 of an inactive license and a fee not to exceed $50 for the
3882 renewal of an inactive license.
3883 Section 135. Subsection (1) of section 476.192, Florida
3884 Statutes, is amended to read:
3885 476.192 Fees; disposition.—
3886 (1) The department board shall set by rule fees according
3887 to the following schedule:
3888 (a) For barbers, fees for original licensing, license
3889 renewal, and delinquent renewal may shall not exceed $100.
3890 (b) For barbers, fees for endorsement application,
3891 examination, and reexamination may shall not exceed $150.
3892 (c) For barbershops, fees for license application,
3893 original licensing, license renewal, and delinquent renewal may
3894 shall not exceed $150.
3895 (d) For duplicate licenses and certificates, fees may
3896 shall not exceed $25.
3897 Section 136. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) and
3898 subsection (2) of section 476.204, Florida Statutes, are amended
3899 to read:
3900 476.204 Penalties.—
Page 156 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3901 (1) It is unlawful for any person to:
3902 (i) Violate or refuse to comply with any provision of this
3903 chapter or chapter 455 or a rule or final order of the
3904 department board.
3905 (2) Any person who violates any provision of this section
3906 shall be subject to one or more of the following penalties, as
3907 determined by the department board:
3908 (a) Revocation or suspension of any license or
3909 registration issued pursuant to this chapter.
3910 (b) Issuance of a reprimand or censure.
3911 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
3912 $500 for each count or separate offense.
3913 (d) Placement on probation for a period of time and
3914 subject to such reasonable conditions as the department board
3915 may specify.
3916 (e) Refusal to certify to the department an applicant for
3917 licensure.
3918 Section 137. Section 476.214, Florida Statutes, is amended
3919 to read:
3920 476.214 Grounds for suspending, revoking, or refusing to
3921 grant license or certificate.—
3922 (1) The department may board shall have the power to
3923 revoke or suspend any license, registration card, or certificate
3924 of registration issued pursuant to this act, or to reprimand,
3925 censure, deny subsequent licensure of, or otherwise discipline
Page 157 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3926 any holder of a license, registration card, or certificate of
3927 registration issued pursuant to this act, for any of the
3928 following causes:
3929 (a) Gross malpractice or gross incompetency in the
3930 practice of barbering;
3931 (b) Practice by a person knowingly having an infectious or
3932 contagious disease; or
3933 (c) Commission of any of the offenses described in s.
3934 476.194.
3935 (2) The department board shall keep a record of its
3936 disciplinary proceedings against holders of licenses or
3937 certificates of registration issued pursuant to this act.
3938 (3) The department may shall not issue or renew a license
3939 or certificate of registration under this chapter to any person
3940 against whom or barbershop against which the department board
3941 has assessed a fine, interest, or costs associated with
3942 investigation and prosecution until the person or barbershop has
3943 paid in full such fine, interest, or costs associated with
3944 investigation and prosecution or until the person or barbershop
3945 complies with or satisfies all terms and conditions of the final
3946 order.
3947 Section 138. Section 476.234, Florida Statutes, is amended
3948 to read:
3949 476.234 Civil proceedings.—In addition to any other
3950 remedy, the department may file a proceeding in the name of the
Page 158 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3951 state seeking issuance of a restraining order, injunction, or
3952 writ of mandamus against any person who is or has been violating
3953 any of the provisions of this act or the lawful rules or orders
3954 of the board, commission, or department.
3955 Section 139. Subsections (2) through (13) of section
3956 477.013, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (1)
3957 through (12), respectively, and present subsections (1) and (8)
3958 of that section are amended to read:
3959 477.013 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
3960 (1) "Board" means the Board of Cosmetology.
3961 (7)(8) "Specialty salon" means any place of business
3962 wherein the practice of one or all of the specialties as defined
3963 in subsection (5) (6) are engaged in or carried on.
3964 Section 140. Subsections (7), (8), and (9) of section
3965 477.0135, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3966 477.0135 Exemptions.—
3967 (7) A license or registration is not required for a person
3968 whose occupation or practice is confined solely to hair braiding
3969 as defined in s. 477.013(8) s. 477.013(9).
3970 (8) A license or registration is not required for a person
3971 whose occupation or practice is confined solely to hair wrapping
3972 as defined in s. 477.013(9) s. 477.013(10).
3973 (9) A license or registration is not required for a person
3974 whose occupation or practice is confined solely to body wrapping
3975 as defined in s. 477.013(11) s. 477.013(12).
Page 159 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
3976 Section 141. Section 477.016, Florida Statutes, is amended
3977 to read:
3978 477.016 Rulemaking.—
3979 (1) The department board may adopt rules pursuant to ss.
3980 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this
3981 chapter conferring duties upon it.
3982 (2) The department board may by rule adopt any restriction
3983 established by a regulation of the United States Food and Drug
3984 Administration related to the use of a cosmetic product or any
3985 substance used in the practice of cosmetology if the department
3986 board finds that the product or substance poses a risk to the
3987 health, safety, and welfare of clients or persons providing
3988 cosmetology services.
3989 Section 142. Section 477.018, Florida Statutes, is amended
3990 to read:
3991 477.018 Investigative services.—The department shall
3992 provide all investigative services required by the board or the
3993 department in carrying out the provisions of this act.
3994 Section 143. Subsections (2), (3), (5), (6), and (7) of
3995 section 477.019, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3996 477.019 Cosmetologists; qualifications; licensure;
3997 supervised practice; license renewal; endorsement; continuing
3998 education.—
3999 (2) An applicant is eligible for licensure by examination
4000 to practice cosmetology if the applicant:
Page 160 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4001 (a) Is at least 16 years of age or has received a high
4002 school diploma;
4003 (b) Pays the required application fee, which is not
4004 refundable, and the required examination fee, which is
4005 refundable if the applicant is determined to not be eligible for
4006 licensure for any reason other than failure to successfully
4007 complete the licensure examination; and
4008 (c) Has received a minimum of 1,200 hours of training as
4009 established by the department board, which must include, but is
4010 not limited to, the equivalent of completion of services
4011 directly related to the practice of cosmetology at one of the
4012 following:
4013 1. A school of cosmetology licensed pursuant to chapter
4014 1005.
4015 2. A cosmetology program within the public school system.
4016 3. The Cosmetology Division of the Florida School for the
4017 Deaf and the Blind, provided the division meets the standards of
4018 this chapter.
4019 4. A government-operated cosmetology program in this
4020 state.
4021
4022 The department board shall establish by rule procedures whereby
4023 the school or program may certify that a person is qualified to
4024 take the required examination after the completion of a minimum
4025 of 1,000 actual school hours. If the person then passes the
Page 161 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4026 examination, he or she has satisfied this requirement,; but if
4027 the person fails the examination, he or she may not be qualified
4028 to take the examination again until the completion of the full
4029 requirements provided by this section.
4030 (3) Upon an applicant receiving a passing grade, as
4031 established by department board rule, on the examination and
4032 paying the initial licensing fee, the department shall issue a
4033 license to practice cosmetology.
4034 (5) Renewal of license registration shall be accomplished
4035 pursuant to rules adopted by the department board.
4036 (6) The department board shall certify as qualified for
4037 licensure by endorsement as a cosmetologist in this state an
4038 applicant who holds a current active license to practice
4039 cosmetology in another state.
4040 (7)(a) The board shall prescribe by rule continuing
4041 education requirements intended to ensure protection of the
4042 public through updated training of licensees and registered
4043 specialists, not to exceed 10 hours biennially, as a condition
4044 for renewal of a license or registration as a specialist under
4045 this chapter. Continuing education courses shall include, but
4046 not be limited to, the following subjects as they relate to the
4047 practice of cosmetology: human immunodeficiency virus and
4048 acquired immune deficiency syndrome; Occupational Safety and
4049 Health Administration regulations; workers' compensation issues;
4050 state and federal laws and rules as they pertain to
Page 162 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4051 cosmetologists, cosmetology, salons, specialists, specialty
4052 salons, and booth renters; chemical makeup as it pertains to
4053 hair, skin, and nails; and environmental issues. Courses given
4054 at cosmetology conferences may be counted toward the number of
4055 continuing education hours required if approved by the board.
4056 (b) The board may, by rule, require any licensee in
4057 violation of a continuing education requirement to take a
4058 refresher course or refresher course and examination in addition
4059 to any other penalty. The number of hours for the refresher
4060 course may not exceed 48 hours.
4061 Section 144. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) and
4062 subsections (4) and (5) of section 477.0201, Florida Statutes,
4063 are amended to read:
4064 477.0201 Specialty registration; qualifications;
4065 registration renewal; endorsement.—
4066 (1) Any person is qualified for registration as a
4067 specialist in any specialty practice within the practice of
4068 cosmetology under this chapter who:
4069 (b) Has received a certificate of completion for:
4070 1. One hundred and eighty hours of training, as
4071 established by the department board, which shall focus primarily
4072 on sanitation and safety, to practice specialties as defined in
4073 s. 477.013(5)(a) and (b) s. 477.013(6)(a) and (b);
4074 2. Two hundred and twenty hours of training, as
4075 established by the department board, which shall focus primarily
Page 163 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4076 on sanitation and safety, to practice the specialty as defined
4077 in s. 477.013(5)(c) s. 477.013(6)(c); or
4078 3. Four hundred hours of training or the number of hours
4079 of training required to maintain minimum Pell Grant
4080 requirements, as established by the department board, which
4081 shall focus primarily on sanitation and safety, to practice the
4082 specialties as defined in s. 477.013(5)(a)-(c) s. 477.013(6)(a)-
4083 (c).
4084 (c) The certificate of completion specified in paragraph
4085 (b) must be from one of the following:
4086 1. A school licensed pursuant to s. 477.023.
4087 2. A school licensed pursuant to chapter 1005 or the
4088 equivalent licensing authority of another state.
4089 3. A specialty program within the public school system.
4090 4. A specialty division within the Cosmetology Division of
4091 the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind, provided the
4092 training programs comply with minimum curriculum requirements
4093 established by the department board.
4094 (4) Renewal of registration shall be accomplished pursuant
4095 to rules adopted by the department board.
4096 (5) The department board shall adopt rules specifying
4097 procedures for the registration of specialty practitioners
4098 desiring to be registered in this state who have been registered
4099 or licensed and are practicing in states which have registering
4100 or licensing standards substantially similar to, equivalent to,
Page 164 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4101 or more stringent than the standards of this state.
4102 Section 145. Subsection (2) of section 477.0212, Florida
4103 Statutes, is amended to read:
4104 477.0212 Inactive status.—
4105 (2) The department board shall adopt rules relating to
4106 licenses that become inactive and for the renewal of inactive
4107 licenses. The rules may not require more than one renewal cycle
4108 of continuing education to reactivate a license. The department
4109 board shall prescribe by rule a fee not to exceed $50 for the
4110 reactivation of an inactive license and a fee not to exceed $50
4111 for the renewal of an inactive license.
4112 Section 146. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 477.022,
4113 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4114 477.022 Examinations.—
4115 (1) The department board shall ensure that examinations
4116 adequately measure both an applicant's competency and her or his
4117 knowledge of related statutory requirements. Professional
4118 testing services may be utilized to formulate the examinations.
4119 The department board may offer a written clinical examination or
4120 a performance examination, or both, in addition to a written
4121 theory examination.
4122 (2) The department board shall ensure that examinations
4123 comply with state and federal equal employment opportunity
4124 guidelines.
4125 Section 147. Subsections (2), (8), (9), and (10) of
Page 165 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4126 section 477.025, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4127 477.025 Cosmetology salons; specialty salons; requisites;
4128 licensure; inspection; mobile cosmetology salons.—
4129 (2) The department board shall adopt rules governing the
4130 licensure and operation of salons and specialty salons and their
4131 facilities, personnel, safety and sanitary requirements, and the
4132 license application and granting process.
4133 (8) Renewal of license registration for cosmetology salons
4134 or specialty salons shall be accomplished pursuant to rules
4135 adopted by the department board. The department board is further
4136 authorized to adopt rules governing delinquent renewal of
4137 licenses and may impose penalty fees for delinquent renewal.
4138 (9) The department may board is authorized to adopt rules
4139 governing the periodic inspection of cosmetology salons and
4140 specialty salons licensed under this chapter.
4141 (10)(a) The department board shall adopt rules governing
4142 the licensure, operation, and inspection of mobile cosmetology
4143 salons, including their facilities, personnel, and safety and
4144 sanitary requirements.
4145 (b) Each mobile salon must comply with all licensure and
4146 operating requirements specified in this chapter or chapter 455
4147 or rules of the board or department that apply to cosmetology
4148 salons at fixed locations, except to the extent that such
4149 requirements conflict with this subsection or rules adopted
4150 pursuant to this subsection.
Page 166 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4151 (c) A mobile cosmetology salon must maintain a permanent
4152 business address, located in the inspection area of the local
4153 department office, at which records of appointments,
4154 itineraries, license numbers of employees, and vehicle
4155 identification numbers of the licenseholder's mobile salon shall
4156 be kept and made available for verification purposes by
4157 department personnel, and at which correspondence from the
4158 department can be received.
4159 (d) To facilitate periodic inspections of mobile
4160 cosmetology salons, before prior to the beginning of each month
4161 each mobile salon licenseholder must file with the department
4162 board a written monthly itinerary listing the locations where
4163 and the dates and hours when the mobile salon will be operating.
4164 (e) The department board shall establish fees for mobile
4165 cosmetology salons, not to exceed the fees for cosmetology
4166 salons at fixed locations.
4167 (f) The operation of mobile cosmetology salons must be in
4168 compliance with all local laws and ordinances regulating
4169 business establishments, with all applicable requirements of the
4170 Americans with Disabilities Act relating to accommodations for
4171 persons with disabilities, and with all applicable OSHA
4172 requirements.
4173 Section 148. Section 477.026, Florida Statutes, is amended
4174 to read:
4175 477.026 Fees; disposition.—
Page 167 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4176 (1) The department board shall set fees according to the
4177 following schedule:
4178 (a) For cosmetologists, fees for original licensing,
4179 license renewal, and delinquent renewal may shall not exceed
4180 $50.
4181 (b) For cosmetologists, fees for endorsement application,
4182 examination, and reexamination may shall not exceed $50.
4183 (c) For cosmetology and specialty salons, fees for license
4184 application, original licensing, license renewal, and delinquent
4185 renewal may shall not exceed $50.
4186 (d) For specialists, fees for application and endorsement
4187 registration may shall not exceed $30.
4188 (e) For specialists, fees for initial registration,
4189 registration renewal, and delinquent renewal may shall not
4190 exceed $50.
4191 (2) All moneys collected by the department from fees
4192 authorized by this chapter shall be paid into the Professional
4193 Regulation Trust Fund, which fund is created in the department,
4194 and shall be applied in accordance with ss. 215.37 and 455.219.
4195 The Legislature may appropriate any excess moneys from this fund
4196 to the General Revenue Fund.
4197 (3) The department, with the advice of the board, shall
4198 prepare and submit a proposed budget in accordance with law.
4199 Section 149. Subsections (2) and (4) of section 477.0263,
4200 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
Page 168 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4201 477.0263 Cosmetology services to be performed in licensed
4202 salon; exceptions.—
4203 (2) Pursuant to rules established by the department board,
4204 cosmetology services may be performed by a licensed
4205 cosmetologist in a location other than a licensed salon,
4206 including, but not limited to, a nursing home, hospital, or
4207 residence, when a client for reasons of ill health is unable to
4208 go to a licensed salon. Arrangements for the performance of such
4209 cosmetology services in a location other than a licensed salon
4210 shall be made only through a licensed salon.
4211 (4) Pursuant to rules adopted by the department board, any
4212 cosmetology or specialty service may be performed in a location
4213 other than a licensed salon when the service is performed in
4214 connection with a special event and is performed by a person who
4215 holds the proper license or specialty registration.
4216 Section 150. Section 477.028, Florida Statutes, is amended
4217 to read:
4218 477.028 Disciplinary proceedings.—
4219 (1) The department may board shall have the power to
4220 revoke or suspend the license of a cosmetologist licensed under
4221 this chapter, or the registration of a specialist registered
4222 under this chapter, and to reprimand, censure, deny subsequent
4223 licensure or registration of, or otherwise discipline a
4224 cosmetologist or a specialist licensed or registered under this
4225 chapter in any of the following cases:
Page 169 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4226 (a) Upon proof that a license or registration has been
4227 obtained by fraud or misrepresentation.
4228 (b) Upon proof that the holder of a license or
4229 registration is guilty of fraud or deceit or of gross
4230 negligence, incompetency, or misconduct in the practice or
4231 instruction of cosmetology or a specialty.
4232 (c) Upon proof that the holder of a license or
4233 registration is guilty of aiding, assisting, procuring, or
4234 advising any unlicensed person to practice as a cosmetologist.
4235 (2) The department may board shall have the power to
4236 revoke or suspend the license of a cosmetology salon or a
4237 specialty salon licensed under this chapter, to deny subsequent
4238 licensure of such salon, or to reprimand, censure, or otherwise
4239 discipline the owner of such salon in either of the following
4240 cases:
4241 (a) Upon proof that a license has been obtained by fraud
4242 or misrepresentation.
4243 (b) Upon proof that the holder of a license is guilty of
4244 fraud or deceit or of gross negligence, incompetency, or
4245 misconduct in the operation of the salon so licensed.
4246 (3) Disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted pursuant
4247 to the provisions of chapter 120.
4248 (4) The department may shall not issue or renew a license
4249 or certificate of registration under this chapter to any person
4250 against whom or salon against which the department board has
Page 170 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4251 assessed a fine, interest, or costs associated with
4252 investigation and prosecution until the person or salon has paid
4253 in full such fine, interest, or costs associated with
4254 investigation and prosecution or until the person or salon
4255 complies with or satisfies all terms and conditions of the final
4256 order.
4257 Section 151. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) and
4258 subsection (2) of section 477.029, Florida Statutes, are amended
4259 to read:
4260 477.029 Penalty.—
4261 (1) It is unlawful for any person to:
4262 (i) Violate or refuse to comply with any provision of this
4263 chapter or chapter 455 or a rule or final order of the board or
4264 the department.
4265 (2) Any person who violates the provisions of this section
4266 shall be subject to one or more of the following penalties, as
4267 determined by the department board:
4268 (a) Revocation or suspension of any license or
4269 registration issued pursuant to this chapter.
4270 (b) Issuance of a reprimand or censure.
4271 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
4272 $500 for each count or separate offense.
4273 (d) Placement on probation for a period of time and
4274 subject to such reasonable conditions as the department board
4275 may specify.
Page 171 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4276 (e) Refusal to certify to the department an applicant for
4277 licensure.
4278 Section 152. Subsections (4) through (16) of section
4279 481.203, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
4280 through (15), respectively, and subsection (3) and present
4281 subsection (8) of that section are amended to read:
4282 481.203 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
4283 (3) "Board" means the Board of Architecture and Interior
4284 Design.
4285 (7)(8) "Diversified interior design experience" means
4286 experience which substantially encompasses the various elements
4287 of interior design services set forth under the definition of
4288 "interior design" in subsection (9) (10).
4289 Section 153. Section 481.207, Florida Statutes, is amended
4290 to read:
4291 481.207 Fees.—The department board, by rule, may establish
4292 fees for architects and registered interior designers, to be
4293 paid for applications, examination, reexamination, licensing and
4294 renewal, delinquency, reinstatement, and recordmaking and
4295 recordkeeping. The examination fee shall be in an amount that
4296 covers the cost of obtaining and administering the examination
4297 and shall be refunded if the applicant is found ineligible to
4298 sit for the examination. The application fee is nonrefundable.
4299 The fee for initial application and examination for architects
4300 may not exceed $775 plus the actual per applicant cost to the
Page 172 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4301 department for purchase of the examination from the National
4302 Council of Architectural Registration Boards or similar national
4303 organizations. The initial nonrefundable fee for registered
4304 interior designers may not exceed $75. The biennial renewal fee
4305 for architects may not exceed $200. The biennial renewal fee for
4306 registered interior designers may not exceed $75. The
4307 delinquency fee may not exceed the biennial renewal fee
4308 established by the department board for an active license. The
4309 department board shall establish fees that are adequate to
4310 ensure the continued operation of the department board and to
4311 fund the proportionate expenses incurred by the department which
4312 are allocated to the regulation of architects and registered
4313 interior designers. Fees shall be based on department estimates
4314 of the revenue required to implement this part and the
4315 provisions of law with respect to the regulation of architects
4316 and interior designers.
4317 Section 154. Subsection (1) of section 481.209, Florida
4318 Statutes, is amended to read:
4319 481.209 Examinations.—
4320 (1) A person desiring to be licensed as a registered
4321 architect by initial examination shall apply to the department,
4322 complete the application form, and remit a nonrefundable
4323 application fee. The department shall license any applicant who
4324 the department board certifies has passed the licensure
4325 examination prescribed by department board rule and is a
Page 173 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4326 graduate of a school or college of architecture with a program
4327 accredited by the National Architectural Accreditation Board.
4328 Section 155. Section 481.211, Florida Statutes, is amended
4329 to read:
4330 481.211 Architecture internship required.—An applicant for
4331 licensure as a registered architect shall complete, before
4332 licensure, an internship of diversified architectural experience
4333 approved by the department board, which meets the requirements
4334 set forth by rule.
4335 Section 156. Section 481.215, Florida Statutes, is amended
4336 to read:
4337 481.215 Renewal of license or certificate of
4338 registration.—
4339 (1) Subject to the requirement of subsection (3), The
4340 department shall renew a license or certificate of registration
4341 upon receipt of the renewal application and renewal fee.
4342 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
4343 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses and certificates
4344 of registration every 4 years.
4345 (3) A license or certificate of registration renewal may
4346 not be issued to an architect or a registered interior designer
4347 by the department until the licensee or registrant submits proof
4348 satisfactory to the department that, during the 2 years before
4349 application for renewal, the licensee or registrant participated
4350 per biennium in not less than 20 hours of at least 50 minutes
Page 174 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4351 each per biennium of continuing education approved by the board.
4352 The board shall approve only continuing education that builds
4353 upon the basic knowledge of architecture or interior design. The
4354 board may make exception from the requirements of continuing
4355 education in emergency or hardship cases.
4356 (4) The board shall by rule establish criteria for the
4357 approval of continuing education courses and providers and shall
4358 by rule establish criteria for accepting alternative
4359 nonclassroom continuing education on an hour-for-hour basis.
4360 (5) For a license or certificate of registration, the
4361 board shall require, by rule adopted pursuant to ss. 120.536(1)
4362 and 120.54, 2 hours in specialized or advanced courses on any
4363 portion of the Florida Building Code, adopted pursuant to part
4364 IV of chapter 553, relating to the licensee's respective area of
4365 practice. Such hours count toward the continuing education hours
4366 required under subsection (3). A licensee may complete the
4367 courses required under this subsection online.
4368 Section 157. Section 481.217, Florida Statutes, is amended
4369 to read:
4370 481.217 Inactive status.—
4371 (1) The board may prescribe by rule continuing education
4372 requirements as a condition of reactivating a license. The rules
4373 may not require more than one renewal cycle of continuing
4374 education to reactivate a license or registration for a
4375 registered architect or registered interior designer.
Page 175 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4376 (2) The department board shall adopt rules relating to
4377 application procedures for inactive status and for the
4378 reactivation of inactive licenses and registrations.
4379 Section 158. Subsection (2), paragraph (b) of subsection
4380 (3), and subsection (5) of section 481.219, Florida Statutes,
4381 are amended to read:
4382 481.219 Qualification of business organizations.—
4383 (2) If a licensee or an applicant proposes to engage in
4384 the practice of architecture as a business organization, the
4385 licensee or applicant shall qualify the business organization
4386 upon approval of the department board.
4387 (3)
4388 (b) In the event a qualifying agent ceases employment with
4389 a qualified business organization, the department executive
4390 director or the chair of the board may authorize another
4391 registered architect employed by the business organization to
4392 temporarily serve as its qualifying agent for a period of no
4393 more than 60 days. The business organization may is not
4394 authorized to operate beyond such period under this chapter
4395 absent replacement of the qualifying agent who has ceased
4396 employment.
4397 (5) The department board shall allow a licensee or an
4398 applicant to qualify one or more business organizations to offer
4399 architectural services, or to use a fictitious name to offer
4400 such services, if one or more of the principal officers of the
Page 176 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4401 corporation or limited liability company, or one or more
4402 partners of the partnership, and all personnel of the
4403 corporation, limited liability company, or partnership who act
4404 in its behalf in this state as architects, are registered as
4405 provided by this part.
4406 Section 159. Subsections (1), (2), (6), (11), and (12) of
4407 section 481.221, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4408 481.221 Seals; display of certificate number.—
4409 (1) The department board shall prescribe, by rule, one or
4410 more forms of seals to be used by registered architects holding
4411 valid certificates of registration.
4412 (2) Each registered architect shall obtain one seal in a
4413 form approved by rule of the department board and may, in
4414 addition, register her or his seal electronically in accordance
4415 with ss. 668.001-668.006. All final construction documents and
4416 instruments of service which include drawings, plans,
4417 specifications, or reports prepared or issued by the registered
4418 architect and being filed for public record shall bear the
4419 signature and seal of the registered architect who prepared or
4420 approved the document and the date on which they were sealed.
4421 The signature, date, and seal shall be evidence of the
4422 authenticity of that to which they are affixed. Final plans,
4423 specifications, or reports prepared or issued by a registered
4424 architect may be transmitted electronically and may be signed by
4425 the registered architect, dated, and sealed electronically with
Page 177 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4426 the seal in accordance with ss. 668.001-668.006.
4427 (6) A No registered architect may not shall affix her or
4428 his signature or seal to any final construction document or
4429 instrument of service which includes drawings, plans,
4430 specifications, or architectural documents which were not
4431 prepared by her or him or under her or his responsible
4432 supervising control or by another registered architect and
4433 reviewed, approved, or modified and adopted by her or him as her
4434 or his own work according to rules adopted by the department
4435 board.
4436 (11) When the certificate of registration of a registered
4437 architect or interior designer has been revoked or suspended by
4438 the department board, the registered architect or interior
4439 designer shall surrender her or his seal to the secretary of the
4440 department board within a period of 30 days after the revocation
4441 or suspension has become effective. If the certificate of the
4442 registered architect or interior designer has been suspended for
4443 a period of time, her or his seal shall be returned to her or
4444 him upon expiration of the suspension period.
4445 (12) A person may not sign and seal by any means any final
4446 plan, specification, or report after her or his certificate of
4447 registration has expired or is suspended or revoked. A
4448 registered architect or interior designer whose certificate of
4449 registration is suspended or revoked shall, within 30 days after
4450 the effective date of the suspension or revocation, surrender
Page 178 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4451 her or his seal to the secretary of the department executive
4452 director of the board and confirm in writing to the secretary
4453 executive director the cancellation of the registered
4454 architect's or interior designer's electronic signature in
4455 accordance with ss. 668.001-668.006. When a registered
4456 architect's or interior designer's certificate of registration
4457 is suspended for a period of time, her or his seal shall be
4458 returned upon expiration of the period of suspension.
4459 Section 160. Section 481.222, Florida Statutes, is amended
4460 to read:
4461 481.222 Architects performing building code inspection
4462 services.—Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person
4463 who is currently licensed to practice as an architect under this
4464 part may provide building code inspection services described in
4465 s. 468.603(4) and (7) s. 468.603(5) and (8) to a local
4466 government or state agency upon its request, without being
4467 certified by the Florida Building Code Administrators and
4468 Inspectors licensing program Board under part XII of chapter
4469 468. With respect to the performance of such building code
4470 inspection services, the architect is subject to the
4471 disciplinary guidelines of this part and s. 468.621(1)(c)-(h).
4472 Any complaint processing, investigation, and discipline that
4473 arise out of an architect's performance of building code
4474 inspection services shall be conducted by the department Board
4475 of Architecture and Interior Design rather than the Florida
Page 179 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4476 Building Code Administrators and Inspectors Board. An architect
4477 may not perform plans review as an employee of a local
4478 government upon any job that the architect or the architect's
4479 company designed.
4480 Section 161. Paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (1) of
4481 section 481.223, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4482 481.223 Prohibitions; penalties; injunctive relief.—
4483 (1) A person may not knowingly:
4484 (a) Practice architecture unless the person is an
4485 architect or a registered architect; however, a licensed
4486 architect who has been licensed by the department board and who
4487 chooses to relinquish or not to renew his or her license may use
4488 the title "Architect, Retired" but may not otherwise render any
4489 architectural services.
4490 (d) Give false or forged evidence to the department board
4491 or a member thereof.
4492 Section 162. Paragraphs (a), (g), and (i) of subsection
4493 (1) and subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 481.225,
4494 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4495 481.225 Disciplinary proceedings against registered
4496 architects.—
4497 (1) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
4498 disciplinary actions in subsection (3) may be taken:
4499 (a) Violating any provision of s. 455.227(1), s. 481.221,
4500 or s. 481.223, or any rule of the board or department lawfully
Page 180 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4501 adopted pursuant to this part or chapter 455.
4502 (g) Committing an act of fraud or deceit, or of
4503 negligence, incompetency, or misconduct, in the practice of
4504 architecture, including, but not limited to, allowing the
4505 preparation of any architectural studies, plans, or other
4506 instruments of service in an office that does not have a full-
4507 time Florida-registered architect assigned to such office or
4508 failing to ensure the responsible supervising control of
4509 services or projects, as required by department board rule.
4510 (i) Aiding, assisting, procuring, or advising any
4511 unlicensed person to practice architecture contrary to this part
4512 or to a rule of the department or the board.
4513 (2) The department board shall specify, by rule, what acts
4514 or omissions constitute a violation of subsection (1).
4515 (3) When the department board finds any registered
4516 architect guilty of any of the grounds set forth in subsection
4517 (1), it may enter an order imposing one or more of the following
4518 penalties:
4519 (a) Denial of an application for licensure.
4520 (b) Revocation or suspension of a license.
4521 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
4522 $1,000 for each count or separate offense and a fine of up to
4523 $5,000 for matters pertaining to a material violation of the
4524 Florida Building Code as reported by a local jurisdiction.
4525 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
Page 181 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4526 (e) Placement of the registered architect on probation for
4527 a period of time and subject to such conditions as the
4528 department board may specify, including requiring the registered
4529 architect to attend continuing education courses or to work
4530 under the supervision of another registered architect.
4531 (f) Restriction of the authorized scope of practice by the
4532 registered architect.
4533 (4) The department shall reissue the license of a
4534 disciplined registered architect upon certification by the board
4535 that he or she has complied with all of the terms and conditions
4536 set forth in the final order.
4537 Section 163. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and
4538 subsection (2) of section 481.2251, Florida Statutes, are
4539 amended to read:
4540 481.2251 Disciplinary proceedings against registered
4541 interior designers.—
4542 (1) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
4543 disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may be taken:
4544 (a) Attempting to register or renewing registration by
4545 bribery, by fraudulent misrepresentation, or through an error of
4546 the department board;
4547 (2) When the department board finds any person guilty of
4548 any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1), it may enter an
4549 order taking the following action or imposing one or more of the
4550 following penalties:
Page 182 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4551 (a) Refusal to register the applicant;
4552 (b) Refusal to renew an existing registration;
4553 (c) Removal from the state registry; or
4554 (d) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
4555 $500 for each violation or separate offense and a fine of up to
4556 $2,500 for matters pertaining to a material violation of the
4557 Florida Building Code as reported by a local jurisdiction.
4558 Section 164. Subsection (1) of section 481.303, Florida
4559 Statutes, is amended to read:
4560 481.303 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
4561 (1) "Board" means the Board of Landscape Architecture.
4562 Section 165. Section 481.306, Florida Statutes, is amended
4563 to read:
4564 481.306 Authority to make rules.—The department may board
4565 has authority to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and
4566 120.54 to implement the provisions of this chapter and chapter
4567 455 conferring duties upon it.
4568 Section 166. Section 481.307, Florida Statutes, is amended
4569 to read:
4570 481.307 Fees.—The department board, by rule, may establish
4571 fees to be paid for applications, examination, reexamination,
4572 licensing and renewal, delinquency, reinstatement, and
4573 recordmaking and recordkeeping. The examination fee shall be in
4574 an amount that covers the costs of obtaining and administering
4575 the examination and shall be refunded if the applicant is found
Page 183 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4576 ineligible to sit for the examination. The application fee is
4577 nonrefundable. The combined fees for initial application and
4578 examination may not exceed $800 plus the actual per applicant
4579 cost to the department for purchase of portions of the
4580 examination from the Council of Landscape Architectural
4581 Registration Boards or a similar national organization. The
4582 biennial renewal fee may not exceed $600. The delinquency fee
4583 may not exceed the biennial renewal fee established by the
4584 department board for an active license. The department board
4585 shall establish fees that are adequate to ensure the continued
4586 operation of the department board and to fund the proportionate
4587 expenses incurred by the department which are allocated to the
4588 regulation of landscape architects. Fees shall be based on
4589 department estimates of the revenue required to implement this
4590 part and the provisions of law with respect to the regulation of
4591 landscape architects.
4592 Section 167. Subsection (1) of section 481.309, Florida
4593 Statutes, is amended to read:
4594 481.309 Examinations.—
4595 (1) A person desiring to be licensed as a registered
4596 landscape architect shall apply to the department to take the
4597 licensure examination. The department shall examine each
4598 applicant who the department board certifies:
4599 (a) Has completed the application form and remitted a
4600 nonrefundable application fee and an examination fee which is
Page 184 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4601 refundable if the applicant is found to be ineligible to take
4602 the examination; and
4603 (b)1. Has completed a professional degree program in
4604 landscape architecture as approved by the department Landscape
4605 Architectural Accreditation Board; or
4606 2. Presents evidence of not less than 6 years of actual
4607 practical experience in landscape architectural work of a grade
4608 and character satisfactory to the department board. Each year of
4609 education completed in a recognized school shall be considered
4610 to be equivalent to 1 year of experience, with a maximum credit
4611 of 4 years.
4612 Section 168. Section 481.310, Florida Statutes, is amended
4613 to read:
4614 481.310 Practical experience requirement.—Beginning
4615 October 1, 1990, every applicant for licensure as a registered
4616 landscape architect shall demonstrate, before prior to
4617 licensure, 1 year of practical experience in landscape
4618 architectural work. An applicant who holds a master of landscape
4619 architecture degree and a bachelor's degree in a related field
4620 is not required to demonstrate 1 year of practical experience in
4621 landscape architectural work to obtain licensure. The department
4622 board shall adopt rules providing standards for the required
4623 experience. An applicant who qualifies for examination pursuant
4624 to s. 481.309(1)(b)1. may obtain the practical experience after
4625 completing the required professional degree. Experience used to
Page 185 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4626 qualify for examination pursuant to s. 481.309(1)(b)2. may not
4627 be used to satisfy the practical experience requirement under
4628 this section.
4629 Section 169. Section 481.311, Florida Statutes, is amended
4630 to read:
4631 481.311 Licensure.—
4632 (1) The department shall license any applicant who the
4633 department board certifies is qualified to practice landscape
4634 architecture and who has paid the initial licensure fee.
4635 (2) The department board shall certify for licensure any
4636 applicant who:
4637 (a) Passes the examination required by s. 481.309; and
4638 (b) Satisfies the experience requirement of s. 481.310.
4639 (3) The department board shall certify as qualified for a
4640 license by endorsement an applicant who:
4641 (a) Qualifies to take the examination as set forth in s.
4642 481.309; and has passed a national, regional, state, or
4643 territorial licensing examination which is substantially
4644 equivalent to the examination required by s. 481.309;
4645 (b) Holds a valid license to practice landscape
4646 architecture issued by another state or territory of the United
4647 States, if the criteria for issuance of such license were
4648 substantially identical to the licensure criteria which existed
4649 in this state at the time the license was issued; or
4650 (c) Has held a valid license to practice landscape
Page 186 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4651 architecture in another state or territory of the United States
4652 for at least 10 years before the date of application and has
4653 successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other
4654 examination that is equivalent to or more stringent than the
4655 examination required by the department board, subject to
4656 subsection (5). An applicant who has met the requirements to be
4657 qualified for a license by endorsement, except for successful
4658 completion of an examination that is equivalent to or more
4659 stringent than the examination required by the department board,
4660 may take the examination required by the department board
4661 without completing additional education requirements. Such
4662 application must be submitted to the department board while the
4663 applicant holds a valid license in another state or territory or
4664 within 2 years after the expiration of such license.
4665 (4) The department board may refuse to certify any
4666 applicant who is under investigation in any jurisdiction for any
4667 act which would constitute a violation of this act or of chapter
4668 455, until the investigation is complete and disciplinary
4669 proceedings have been terminated.
4670 (5) The department board may refuse to certify any
4671 applicant who has violated any of the provisions of s. 481.325.
4672 Section 170. Subsections (2) through (5) of section
4673 481.313, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4674 481.313 Renewal of license.—
4675 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
Page 187 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4676 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses every 4 years.
4677 (3) No license renewal shall be issued to a landscape
4678 architect by the department until the licensee submits proof,
4679 satisfactory to the department, that during the 2-year period
4680 prior to application for renewal, the licensee participated in
4681 such continuing education courses required by the board. The
4682 board shall approve only continuing education courses that
4683 relate to and increase the basic knowledge of landscape
4684 architecture. The board may make an exception from the
4685 requirements of continuing education in emergency or hardship
4686 cases.
4687 (4) The board, by rule adopted pursuant to ss. 120.536(1)
4688 and 120.54, shall establish criteria for the approval of
4689 continuing education courses and providers, and shall by rule
4690 establish criteria for accepting alternative nonclassroom
4691 continuing education on an hour-for-hour basis. A landscape
4692 architect shall receive hour-for-hour credit for attending
4693 continuing education courses approved by the Landscape
4694 Architecture Continuing Education System or another nationally
4695 recognized clearinghouse for continuing education that relate to
4696 and increase his or her basic knowledge of landscape
4697 architecture, as determined by the board, if the landscape
4698 architect submits proof satisfactory to the board that such
4699 course was approved by the Landscape Architecture Continuing
4700 Education System or another nationally recognized clearinghouse
Page 188 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4701 for continuing education, along with the syllabus or outline for
4702 such course and proof of course attendance.
4703 (5) The board shall require, by rule adopted pursuant to
4704 ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54, a specified number of hours in
4705 specialized or advanced courses, approved by the Florida
4706 Building Commission, on any portion of the Florida Building
4707 Code, adopted pursuant to part IV of chapter 553, relating to
4708 the licensee's respective area of practice.
4709 Section 171. Section 481.315, Florida Statutes, is amended
4710 to read:
4711 481.315 Inactive status.—
4712 (1) A license that has become inactive or delinquent may
4713 be reactivated under this section upon application to the
4714 department and payment of any applicable biennial renewal or
4715 delinquency fee, or both, and a reactivation fee. The board may
4716 not require a licensee to complete more than one renewal cycle
4717 of continuing education requirements.
4718 (2) The department board shall adopt rules relating to
4719 application procedures for inactive status and for the
4720 reactivation of inactive licenses.
4721 Section 172. Subsection (1) of section 481.317, Florida
4722 Statutes, is amended to read:
4723 481.317 Temporary certificates.—
4724 (1) Upon the approval by the department board and payment
4725 of the fee set in s. 481.307, the department shall grant a
Page 189 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4726 temporary certificate of registration for work on a specified
4727 project in this state for a period not to exceed 1 year to an
4728 applicant who is licensed in another state or territory to
4729 practice landscape architecture.
4730 Section 173. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
4731 481.323, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
4732 481.323 Prohibitions; penalties.—
4733 (1) A person may not knowingly:
4734 (d) Give false or forged evidence to the department board
4735 or a member thereof;
4736 Section 174. Subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section
4737 481.325, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4738 481.325 Disciplinary proceedings.—
4739 (2) The department board shall specify, by rule, what acts
4740 or omissions constitute a violation of subsection (1).
4741 (3) When the department board finds any registered
4742 landscape architect guilty of any of the grounds set forth in
4743 subsection (1), it may enter an order imposing one or more of
4744 the following penalties:
4745 (a) Denial of an application for licensure.
4746 (b) Revocation or suspension of a license.
4747 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
4748 $1,000 for each count or separate offense and a fine of up to
4749 $5,000 for matters pertaining to a material violation of the
4750 Florida Building Code as reported by a local jurisdiction.
Page 190 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4751 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
4752 (e) Placement of the registered landscape architect on
4753 probation for a period of time and subject to such conditions as
4754 the department board may specify, including requiring the
4755 registered landscape architect to attend continuing education
4756 courses or to work under the supervision of another registered
4757 landscape architect.
4758 (f) Restriction of the authorized scope of practice by the
4759 registered landscape architect.
4760 (4) The department shall reissue the license of a
4761 disciplined registered landscape architect upon certification by
4762 the board that she or he has complied with all of the terms and
4763 conditions set forth in the final order.
4764 Section 175. Paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of section
4765 489.103, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
4766 489.103 Exemptions.—This part does not apply to:
4767 (7)
4768 (c) To qualify for exemption under this subsection, an
4769 owner must personally appear and sign the building permit
4770 application and must satisfy local permitting agency
4771 requirements, if any, proving that the owner has a complete
4772 understanding of the owner's obligations under the law as
4773 specified in the disclosure statement in this section. However,
4774 for purposes of implementing a "United States Department of
4775 Energy SunShot Initiative: Rooftop Solar Challenge" grant and
Page 191 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4776 the participation of county and municipal governments, including
4777 local permitting agencies under the jurisdiction of such county
4778 and municipal governments, an owner's notarized signature or
4779 personal appearance to sign the permit application is not
4780 required for a solar project, as described in subparagraph
4781 (a)3., if the building permit application is submitted
4782 electronically to the permitting agency and the owner certifies
4783 the application and disclosure statement using the permitting
4784 agency's electronic confirmation system. If any person violates
4785 the requirements of this subsection, the local permitting agency
4786 shall withhold final approval, revoke the permit, or pursue any
4787 action or remedy for unlicensed activity against the owner and
4788 any person performing work that requires licensure under the
4789 permit issued. The local permitting agency shall provide the
4790 person with a disclosure statement in substantially the
4791 following form:
4792 DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
4793 1. I understand that state law requires construction to be done
4794 by a licensed contractor and have applied for an owner-builder
4795 permit under an exemption from the law. The exemption specifies
4796 that I, as the owner of the property listed, may act as my own
4797 contractor with certain restrictions even though I do not have a
4798 license.
4799 2. I understand that building permits are not required to be
4800 signed by a property owner unless he or she is responsible for
Page 192 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4801 the construction and is not hiring a licensed contractor to
4802 assume responsibility.
4803 3. I understand that, as an owner-builder, I am the responsible
4804 party of record on a permit. I understand that I may protect
4805 myself from potential financial risk by hiring a licensed
4806 contractor and having the permit filed in his or her name
4807 instead of my own name. I also understand that a contractor is
4808 required by law to be licensed in Florida and to list his or her
4809 license numbers on permits and contracts.
4810 4. I understand that I may build or improve a one-family or
4811 two-family residence or a farm outbuilding. I may also build or
4812 improve a commercial building if the costs do not exceed
4813 $75,000. The building or residence must be for my own use or
4814 occupancy. It may not be built or substantially improved for
4815 sale or lease, unless I am completing the requirements of a
4816 building permit where the contractor listed on the permit
4817 substantially completed the project. If a building or residence
4818 that I have built or substantially improved myself is sold or
4819 leased within 1 year after the construction is complete, the law
4820 will presume that I built or substantially improved it for sale
4821 or lease, which violates the exemption.
4822 5. I understand that, as the owner-builder, I must provide
4823 direct, onsite supervision of the construction.
4824 6. I understand that I may not hire an unlicensed person to act
4825 as my contractor or to supervise persons working on my building
Page 193 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4826 or residence. It is my responsibility to ensure that the persons
4827 whom I employ have the licenses required by law and by county or
4828 municipal ordinance.
4829 7. I understand that it is a frequent practice of unlicensed
4830 persons to have the property owner obtain an owner-builder
4831 permit that erroneously implies that the property owner is
4832 providing his or her own labor and materials. I, as an owner-
4833 builder, may be held liable and subjected to serious financial
4834 risk for any injuries sustained by an unlicensed person or his
4835 or her employees while working on my property. My homeowner's
4836 insurance may not provide coverage for those injuries. I am
4837 willfully acting as an owner-builder and am aware of the limits
4838 of my insurance coverage for injuries to workers on my property.
4839 8. I understand that I may not delegate the responsibility for
4840 supervising work to a licensed contractor who is not licensed to
4841 perform the work being done. Any person working on my building
4842 who is not licensed must work under my direct supervision and
4843 must be employed by me, which means that I must comply with laws
4844 requiring the withholding of federal income tax and social
4845 security contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions
4846 Act (FICA) and must provide workers' compensation for the
4847 employee. I understand that my failure to follow these laws may
4848 subject me to serious financial risk.
4849 9. I agree that, as the party legally and financially
4850 responsible for this proposed construction activity, I will
Page 194 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4851 abide by all applicable laws and requirements that govern owner-
4852 builders as well as employers. I also understand that the
4853 construction must comply with all applicable laws, ordinances,
4854 building codes, and zoning regulations.
4855 10. I understand that I may obtain more information regarding
4856 my obligations as an employer from the Internal Revenue Service,
4857 the United States Small Business Administration, the Florida
4858 Department of Financial Services, and the Florida Department of
4859 Revenue. I also understand that I may contact the Florida
4860 Department of Business and Professional Regulation Construction
4861 Industry Licensing Board at ...(telephone number)... or
4862 ...(Internet website address)... for more information about
4863 licensed contractors.
4864 11. I am aware of, and consent to, an owner-builder building
4865 permit applied for in my name and understand that I am the party
4866 legally and financially responsible for the proposed
4867 construction activity at the following address: ...(address of
4868 property)....
4869 12. I agree to notify ...(issuer of disclosure statements)...
4870 immediately of any additions, deletions, or changes to any of
4871 the information that I have provided on this disclosure.
4872 Licensed contractors are regulated by laws designed to protect
4873 the public. If you contract with a person who does not have a
4874 license, the Construction Industry Licensing Board and
4875 Department of Business and Professional Regulation may be unable
Page 195 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4876 to assist you with any financial loss that you sustain as a
4877 result of a complaint. Your only remedy against an unlicensed
4878 contractor may be in civil court. It is also important for you
4879 to understand that, if an unlicensed contractor or employee of
4880 an individual or firm is injured while working on your property,
4881 you may be held liable for damages. If you obtain an owner-
4882 builder permit and wish to hire a licensed contractor, you will
4883 be responsible for verifying whether the contractor is properly
4884 licensed and the status of the contractor's workers'
4885 compensation coverage.
4886 Before a building permit can be issued, this disclosure
4887 statement must be completed and signed by the property owner and
4888 returned to the local permitting agency responsible for issuing
4889 the permit. A copy of the property owner's driver license, the
4890 notarized signature of the property owner, or other type of
4891 verification acceptable to the local permitting agency is
4892 required when the permit is issued.
4893 Signature: ...(signature of property owner)....
4894 Date: ...(date)....
4895 Section 176. Subsections (2) through (19) of section
4896 489.105, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (1)
4897 through (18), respectively, and subsection (1) and present
4898 subsection (6) of that section are amended to read:
4899 489.105 Definitions.—As used in this part:
4900 (1) "Board" means the Construction Industry Licensing
Page 196 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4901 Board.
4902 (5)(6) "Contracting" means, except as exempted in this
4903 part, engaging in business as a contractor and includes, but is
4904 not limited to, performance of any of the acts as set forth in
4905 subsection (2) (3) which define types of contractors. The
4906 attempted sale of contracting services and the negotiation or
4907 bid for a contract on these services also constitutes
4908 contracting. If the services offered require licensure or agent
4909 qualification, the offering, negotiation for a bid, or attempted
4910 sale of these services requires the corresponding licensure.
4911 However, the term "contracting" does shall not extend to an
4912 individual, partnership, corporation, trust, or other legal
4913 entity that offers to sell or sells completed residences on
4914 property on which the individual or business entity has any
4915 legal or equitable interest, or to the individual or business
4916 entity that offers to sell or sells manufactured or factory-
4917 built buildings that will be completed on site on property on
4918 which either party to a contract has any legal or equitable
4919 interest, if the services of a qualified contractor certified or
4920 registered pursuant to the requirements of this chapter have
4921 been or will be retained for the purpose of constructing or
4922 completing such residences.
4923 Section 177. Section 489.108, Florida Statutes, is amended
4924 to read:
4925 489.108 Rulemaking authority.—The department may board has
Page 197 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4926 authority to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54
4927 to implement the provisions of this chapter conferring duties
4928 upon it.
4929 Section 178. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 489.109,
4930 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4931 489.109 Fees.—
4932 (1) The department board, by rule, shall establish
4933 reasonable fees to be paid for applications, certification and
4934 renewal, registration and renewal, and recordmaking and
4935 recordkeeping. The fees shall be established as follows:
4936 (a) With respect to an applicant for a certificate, the
4937 initial application fee may not exceed $150, and, if an
4938 examination cost is included in the application fee, the
4939 combined amount may not exceed $350. The initial certification
4940 fee and the renewal fee may not exceed $250. However, any
4941 applicant who seeks certification under this part by taking a
4942 practical examination must pay as an examination fee the actual
4943 cost incurred by the department in developing, preparing,
4944 administering, scoring, score reporting, and evaluating the
4945 examination, if the examination is conducted by the department.
4946 (b) With respect to an applicant for registration, the
4947 initial application fee may not exceed $100, and the initial
4948 registration fee and the renewal fee may not exceed $200.
4949 (c) The department board, by rule, may establish
4950 delinquency fees, not to exceed the applicable renewal fee for
Page 198 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4951 renewal applications made after the expiration date of the
4952 certificate or registration.
4953 (d) With respect to an application for registration or
4954 certification to qualify a business organization, the initial
4955 application fee and the renewal fee shall be $50.
4956 (e) The department board, by rule, shall impose a renewal
4957 fee for an inactive status certificate or registration, not to
4958 exceed the renewal fee for an active status certificate or
4959 registration. Neither the inactive certification fee nor the
4960 inactive registration fee may exceed $50. The department board,
4961 by rule, may provide for a different fee for inactive status
4962 where such status is sought by a building code administrator,
4963 plans examiner, or inspector certified pursuant to part XII of
4964 chapter 468 who is employed by a local government and is not
4965 allowed by the terms of such employment to maintain a
4966 certificate on active status issued pursuant to this part.
4967 (f) The department board, by rule, shall impose an
4968 additional late fee on a delinquent status certificateholder or
4969 registrant when such certificateholder or registrant applies for
4970 active or inactive status.
4971 (g) The department board, by rule, shall impose an
4972 additional fee, not to exceed the applicable renewal fee, which
4973 reasonably reflects the costs of processing a
4974 certificateholder's or registrant's request to change licensure
4975 status at any time other than at the beginning of a licensure
Page 199 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
4976 cycle.
4977 (2) The board shall establish fees that are adequate to
4978 ensure the continued operation of the board. Fees shall be based
4979 on department estimates of the revenue required to implement
4980 this part and the provisions of law with respect to the
4981 regulation of the construction industry.
4982 Section 179. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) and
4983 subsection (3) of section 489.111, Florida Statutes, are amended
4984 to read:
4985 489.111 Licensure by examination.—
4986 (2) A person shall be eligible for licensure by
4987 examination if the person:
4988 (c) Meets eligibility requirements according to one of the
4989 following criteria:
4990 1. Has received a baccalaureate degree from an accredited
4991 4-year college in the appropriate field of engineering,
4992 architecture, or building construction and has 1 year of proven
4993 experience in the category in which the person seeks to qualify.
4994 For the purpose of this part, a minimum of 2,000 person-hours
4995 shall be used in determining full-time equivalency. An applicant
4996 who is exempt from passing an examination under s. 489.113(1) is
4997 eligible for a license under this section.
4998 2. Has a total of at least 4 years of active experience as
4999 a worker who has learned the trade by serving an apprenticeship
5000 as a skilled worker who is able to command the rate of a
Page 200 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5001 mechanic in the particular trade or as a foreman who is in
5002 charge of a group of workers and usually is responsible to a
5003 superintendent or a contractor or his or her equivalent;
5004 provided, however, that at least 1 year of active experience
5005 shall be as a foreman.
5006 3. Has a combination of not less than 1 year of experience
5007 as a foreman and not less than 3 years of credits for any
5008 accredited college-level courses; has a combination of not less
5009 than 1 year of experience as a skilled worker, 1 year of
5010 experience as a foreman, and not less than 2 years of credits
5011 for any accredited college-level courses; or has a combination
5012 of not less than 2 years of experience as a skilled worker, 1
5013 year of experience as a foreman, and not less than 1 year of
5014 credits for any accredited college-level courses. All junior
5015 college or community college-level courses shall be considered
5016 accredited college-level courses.
5017 4.a. An active certified residential contractor is
5018 eligible to receive a certified building contractor license
5019 after passing or having previously passed the building
5020 contractors' examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 3
5021 years of proven experience in the classification in which he or
5022 she is certified.
5023 b. An active certified residential contractor is eligible
5024 to receive a certified general contractor license after passing
5025 or having previously passed the general contractors' examination
Page 201 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5026 if he or she possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience
5027 in the classification in which he or she is certified.
5028 c. An active certified building contractor is eligible to
5029 receive a certified general contractor license after passing or
5030 having previously passed the general contractors' examination if
5031 he or she possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in
5032 the classification in which he or she is certified.
5033 5.a. An active certified air-conditioning Class C
5034 contractor is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning
5035 Class B contractor license after passing or having previously
5036 passed the air-conditioning Class B contractors' examination if
5037 he or she possesses a minimum of 3 years of proven experience in
5038 the classification in which he or she is certified.
5039 b. An active certified air-conditioning Class C contractor
5040 is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning Class A
5041 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the
5042 air-conditioning Class A contractors' examination if he or she
5043 possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in the
5044 classification in which he or she is certified.
5045 c. An active certified air-conditioning Class B contractor
5046 is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning Class A
5047 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the
5048 air-conditioning Class A contractors' examination if he or she
5049 possesses a minimum of 1 year of proven experience in the
5050 classification in which he or she is certified.
Page 202 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5051 6.a. An active certified swimming pool servicing
5052 contractor is eligible to receive a certified residential
5053 swimming pool contractor license after passing or having
5054 previously passed the residential swimming pool contractors'
5055 examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 3 years of
5056 proven experience in the classification in which he or she is
5057 certified.
5058 b. An active certified swimming pool servicing contractor
5059 is eligible to receive a certified commercial swimming pool
5060 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the
5061 swimming pool commercial contractors' examination if he or she
5062 possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in the
5063 classification in which he or she is certified.
5064 c. An active certified residential swimming pool
5065 contractor is eligible to receive a certified commercial
5066 swimming pool contractor license after passing or having
5067 previously passed the commercial swimming pool contractors'
5068 examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 1 year of proven
5069 experience in the classification in which he or she is
5070 certified.
5071 d. An applicant is eligible to receive a certified
5072 swimming pool/spa servicing contractor license after passing or
5073 having previously passed the swimming pool/spa servicing
5074 contractors' examination if he or she has satisfactorily
5075 completed 60 hours of instruction in courses related to the
Page 203 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5076 scope of work covered by that license and approved by the
5077 department Construction Industry Licensing Board by rule and has
5078 at least 1 year of proven experience related to the scope of
5079 work of such a contractor.
5080 (3)(a) The department board may refuse to certify an
5081 applicant for failure to satisfy the requirement of good moral
5082 character only if:
5083 1. There is a substantial connection between the lack of
5084 good moral character of the applicant and the professional
5085 responsibilities of a certified contractor; and
5086 2. The finding by the department board of lack of good
5087 moral character is supported by clear and convincing evidence.
5088 (b) When an applicant is found to be unqualified for a
5089 certificate because of a lack of good moral character, the
5090 department board shall furnish the applicant a statement
5091 containing the findings of the department board, a complete
5092 record of the evidence upon which the determination was based,
5093 and a notice of the rights of the applicant to a rehearing and
5094 appeal.
5095 Section 180. Subsections (1) and (2), paragraph (f) of
5096 subsection (3), and subsections (6), (7), and (8) of section
5097 489.113, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
5098 489.113 Qualifications for practice; restrictions.—
5099 (1) Any person who desires to engage in contracting on a
5100 statewide basis shall, as a prerequisite thereto, establish his
Page 204 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5101 or her competency and qualifications to be certified pursuant to
5102 this part. To establish competency, a person shall pass the
5103 appropriate examination approved by the board and certified by
5104 the department. If an applicant has received a baccalaureate
5105 degree in building construction from an accredited 4-year
5106 college, or a related degree as approved by the department board
5107 by rule, and has a grade point average of 3.0 or higher, such
5108 applicant is only required to take and pass the business and
5109 finance portion of the examination. Any person who desires to
5110 engage in contracting on other than a statewide basis shall, as
5111 a prerequisite thereto, be registered pursuant to this part,
5112 unless exempted by this part.
5113 (2) A person must be certified or registered in order to
5114 engage in the business of contracting in this state. However,
5115 for purposes of complying with the provisions of this chapter, a
5116 subcontractor who is not certified or registered may perform
5117 construction work under the supervision of a person who is
5118 certified or registered, provided that the work is within the
5119 scope of the supervising contractor's license, the supervising
5120 contractor is responsible for the work, and the subcontractor
5121 being supervised is not engaged in construction work that would
5122 require a license as a contractor under any of the categories
5123 listed in s. 489.105(2)(d)-(o) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(o). This
5124 subsection does not affect the application of any local
5125 construction licensing ordinances. To enforce this subsection:
Page 205 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5126 (a) The department shall issue a cease and desist order to
5127 prohibit any person from engaging in the business of contracting
5128 who does not hold the required certification or registration for
5129 the work being performed under this part. For the purpose of
5130 enforcing a cease and desist order, the department may file a
5131 proceeding in the name of the state seeking issuance of an
5132 injunction or a writ of mandamus against any person who violates
5133 any provision of such order.
5134 (b) A county, municipality, or local licensing board
5135 created by special act may issue a cease and desist order to
5136 prohibit any person from engaging in the business of contracting
5137 who does not hold the required certification or registration for
5138 the work being performed under this part.
5139 (3) A contractor shall subcontract all electrical,
5140 mechanical, plumbing, roofing, sheet metal, swimming pool, and
5141 air-conditioning work, unless such contractor holds a state
5142 certificate or registration in the respective trade category,
5143 however:
5144 (f) A solar contractor may shall not be required to
5145 subcontract minor, as defined by department board rule,
5146 electrical, mechanical, plumbing, or roofing work so long as
5147 that work is within the scope of the license held by the solar
5148 contractor and where such work exclusively pertains to the
5149 installation of residential solar energy equipment as defined by
5150 rules of the department board adopted in conjunction with the
Page 206 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5151 Electrical Contracting Licensing Board.
5152 (6)(a) The department board shall, by rule, designate
5153 those types of specialty contractors which may be certified
5154 under this part. The limit of the scope of work and
5155 responsibility of a specialty contractor shall be established by
5156 the department board by rule. However, a certified specialty
5157 contractor category established by department board rule exists
5158 as a voluntary statewide licensing category and does not create
5159 a mandatory licensing requirement. Any mandatory statewide
5160 construction contracting licensure requirement may only be
5161 established through specific statutory provision.
5162 (b) By July 1, 2025, the department board shall, by rule,
5163 establish certified specialty contractor categories for
5164 voluntary licensure for all of the following:
5165 1. Structural aluminum or screen enclosures.
5166 2. Marine seawall work.
5167 3. Marine bulkhead work.
5168 4. Marine dock work.
5169 5. Marine pile driving.
5170 6. Structural masonry.
5171 7. Structural prestressed, precast concrete work.
5172 8. Rooftop solar heating installation.
5173 9. Structural steel.
5174 10. Window and door installation, including garage door
5175 installation and hurricane or windstorm protection.
Page 207 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5176 11. Plaster and lath.
5177 12. Structural carpentry.
5178 (7) If an eligible applicant fails any contractor's
5179 written examination, except the general and building
5180 contractors' examination, and provides the department board with
5181 acceptable proof of lack of comprehension of written
5182 examinations, the applicant may petition the department board to
5183 be administered a uniform oral examination, subject to the
5184 following conditions:
5185 (a) The applicant documents 10 years of experience in the
5186 appropriate construction craft.
5187 (b) The applicant files written recommendations concerning
5188 his or her competency in the appropriate construction craft.
5189 (c) The applicant is administered only one oral
5190 examination within a period of 1 year.
5191 (8) Any public record of the department board, when
5192 certified by the department executive director of the board or
5193 the executive director's representative, may be received as
5194 prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial
5195 proceeding.
5196 Section 181. Subsection (1) of section 489.1131, Florida
5197 Statutes, is amended to read:
5198 489.1131 Credit for relevant military training and
5199 education.—
5200 (1) The department shall provide a method by which
Page 208 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5201 honorably discharged veterans may apply for licensure. The
5202 method must include a veteran-specific application and provide:
5203 (a) To the fullest extent possible, credit toward the
5204 requirements for licensure for military experience, training,
5205 and education received and completed during service in the
5206 United States Armed Forces if the military experience, training,
5207 or education is substantially similar to the experience,
5208 training, or education required for licensure.
5209 (b) Acceptance of up to 3 years of active duty service in
5210 the United States Armed Forces, regardless of duty or training,
5211 to meet the experience requirements of s. 489.111(2)(c). At
5212 least 1 additional year of active experience as a foreman in the
5213 trade, either civilian or military, is required to fulfill the
5214 experience requirement of s. 489.111(2)(c).
5215
5216 The department board may adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1)
5217 and 120.54 to implement this subsection.
5218 Section 182. Subsection (1) of section 489.1136, Florida
5219 Statutes, is amended to read:
5220 489.1136 Medical gas certification.—
5221 (1)(a) In addition to the certification or registration
5222 required to engage in business as a plumbing contractor, any
5223 plumbing contractor who wishes to engage in the business of
5224 installation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of any tubing,
5225 pipe, or similar conduit used to transport gaseous or partly
Page 209 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5226 gaseous substances for medical purposes shall take, as part of
5227 the contractor's continuing education requirement, at least once
5228 during the holding of such license, a course of at least 6 hours
5229 before the licensee's initial installation, improvement, repair,
5230 or maintenance of any tubing, pipe, or similar conduit used to
5231 transport gaseous or partly gaseous substances for medical
5232 purposes. Such course shall be given by an instructional
5233 facility or teaching entity that has been approved by the
5234 department board. In order for a course to be approved, the
5235 department board must find that the course is designed to teach
5236 familiarity with the National Fire Prevention Association
5237 Standard 99C (Standard on Gas and Vacuum Systems, latest
5238 edition) and also designed to teach familiarity and practical
5239 ability in performing and inspecting brazing duties required of
5240 medical gas installation, improvement, repair, or maintenance
5241 work. Such course shall issue a certificate of completion to the
5242 taker of the course, which certificate shall be available for
5243 inspection by any entity or person seeking to have such
5244 contractor engage in the business of installation, improvement,
5245 repair, or maintenance of a medical gas system.
5246 (b) Any other natural person who is employed by a licensed
5247 plumbing contractor to provide work on the installation,
5248 improvement, repair, or maintenance of a medical gas system,
5249 except as noted in paragraph (c), shall, as a prerequisite to
5250 his or her ability to provide such service, take a course
Page 210 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5251 approved by the department board. Such course shall be at least
5252 8 hours and consist of both classroom and practical work
5253 designed to teach familiarity with the National Fire Prevention
5254 Association Standard 99C (Standard on Gas and Vacuum Systems,
5255 latest edition) and also designed to teach familiarity and
5256 practical ability in performing and inspecting brazing duties
5257 required of medical gas installation, improvement, repair, or
5258 maintenance work. Such course shall also include the
5259 administration of a practical examination in the skills required
5260 to perform work as outlined above, including brazing, and each
5261 examination shall be reasonably constructed to test for
5262 knowledge of the subject matter. The person taking such course
5263 and examination must, upon successful completion of both, be
5264 issued a certificate of completion by the giver of such course,
5265 which certificate shall be made available by the holder for
5266 inspection by any person or entity seeking to have such person
5267 perform work on the installation, improvement, repair, or
5268 maintenance of a medical gas system.
5269 (c) Any other natural person who wishes to perform only
5270 brazing duties incidental to the installation, improvement,
5271 repair, or maintenance of a medical gas system shall pass an
5272 examination designed to show that person's familiarity with and
5273 practical ability in performing brazing duties required of
5274 medical gas installation, improvement, repair, or maintenance.
5275 Such examination shall be from a test approved by the department
Page 211 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5276 board. Such examination must test for knowledge of National Fire
5277 Prevention Association Standard 99C (Standard on Gas and Vacuum
5278 Systems, latest edition). The person taking such examination
5279 must, upon passing such examination, be issued a certificate of
5280 completion by the giver of such examination, and such
5281 certificate shall be made available by the holder for inspection
5282 by any person or entity seeking to have or employ such person to
5283 perform brazing duties on a medical gas system.
5284 (d) It is the responsibility of the licensed plumbing
5285 contractor to ascertain whether members of his or her workforce
5286 are in compliance with this subsection, and such contractor is
5287 subject to discipline under s. 489.129 for violation of this
5288 subsection.
5289 (e) Training programs in medical gas piping installation,
5290 improvement, repair, or maintenance shall be reviewed annually
5291 by the department board to ensure that programs have been
5292 provided equitably across the state.
5293 (f) Periodically, the department board shall review
5294 training programs in medical gas piping installation for quality
5295 in content and instruction in accordance with the National Fire
5296 Prevention Association Standard 99C (Standard on Gas and Vacuum
5297 Systems, latest edition). The department board shall also
5298 respond to complaints regarding approved programs.
5299 Section 183. Section 489.114, Florida Statutes, is amended
5300 to read:
Page 212 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5301 489.114 Evidence of workers' compensation coverage.—Except
5302 as provided in s. 489.115(5)(d), any person, business
5303 organization, or qualifying agent engaged in the business of
5304 contracting in this state and certified or registered under this
5305 part shall, as a condition precedent to the issuance or renewal
5306 of a certificate or registration of the contractor, provide to
5307 the department Construction Industry Licensing Board, as
5308 provided by department board rule, evidence of workers'
5309 compensation coverage pursuant to chapter 440. In the event that
5310 the Division of Workers' Compensation of the Department of
5311 Financial Services receives notice of the cancellation of a
5312 policy of workers' compensation insurance insuring a person or
5313 entity governed by this section, the Division of Workers'
5314 Compensation shall certify and identify all persons or entities
5315 by certification or registration license number to the
5316 department after verification is made by the Division of
5317 Workers' Compensation that persons or entities governed by this
5318 section are no longer covered by workers' compensation
5319 insurance. Such certification and verification by the Division
5320 of Workers' Compensation may result from records furnished to
5321 the Division of Workers' Compensation by the persons or entities
5322 governed by this section or an investigation completed by the
5323 Division of Workers' Compensation. The department shall notify
5324 the persons or entities governed by this section who have been
5325 determined to be in noncompliance with chapter 440, and the
Page 213 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5326 persons or entities notified shall provide certification of
5327 compliance with chapter 440 to the department and pay an
5328 administrative fine in the amount of $500. The failure to
5329 maintain workers' compensation coverage as required by law shall
5330 be grounds for the department board to revoke, suspend, or deny
5331 the issuance or renewal of a certificate or registration of the
5332 contractor under the provisions of s. 489.129.
5333 Section 184. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
5334 489.115, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (b), and
5335 paragraph (a) of subsection (2), subsection (3), present
5336 paragraph (b) of subsection (4), and subsections (5) through (9)
5337 of that section are amended to read:
5338 489.115 Certification and registration; endorsement;
5339 reciprocity; renewals; continuing education.—
5340 (2)(a) The department shall issue a certificate or
5341 registration to each person qualified by the department board
5342 and upon receipt of the original license fee.
5343 (3) The department board shall certify as qualified for
5344 certification by endorsement any applicant who:
5345 (a) Meets the requirements for certification as set forth
5346 in this section; has passed a national, regional, state, or
5347 United States territorial licensing examination that is
5348 substantially equivalent to the examination required by this
5349 part; and has satisfied the requirements set forth in s.
5350 489.111;
Page 214 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5351 (b) Holds a valid license to practice contracting issued
5352 by another state or territory of the United States, if the
5353 criteria for issuance of such license were substantially
5354 equivalent to Florida's current certification criteria;
5355 (c) Holds a valid, current license to practice contracting
5356 issued by another state or territory of the United States, if
5357 the state or territory has entered into a reciprocal agreement
5358 with the department board for the recognition of contractor
5359 licenses issued in that state, based on criteria for the
5360 issuance of such licenses that are substantially equivalent to
5361 the criteria for certification in this state; or
5362 (d) Has held a valid, current license to practice
5363 contracting issued by another state or territory of the United
5364 States for at least 10 years before the date of application and
5365 is applying for the same or similar license in this state,
5366 subject to subsections (5)-(8) (5)-(9). The department board may
5367 consider an applicant's technical competence to ensure the
5368 applicant is able to meet the requirements of this state's codes
5369 and standards for wind mitigation and water intrusion. The
5370 department board may also consider whether such applicant has
5371 had a license to practice contracting revoked, suspended, or
5372 otherwise acted against by the licensing authority of another
5373 state, territory, or country. Such application must be made
5374 either when the license in another state or territory is active
5375 or within 2 years after such license was last active. Division I
Page 215 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5376 contractors and roofing contractors must complete a 2-hour
5377 course on the Florida Building Code which includes information
5378 on wind mitigation techniques. The required courses may be
5379 completed online.
5380 (4)
5381 (b)1. Each certificateholder or registrant shall provide
5382 proof, in a form established by rule of the board, that the
5383 certificateholder or registrant has completed at least 14
5384 classroom hours of at least 50 minutes each of continuing
5385 education courses during each biennium since the issuance or
5386 renewal of the certificate or registration. The board shall
5387 establish by rule that a portion of the required 14 hours must
5388 deal with the subject of workers' compensation, business
5389 practices, workplace safety, and, for applicable licensure
5390 categories, wind mitigation methodologies, and 1 hour of which
5391 must deal with laws and rules. The board shall by rule establish
5392 criteria for the approval of continuing education courses and
5393 providers, including requirements relating to the content of
5394 courses and standards for approval of providers, and may by rule
5395 establish criteria for accepting alternative nonclassroom
5396 continuing education on an hour-for-hour basis. The board shall
5397 prescribe by rule the continuing education, if any, which is
5398 required during the first biennium of initial licensure. A
5399 person who has been licensed for less than an entire biennium
5400 must not be required to complete the full 14 hours of continuing
Page 216 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5401 education.
5402 2. In addition, the board may approve specialized
5403 continuing education courses on compliance with the wind
5404 resistance provisions for one and two family dwellings contained
5405 in the Florida Building Code and any alternate methodologies for
5406 providing such wind resistance which have been approved for use
5407 by the Florida Building Commission. Division I
5408 certificateholders or registrants who demonstrate proficiency
5409 upon completion of such specialized courses may certify plans
5410 and specifications for one and two family dwellings to be in
5411 compliance with the code or alternate methodologies, as
5412 appropriate, except for dwellings located in floodways or
5413 coastal hazard areas as defined in ss. 60.3D and E of the
5414 National Flood Insurance Program.
5415 3. The board shall require, by rule adopted pursuant to
5416 ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54, a specified number of hours in
5417 specialized or advanced module courses, approved by the Florida
5418 Building Commission, on any portion of the Florida Building
5419 Code, adopted pursuant to part IV of chapter 553, relating to
5420 the contractor's respective discipline.
5421 (5)(a) As a prerequisite to the initial issuance or the
5422 renewal of a certificate or registration, the applicant shall
5423 submit an affidavit on a form provided by the department board
5424 attesting to the fact that the applicant has obtained workers'
5425 compensation insurance as required by chapter 440, public
Page 217 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5426 liability insurance, and property damage insurance for the
5427 safety and welfare of the public, in amounts determined by rule
5428 of the department board. The department board shall by rule
5429 establish a procedure to verify the accuracy of such affidavits
5430 based upon a random sample method.
5431 (b) In addition to the affidavit of insurance, as a
5432 prerequisite to the initial issuance of a certificate, the
5433 applicant shall furnish a credit report from a nationally
5434 recognized credit agency that reflects the financial
5435 responsibility of the applicant and evidence of financial
5436 responsibility, credit, and business reputation of either
5437 himself or herself or the business organization he or she
5438 desires to qualify. The department board shall adopt rules
5439 defining financial responsibility based upon the applicant's
5440 credit history, ability to be bonded, and any history of
5441 bankruptcy or assignment of receivers. The department board may
5442 also adopt rules that would allow applicants to demonstrate
5443 financial responsibility, as an alternative to the foregoing, by
5444 providing minimum credit scores or bonds payable as prescribed
5445 for financially responsible officers. Such rules shall specify
5446 the financial responsibility grounds on which the department
5447 board may refuse to qualify an applicant for certification.
5448 (c) If, within 60 days from the date the applicant is
5449 notified that he or she has qualified, he or she does not
5450 provide the evidence required, he or she shall apply to the
Page 218 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5451 department for an extension of time which shall be granted upon
5452 a showing of just cause.
5453 (d) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate or
5454 registration shall submit as a prerequisite to qualifying for an
5455 exemption from workers' compensation coverage requirements under
5456 s. 440.05 an affidavit attesting to the fact that the applicant
5457 will obtain an exemption within 30 days after the date the
5458 initial certificate or registration is issued by the department
5459 board.
5460 (6) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate or
5461 registration shall submit to a statewide criminal history
5462 records check through the Department of Law Enforcement. The
5463 Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall submit
5464 the requests for the criminal history records check to the
5465 Department of Law Enforcement for state processing, and the
5466 Department of Law Enforcement shall return the results to the
5467 department to determine if the applicant meets certification or
5468 registration requirements. If the applicant has been convicted
5469 of a felony, the Department of Business and Professional
5470 Regulation board may deny licensure to the applicant based upon
5471 the severity of the crime, the relationship of the crime to
5472 contracting, or the potential for public harm. The department
5473 board shall also, in denying or approving licensure, consider
5474 the length of time since the commission of the crime and the
5475 rehabilitation of the applicant. The department board may not
Page 219 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5476 deny licensure to an applicant based solely upon a felony
5477 conviction or the applicant's failure to provide proof of
5478 restoration of civil rights.
5479 (7) An initial applicant shall, along with the
5480 application, and a certificateholder or registrant shall, upon
5481 requesting a change of status, submit to the department board a
5482 credit report from a nationally recognized credit agency that
5483 reflects the financial responsibility of the applicant or
5484 certificateholder or registrant. The credit report required for
5485 the initial applicant shall be considered the minimum evidence
5486 necessary to satisfy the department board that he or she is
5487 financially responsible to be certified, has the necessary
5488 credit and business reputation to engage in contracting in the
5489 state, and has the minimum financial stability necessary to
5490 avoid the problem of financial mismanagement or misconduct. The
5491 department board shall, by rule, adopt guidelines for
5492 determination of financial stability, which may include minimum
5493 requirements for net worth, cash, and bonding for Division I
5494 certificateholders of no more than $20,000 and for Division II
5495 certificateholders of no more than $10,000. Fifty percent of the
5496 financial requirements may be met by completing a 14-hour
5497 financial responsibility course approved by the department
5498 board.
5499 (8) If a certificateholder or registrant holds a license
5500 under both this part and part II and is required to have
Page 220 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5501 continuing education courses under s. 489.517(3), the
5502 certificateholder or registrant may apply those course hours for
5503 workers' compensation, workplace safety, and business practices
5504 obtained under part II to the requirements under this part.
5505 (8)(9) An initial applicant shall submit, along with the
5506 application, a complete set of fingerprints to the department.
5507 The fingerprints shall be submitted to the Department of Law
5508 Enforcement for state processing, and the Department of Law
5509 Enforcement shall forward them to the Federal Bureau of
5510 Investigation for national processing for the purpose of
5511 determining if the applicant has a criminal history record. The
5512 Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall and the
5513 board may review the background results to determine if an
5514 applicant meets licensure requirements. The cost for the
5515 fingerprint processing shall be borne by the person subject to
5516 the background screening. These fees are to be collected by the
5517 authorized agencies or vendors. The authorized agencies or
5518 vendors are responsible for paying the processing costs to the
5519 Department of Law Enforcement.
5520 Section 185. Subsections (7) and (8) of section 489.116,
5521 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (6) and (7),
5522 respectively, and subsections (2) through (6) and present
5523 subsection (7) of that section are amended, to read:
5524 489.116 Inactive and delinquent status; renewal and
5525 cancellation notices.—
Page 221 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5526 (2) The department board shall permit a certificateholder
5527 or registrant to elect, at the time of licensure renewal, an
5528 active or inactive status.
5529 (3) An inactive status certificateholder or registrant may
5530 change to active status at any time, if the certificateholder or
5531 registrant meets all requirements for active status, pays any
5532 additional licensure fees necessary to equal those imposed on an
5533 active status certificateholder or registrant, pays any
5534 applicable late fees, and meets all continuing education
5535 requirements prescribed by the department board.
5536 (4) A certificateholder or registrant shall apply with a
5537 completed application, as determined by department board rule,
5538 to renew an active or inactive status certificate or
5539 registration before the certificate or registration expires.
5540 Failure of a certificateholder or registrant to so apply shall
5541 cause the certificate or registration to become a delinquent
5542 certificate or registration. Further, any delinquent
5543 certificateholder or registrant who fails to apply to renew
5544 licensure on either active or inactive status before expiration
5545 of the current licensure cycle must reapply in the same manner
5546 as an applicant for initial certification or registration.
5547 (5) A delinquent status certificateholder or registrant
5548 must apply with a completed application, as determined by
5549 department board rule, for active or inactive status during the
5550 current licensure cycle. Failure by a delinquent status
Page 222 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5551 certificateholder or registrant to become active or inactive
5552 before the expiration of the current licensure cycle renders the
5553 certificate or registration void, and any subsequent licensure
5554 shall be subject to all procedures and requirements imposed on
5555 an applicant for initial licensure.
5556 (6) The board may not require an inactive
5557 certificateholder or registrant to complete more than one
5558 renewal cycle of continuing education for reactivating a
5559 certificate or registration.
5560 (6)(7) The status or any change in status of a
5561 certificateholder or registrant may shall not alter in any way
5562 the department's board's right to impose discipline or to
5563 enforce discipline previously imposed on a certificateholder or
5564 registrant for acts or omissions committed by the
5565 certificateholder or registrant while holding a certificate or
5566 registration.
5567 Section 186. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (1),
5568 subsection (2), paragraph (a) of subsection (3), and subsection
5569 (4) of section 489.117, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
5570 489.117 Registration; specialty contractors.—
5571 (1)(a) A person engaged in the business of a contractor as
5572 defined in s. 489.105(2)(a)-(o) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) must be
5573 registered before engaging in business as a contractor in this
5574 state, unless he or she is certified. Except as provided in
5575 paragraph (2)(b), to be initially registered, the applicant must
Page 223 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5576 submit the required fee and file evidence of successful
5577 compliance with the local examination and licensing
5578 requirements, if any, in the area for which registration is
5579 desired. An examination is not required for registration.
5580 (c) Each registrant shall report to the department board
5581 each local jurisdiction and each category of registration in
5582 which the registrant holds a certificate of competency or
5583 license, or where the registrant has been granted a certificate
5584 of competency or license by reciprocal agreement, for which
5585 registration is required by this part, within 30 days after
5586 obtaining such certificate or license.
5587 (2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), the department
5588 board may not issue a new registration after July 1, 1993, based
5589 on any certificate of competency or license for a category of
5590 contractor defined in s. 489.105(2)(a)-(o) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o)
5591 which is issued by a municipal or county government that does
5592 not exercise disciplinary control and oversight over such
5593 locally licensed contractors, including forwarding a recommended
5594 order in each action to the department board as provided in s.
5595 489.131(7). For purposes of this subsection and s. 489.131(10),
5596 the department board shall determine the adequacy of such
5597 disciplinary control by reviewing the local government's ability
5598 to process and investigate complaints and to take disciplinary
5599 action against locally licensed contractors.
5600 (b) The department board shall issue a registration to an
Page 224 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5601 eligible applicant to engage in the business of a contractor in
5602 a specified local jurisdiction, provided each of the following
5603 conditions are satisfied:
5604 1. The applicant held, in any local jurisdiction in this
5605 state during 2021, 2022, or 2023, a certificate of registration
5606 issued by the state or a local license issued by a local
5607 jurisdiction to perform work in a category of contractor defined
5608 in s. 489.105(2)(a)-(o) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o).
5609 2. The applicant submits all of the following to the
5610 department board:
5611 a. Evidence of the certificate of registration or local
5612 license held by the applicant as required by subparagraph 1.
5613 b. Evidence that the specified local jurisdiction does not
5614 have a license type available for the category of work for which
5615 the applicant was issued a certificate of registration or local
5616 license during 2021, 2022, or 2023, such as a notification on
5617 the website of the local jurisdiction or an e-mail or letter
5618 from the office of the local building official or local building
5619 department stating that such license type is not available in
5620 that local jurisdiction.
5621 c. Evidence that the applicant has submitted the required
5622 fee.
5623 d. Evidence of compliance with the insurance and financial
5624 responsibility requirements of s. 489.115(5).
5625
Page 225 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5626 An examination is not required for an applicant seeking a
5627 registration under this paragraph.
5628 (c) The department board is responsible for disciplining
5629 licensees issued a registration under paragraph (b). The
5630 department board shall make such licensure and disciplinary
5631 information available through the automated information system
5632 provided pursuant to s. 455.2286.
5633 (d) The fees for an applicant seeking a registration under
5634 paragraph (b) and renewal of such registration every 2 years are
5635 the same as the fees established by the department board for
5636 applications, registration and renewal, and record making and
5637 recordkeeping, as set forth in s. 489.109. The department shall
5638 provide license, renewal, and cancellation notices pursuant to
5639 ss. 455.273 and 455.275.
5640 (3)(a) Upon findings of fact supporting the need therefor,
5641 the department board may grant a limited nonrenewable
5642 registration to a contractor not domiciled in the state, for one
5643 project. During the period of such registration the department
5644 board may require compliance with this and any other statute of
5645 the state.
5646 (4)(a)1. A person whose job scope does not substantially
5647 correspond to either the job scope of one of the contractor
5648 categories defined in s. 489.105(2)(a)-(o) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o),
5649 or the job scope of one of the certified specialty contractor
5650 categories established by department board rule, is not required
Page 226 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5651 to register with the department board. A local government, as
5652 defined in s. 163.211, may not require a person to obtain a
5653 license, issued by the local government or the state, for a job
5654 scope which does not substantially correspond to the job scope
5655 of one of the contractor categories defined in s. 489.105(2)(a)-
5656 (o) and (q) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and (q) or authorized in s.
5657 489.1455(1), or the job scope of one of the certified specialty
5658 contractor categories established pursuant to s. 489.113(6). A
5659 local government may not require a state or local license to
5660 obtain a permit for such job scopes. For purposes of this
5661 section, job scopes for which a local government may not require
5662 a license include, but are not limited to, painting; flooring;
5663 cabinetry; interior remodeling when the scope of the project
5664 does not include a task for which a state license is required;
5665 driveway or tennis court installation; handyman services;
5666 decorative stone, tile, marble, granite, or terrazzo
5667 installation; plastering; pressure washing; stuccoing; caulking;
5668 and canvas awning and ornamental iron installation.
5669 2. A county that includes an area designated as an area of
5670 critical state concern under s. 380.05 may offer a license for
5671 any job scope which requires a contractor license under this
5672 part if the county imposed such a licensing requirement before
5673 January 1, 2021.
5674 3. A local government may continue to offer a license for
5675 veneer, including aluminum or vinyl gutters, siding, soffit, or
Page 227 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5676 fascia; rooftop painting, coating, and cleaning above three
5677 stories in height; or fence installation and erection if the
5678 local government imposed such a licensing requirement before
5679 January 1, 2021.
5680 4. A local government may not require a license as a
5681 prerequisite to submit a bid for public works projects if the
5682 work to be performed does not require a license under general
5683 law.
5684 (b) The local jurisdictions are responsible for providing
5685 the following information to the department board within 30 days
5686 after licensure of, or any disciplinary action against, a
5687 locally licensed contractor who is registered under this part:
5688 1. Licensure information.
5689 2. Code violation information pursuant to s. 553.781.
5690 3. Disciplinary information.
5691
5692 The department board shall maintain such licensure and
5693 disciplinary information as it is provided to the department
5694 board and shall make the information available through the
5695 automated information system provided pursuant to s. 455.2286.
5696 (c) Providing discipline to such locally licensed
5697 contractors is the responsibility of the local jurisdiction.
5698 (d) Any person who is not required to obtain registration
5699 or certification pursuant to s. 489.105(2)(d)-(o) s.
5700 489.105(3)(d)-(o) may perform contracting services for the
Page 228 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5701 construction, remodeling, repair, or improvement of single-
5702 family residences, including a townhouse as defined in the
5703 Florida Building Code, without obtaining a local license if such
5704 person is under the supervision of a certified or registered
5705 general, building, or residential contractor. As used in this
5706 paragraph, supervision may shall not be deemed to require the
5707 existence of a direct contract between the certified or
5708 registered general, building, or residential contractor and the
5709 person performing specialty contracting services.
5710 (e) Any person who is not certified or registered may
5711 perform the work of a specialty contractor whose scope of
5712 practice is limited to the type of work specified under s.
5713 489.105(2)(j), (k), or (l) s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) for the
5714 construction, remodeling, repair, or improvement of commercial
5715 or residential swimming pools, interactive water features as
5716 defined in the Florida Building Code, hot tubs, and spas without
5717 obtaining a local license or certification as a specialty
5718 contractor if he or she is supervised by a contractor who is
5719 certified or registered under s. 489.105(2)(j), (k), or (l) s.
5720 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l); the work is within the scope of the
5721 supervising contractor's license; the supervising contractor is
5722 responsible for the work; and the work does not require
5723 certification or registration under s. 489.105(2)(d)-(i), (m)-
5724 (o) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(i), (m)-(o), or s. 489.505. Such
5725 supervision does not require a direct contract between the
Page 229 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5726 contractor certified or registered under s. 489.105(2)(j), (k),
5727 or (l) s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) and the person performing
5728 the work, or for the person performing the work to be an
5729 employee of the contractor certified or registered under s.
5730 489.105(2)(j), (k), or (l) s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l). This
5731 paragraph does not limit the exemptions provided in s. 489.103
5732 and may not be construed to expand the scope of a contractor
5733 certified or registered under s. 489.105(2)(j), (k), or (l) s.
5734 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) to provide plumbing or electrical
5735 services for which certification or registration is required by
5736 this part or part II.
5737 Section 187. Section 489.118, Florida Statutes, is amended
5738 to read:
5739 489.118 Certification of registered contractors;
5740 grandfathering provisions.—The department board shall, upon
5741 receipt of a completed application and appropriate fee, issue a
5742 certificate in the appropriate category to any contractor
5743 registered under this part who makes application to the
5744 department board and can show that he or she meets each of the
5745 following requirements:
5746 (1) Currently holds a valid registered local license in
5747 one of the contractor categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(p)
5748 s. 489.105(3)(a)-(p).
5749 (2) Has, for that category, passed a written examination
5750 that the department board finds to be substantially similar to
Page 230 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5751 the examination required to be licensed as a certified
5752 contractor under this part. For purposes of this subsection, a
5753 written, proctored examination such as that produced by the
5754 National Assessment Institute, Block and Associates, NAI/Block,
5755 Experior Assessments, Professional Testing, Inc., or Assessment
5756 Systems, Inc., shall be considered to be substantially similar
5757 to the examination required to be licensed as a certified
5758 contractor. The department board may not impose or make any
5759 requirements regarding the nature or content of these cited
5760 examinations.
5761 (3) Has at least 5 years of experience as a contractor in
5762 that contracting category, or as an inspector or building
5763 administrator with oversight over that category, at the time of
5764 application. For contractors, only time periods in which the
5765 contractor license is active and the contractor is not on
5766 probation shall count toward the 5 years required by this
5767 subsection.
5768 (4) Has not had his or her contractor's license revoked at
5769 any time, had his or her contractor's license suspended within
5770 the last 5 years, or been assessed a fine in excess of $500
5771 within the last 5 years.
5772 (5) Is in compliance with the insurance and financial
5773 responsibility requirements in s. 489.115(5).
5774 Section 188. Paragraphs (b), (c), and (e) of subsection
5775 (2), paragraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraphs (a), (b), and
Page 231 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5776 (e) of subsection (5), subsection (6), and paragraph (b) of
5777 subsection (7) of section 489.119, Florida Statutes, are amended
5778 to read:
5779 489.119 Business organizations; qualifying agents.—
5780 (2) If the applicant proposes to engage in contracting as
5781 a business organization, including any partnership, corporation,
5782 business trust, or other legal entity, or in any name other than
5783 the applicant's legal name or a fictitious name where the
5784 applicant is doing business as a sole proprietorship, the
5785 applicant must apply for registration or certification as the
5786 qualifying agent of the business organization.
5787 (b)1. An application for registration or certification to
5788 qualify a business organization must include an affidavit on a
5789 form provided by the department board attesting that the
5790 applicant has final approval authority for all construction work
5791 performed by the business organization and that the applicant
5792 has final approval authority on all business matters, including
5793 contracts, specifications, checks, drafts, or payments,
5794 regardless of the form of payment, made by the business
5795 organization, except where a financially responsible officer is
5796 approved.
5797 2. The application for financially responsible officer
5798 must include an affidavit on a form provided by the department
5799 board attesting that the applicant's approval is required for
5800 all checks, drafts, or payments, regardless of the form of
Page 232 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5801 payment, made by the business organization and that the
5802 applicant has authority to act for the business organization in
5803 all financial matters.
5804 3. The application for secondary qualifying agent must
5805 include an affidavit on a form provided by the department board
5806 attesting that the applicant has authority to supervise all
5807 construction work performed by the business organization as
5808 provided in s. 489.1195(2).
5809 (c) The department board may deny an application for
5810 registration or certification to qualify a business organization
5811 if the applicant, or any person listed in paragraph (a), has
5812 been involved in past disciplinary actions or on any grounds for
5813 which an individual registration or certification may be denied.
5814 (e) A joint venture, including a joint venture composed of
5815 qualified business organizations, is itself a separate and
5816 distinct organization that must be qualified in accordance with
5817 department board rules.
5818 (3)(a) A qualifying agent must be certified or registered
5819 under this part in order for the business organization to
5820 operate in the category of contracting in which the qualifying
5821 agent is certified or registered. If any qualifying agent ceases
5822 to be affiliated with a business organization, he or she shall
5823 inform the department. In addition, if the qualifying agent is
5824 the only certified or registered contractor affiliated with the
5825 business organization, the business organization shall notify
Page 233 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5826 the department of the termination of the qualifying agent and
5827 shall have 60 days from the termination of the qualifying
5828 agent's affiliation with the business organization in which to
5829 employ another qualifying agent. The business organization may
5830 not engage in contracting until a qualifying agent is employed,
5831 unless the department executive director or chair of the board
5832 has granted a temporary nonrenewable certificate or registration
5833 to the financially responsible officer, the president, a
5834 partner, or, in the case of a limited partnership, the general
5835 partner, who assumes all responsibilities of a primary
5836 qualifying agent for the business organization. This temporary
5837 certificate or registration shall only allow the business
5838 organization to proceed with incomplete contracts. For the
5839 purposes of this paragraph, an incomplete contract is one which
5840 has been awarded to, or entered into by, the business
5841 organization before prior to the cessation of affiliation of the
5842 qualifying agent with the business organization or one on which
5843 the business organization was the low bidder and the contract is
5844 subsequently awarded, regardless of whether any actual work has
5845 commenced under the contract before prior to the qualifying
5846 agent ceasing to be affiliated with the business organization.
5847 (5)(a) Each registered or certified contractor shall affix
5848 the number of his or her registration or certification to each
5849 application for a building permit and on each building permit
5850 issued and recorded. Each city or county building department
Page 234 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5851 shall require, as a precondition for the issuance of the
5852 building permit, that the contractor taking out the permit must
5853 provide verification giving his or her department Construction
5854 Industry Licensing Board registration or certification number.
5855 (b) The registration or certification number of each
5856 contractor shall appear in each offer of services, business
5857 proposal, bid, contract, or advertisement, regardless of medium,
5858 as defined by department board rule, used by that contractor or
5859 business organization in the practice of contracting.
5860 (e) The department board shall issue a notice of
5861 noncompliance for the first offense, and may assess a fine or
5862 issue a citation for failure to correct the offense within 30
5863 days or for any subsequent offense, to any contractor or
5864 business organization that fails to include the certification or
5865 registration number as required by this part when submitting an
5866 advertisement for publication, broadcast, or printing or fails
5867 to display the certification or registration number as required
5868 by this part.
5869 (6) Each qualifying agent shall pay the department an
5870 amount equal to the original fee for registration or
5871 certification to qualify a new business organization. If the
5872 qualifying agent for a business organization desires to qualify
5873 additional business organizations, the department board shall
5874 require the qualifying agent to present evidence of his or her
5875 ability to supervise the construction activities of each such
Page 235 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5876 organization. Approval of each business organization is
5877 discretionary with the department board.
5878 (7)
5879 (b) Any business organization engaging in contracting
5880 under this subsection shall provide the department board with
5881 the name and license number of each registered or certified
5882 contractor employed by the business organization to supervise
5883 its contracting activities. The business organization is not
5884 required to post a bond or otherwise evidence any financial or
5885 credit information except as necessary to demonstrate compliance
5886 with paragraph (a).
5887 Section 189. Paragraphs (b) and (d) of subsection (1),
5888 paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2), and paragraphs (a) and
5889 (b) of subsection (3) of section 489.1195, Florida Statutes, are
5890 amended to read:
5891 489.1195 Responsibilities.—
5892 (1) A qualifying agent is a primary qualifying agent
5893 unless he or she is a secondary qualifying agent under this
5894 section.
5895 (b) Upon approval by the department board, a business
5896 entity may designate a financially responsible officer for
5897 purposes of certification or registration. A financially
5898 responsible officer shall be responsible for all financial
5899 aspects of the business organization and may not be designated
5900 as the primary qualifying agent. The designated financially
Page 236 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5901 responsible officer shall furnish evidence of the financial
5902 responsibility, credit, and business reputation of either
5903 himself or herself, or the business organization he or she
5904 desires to qualify, as determined appropriate by the department
5905 board.
5906 (d) The department board shall adopt rules prescribing the
5907 qualifications for financially responsible officers, including
5908 net worth, cash, and bonding requirements. These qualifications
5909 must be at least as extensive as the requirements for the
5910 financial responsibility of qualifying agents.
5911 (2)(a) One of the qualifying agents for a business
5912 organization that has more than one qualifying agent may be
5913 designated as the sole primary qualifying agent for the business
5914 organization by a joint agreement that is executed, on a form
5915 provided by the department board, by all qualifying agents for
5916 the business organization.
5917 (b) The joint agreement must be submitted to the
5918 department board for approval. If the department board
5919 determines that the joint agreement is in good order, it shall
5920 approve the designation and immediately notify the qualifying
5921 agents of such approval. The designation made by the joint
5922 agreement is effective upon receipt of the notice by the
5923 qualifying agents.
5924 (3)(a) A qualifying agent who has been designated by a
5925 joint agreement as the sole primary qualifying agent for a
Page 237 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5926 business organization may terminate this status as such by
5927 giving actual notice to the business organization, to the
5928 department board, and to all secondary qualifying agents of his
5929 or her intention to terminate this status. The notice to the
5930 department board must include proof satisfactory to the
5931 department board that he or she has given the notice required in
5932 this paragraph.
5933 (b) The status of the qualifying agent shall cease upon
5934 the designation of a new primary qualifying agent or 60 days
5935 after satisfactory notice of termination has been provided to
5936 the department board, whichever first occurs.
5937 Section 190. Section 489.121, Florida Statutes, is amended
5938 to read:
5939 489.121 Emergency registration upon death of contractor.—
5940 If an incomplete contract exists at the time of death of a
5941 contractor, the contract may be completed by any person even
5942 though not certified or registered. Such person shall notify the
5943 department board, within 30 days after the death of the
5944 contractor, of his or her name and address, knowledge of the
5945 contract, and ability to complete it. If the department board
5946 approves, he or she may proceed with the contract. For purposes
5947 of this section, an incomplete contract is one which has been
5948 awarded to, or entered into by, the contractor before his or her
5949 death, or on which he or she was the low bidder and the contract
5950 is subsequently awarded to him or her, regardless of whether any
Page 238 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5951 actual work has commenced under the contract before the
5952 contractor's death.
5953 Section 191. Subsection (1) of section 489.126, Florida
5954 Statutes, is amended to read:
5955 489.126 Moneys received by contractors.—
5956 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "contractor"
5957 includes all definitions as set forth in s. 489.105(2) s.
5958 489.105(3), and any person performing or contracting or
5959 promising to perform work described therein, without regard to
5960 the licensure of the person.
5961 Section 192. Subsection (6) of section 489.127, Florida
5962 Statutes, is amended to read:
5963 489.127 Prohibitions; penalties.—
5964 (6) Local building departments may collect outstanding
5965 fines against registered or certified contractors issued by the
5966 department Construction Industry Licensing Board and may retain
5967 75 percent of the fines they are able to collect, provided that
5968 they transmit 25 percent of the fines they are able to collect
5969 to the department according to a procedure to be determined by
5970 the department.
5971 Section 193. Section 489.129, Florida Statutes, is amended
5972 to read:
5973 489.129 Disciplinary proceedings.—
5974 (1) The department board may take any of the following
5975 actions against any certificateholder or registrant: place on
Page 239 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
5976 probation or reprimand the licensee, revoke, suspend, or deny
5977 the issuance or renewal of the certificate or registration,
5978 require financial restitution to a consumer for financial harm
5979 directly related to a violation of a provision of this part,
5980 impose an administrative fine not to exceed $10,000 per
5981 violation, require continuing education, or assess costs
5982 associated with investigation and prosecution, if the
5983 contractor, financially responsible officer, or business
5984 organization for which the contractor is a primary qualifying
5985 agent, a financially responsible officer, or a secondary
5986 qualifying agent responsible under s. 489.1195 is found guilty
5987 of any of the following acts:
5988 (a) Obtaining a certificate or registration by fraud or
5989 misrepresentation.
5990 (b) Being convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea
5991 of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in
5992 any jurisdiction which directly relates to the practice of
5993 contracting or the ability to practice contracting.
5994 (c) Violating any provision of chapter 455.
5995 (d) Performing any act which assists a person or entity in
5996 engaging in the prohibited uncertified and unregistered practice
5997 of contracting, if the certificateholder or registrant knows or
5998 has reasonable grounds to know that the person or entity was
5999 uncertified and unregistered.
6000 (e) Knowingly combining or conspiring with an uncertified
Page 240 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6001 or unregistered person by allowing his or her certificate or
6002 registration to be used by the uncertified or unregistered
6003 person with intent to evade the provisions of this part. When a
6004 certificateholder or registrant allows his or her certificate or
6005 registration to be used by one or more business organizations
6006 without having any active participation in the operations,
6007 management, or control of such business organizations, such act
6008 constitutes prima facie evidence of an intent to evade the
6009 provisions of this part.
6010 (f) Acting in the capacity of a contractor under any
6011 certificate or registration issued hereunder except in the name
6012 of the certificateholder or registrant as set forth on the
6013 issued certificate or registration, or in accordance with the
6014 personnel of the certificateholder or registrant as set forth in
6015 the application for the certificate or registration, or as later
6016 changed as provided in this part.
6017 (g) Committing mismanagement or misconduct in the practice
6018 of contracting that causes financial harm to a customer.
6019 Financial mismanagement or misconduct occurs when:
6020 1. Valid liens have been recorded against the property of
6021 a contractor's customer for supplies or services ordered by the
6022 contractor for the customer's job; the contractor has received
6023 funds from the customer to pay for the supplies or services; and
6024 the contractor has not had the liens removed from the property,
6025 by payment or by bond, within 75 days after the date of such
Page 241 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6026 liens;
6027 2. The contractor has abandoned a customer's job and the
6028 percentage of completion is less than the percentage of the
6029 total contract price paid to the contractor as of the time of
6030 abandonment, unless the contractor is entitled to retain such
6031 funds under the terms of the contract or refunds the excess
6032 funds within 30 days after the date the job is abandoned; or
6033 3. The contractor's job has been completed, and it is
6034 shown that the customer has had to pay more for the contracted
6035 job than the original contract price, as adjusted for subsequent
6036 change orders, unless such increase in cost was the result of
6037 circumstances beyond the control of the contractor, was the
6038 result of circumstances caused by the customer, or was otherwise
6039 permitted by the terms of the contract between the contractor
6040 and the customer.
6041 (h) Being disciplined by any municipality or county for an
6042 act or violation of this part.
6043 (i) Failing in any material respect to comply with the
6044 provisions of this part or violating a rule or lawful order of
6045 the department board.
6046 (j) Abandoning a construction project in which the
6047 contractor is engaged or under contract as a contractor. A
6048 project may be presumed abandoned after 90 days if the
6049 contractor terminates the project without just cause or without
6050 proper notification to the owner, including the reason for
Page 242 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6051 termination, or fails to perform work without just cause for 90
6052 consecutive days.
6053 (k) Signing a statement with respect to a project or
6054 contract falsely indicating that the work is bonded; falsely
6055 indicating that payment has been made for all subcontracted
6056 work, labor, and materials which results in a financial loss to
6057 the owner, purchaser, or contractor; or falsely indicating that
6058 workers' compensation and public liability insurance are
6059 provided.
6060 (l) Committing fraud or deceit in the practice of
6061 contracting.
6062 (m) Committing incompetency or misconduct in the practice
6063 of contracting.
6064 (n) Committing gross negligence, repeated negligence, or
6065 negligence resulting in a significant danger to life or
6066 property.
6067 (o) Proceeding on any job without obtaining applicable
6068 local building department permits and inspections.
6069 (p) Intimidating, threatening, coercing, or otherwise
6070 discouraging the service of a notice to owner under part I of
6071 chapter 713 or a notice to contractor under chapter 255 or part
6072 I of chapter 713.
6073 (q) Failing to satisfy within a reasonable time, the terms
6074 of a civil judgment obtained against the licensee, or the
6075 business organization qualified by the licensee, relating to the
Page 243 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6076 practice of the licensee's profession.
6077 (r) Committing misapplication of construction funds in
6078 violation of s. 713.345. If a contractor, subcontractor, sub-
6079 subcontractor, or other person licensed by the department board
6080 under this chapter is convicted of misapplication of
6081 construction funds, the department board must suspend all
6082 licenses issued to such licensee under this chapter for a
6083 minimum of 1 year from the date of conviction. The suspension
6084 required under this paragraph is not exclusive, and the
6085 department board may impose any additional penalties set forth
6086 in this subsection.
6087
6088 For the purposes of this subsection, construction is considered
6089 to be commenced when the contract is executed and the contractor
6090 has accepted funds from the customer or lender. A contractor
6091 does not commit a violation of this subsection when the
6092 contractor relies on a building code interpretation rendered by
6093 a building official or person authorized by s. 553.80 to enforce
6094 the building code, absent a finding of fraud or deceit in the
6095 practice of contracting, or gross negligence, repeated
6096 negligence, or negligence resulting in a significant danger to
6097 life or property on the part of the building official, in a
6098 proceeding under chapter 120.
6099 (2) If a registrant or certificateholder disciplined under
6100 subsection (1) is a qualifying agent or financially responsible
Page 244 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6101 officer for a business organization and the violation was
6102 performed in connection with a construction project undertaken
6103 by that business organization, the department board may impose
6104 an additional administrative fine not to exceed $5,000 per
6105 violation against the business organization or against any
6106 partner, officer, director, trustee, or member if such person
6107 participated in the violation or knew or should have known of
6108 the violation and failed to take reasonable corrective action.
6109 (3) The department board may specify by rule the acts or
6110 omissions which constitute violations of this section.
6111 (4) In recommending penalties in any proposed recommended
6112 final order, the department shall follow the penalty guidelines
6113 established by the department board by rule. The department
6114 shall advise the administrative law judge of the appropriate
6115 penalty, including mitigating and aggravating circumstances, and
6116 the specific rule citation.
6117 (5) The department board may not reinstate the
6118 certification or registration of, or cause a certificate or
6119 registration to be issued to, a person who or business
6120 organization which the department board has determined is
6121 unqualified or whose certificate or registration the department
6122 board has suspended until it is satisfied that such person or
6123 business organization has complied with all the terms and
6124 conditions set forth in the final order and is capable of
6125 competently engaging in the business of contracting.
Page 245 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6126 (6)(a) The department board may assess interest or
6127 penalties on all fines imposed under this chapter against any
6128 person or business organization which has not paid the imposed
6129 fine by the due date established by rule or final order. The
6130 provisions of chapter 120 do not apply to such assessment.
6131 Interest rates to be imposed shall be established by rule and
6132 may shall not be usurious.
6133 (b) Venue for all actions to enforce any fine levied by
6134 the department board shall be in Duval County. The department
6135 board is authorized to enter into contracts with private
6136 businesses or attorneys to collect such fines with payment for
6137 such collections made on a contingent fee basis. All such
6138 contracts shall be publicly advertised and competitively awarded
6139 based upon responses submitted to a request for proposals
6140 developed by the department board.
6141 (7) The department may board shall not issue or renew a
6142 certificate or registration to any person or business
6143 organization that has been assessed a fine, interest, or costs
6144 associated with investigation and prosecution, or has been
6145 ordered to pay restitution, until such fine, interest, or costs
6146 associated with investigation and prosecution or restitution are
6147 paid in full or until all terms and conditions of the final
6148 order have been satisfied.
6149 (8) If the department board finds any certified or
6150 registered contractor guilty of a violation, the department
Page 246 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6151 board may, as part of its disciplinary action, require such
6152 contractor to obtain continuing education in the areas of
6153 contracting affected by such violation.
6154 (9) Any person certified or registered pursuant to this
6155 part who has had his or her license revoked may shall not be
6156 eligible to be a partner, officer, director, or trustee of a
6157 business organization defined by this section or be employed in
6158 a managerial or supervisory capacity for a 5-year period. Such
6159 person shall also be ineligible to reapply for certification or
6160 registration under this part for a period of 5 years after the
6161 effective date of the revocation.
6162 (10) If a business organization or any of its partners,
6163 officers, directors, trustees, or members is or has previously
6164 been fined for violating subsection (2) or s. 489.132, the board
6165 may, on that basis alone, revoke, suspend, place on probation,
6166 or deny issuance of a certificate or registration to a
6167 qualifying agent or financially responsible officer of that
6168 business organization.
6169 (11)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapters 120 and
6170 455, upon receipt of a legally sufficient consumer complaint
6171 alleging a violation of this part, the department may provide by
6172 rule for binding arbitration between the complainant and the
6173 certificateholder or registrant, provided the following
6174 conditions exist:
6175 1. There is evidence that the complainant has suffered or
Page 247 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6176 is likely to suffer monetary damages resulting from the
6177 violation of this part;
6178 2. The certificateholder or registrant does not have a
6179 history of repeated or similar violations;
6180 3. Reasonable grounds exist to believe that the public
6181 interest will be better served by arbitration than by
6182 disciplinary action; and
6183 4. The complainant and certificateholder or registrant
6184 have not previously entered into private arbitration, and no
6185 civil court action based on the same transaction has been filed.
6186 (b) The certificateholder or registrant and the
6187 complainant may consent in writing to binding arbitration within
6188 15 days following notification of this process by the
6189 department. The department may suspend all action in the matter
6190 for 45 days when notice of consent to binding arbitration is
6191 received by the department. If the arbitration process is
6192 successfully concluded within the 60-day period, the department
6193 may close the case file with a notation of the disposition and
6194 the licensee's record shall reflect only that a complaint was
6195 filed and resolved through arbitration.
6196 (c) Where a complaint meets the criteria for arbitration
6197 set forth in paragraph (a) and the damages at issue are less
6198 than $2,500, the department shall refer the complaint for
6199 mandatory arbitration.
6200 (d) The arbitrator's order shall become a final order of
Page 248 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6201 the department board if not challenged by the complainant or the
6202 certificateholder or registrant within 30 days after filing. The
6203 department's board's review of the arbitrator's order shall
6204 operate in the manner of the review of recommended orders
6205 pursuant to s. 120.57(1) and may shall not be a de novo review.
6206 (12) When an investigation of a contractor is undertaken,
6207 the department shall promptly furnish to the contractor or the
6208 contractor's attorney a copy of the complaint or document that
6209 resulted in the initiation of the investigation. The department
6210 shall make the complaint and supporting documents available to
6211 the contractor. The complaint or supporting documents shall
6212 contain information regarding the specific facts that serve as
6213 the basis for the complaint. The contractor may submit a written
6214 response to the information contained in such complaint or
6215 document within 20 days after service to the contractor of the
6216 complaint or document. The contractor's written response shall
6217 be considered by the probable cause panel. The right to respond
6218 does not prohibit the issuance of a summary emergency order if
6219 necessary to protect the public. However, if the department
6220 decides secretary, or the secretary's designee, and the chair of
6221 the board or the chair of the probable cause panel agree in
6222 writing that such notification would be detrimental to the
6223 investigation, the department may withhold notification. The
6224 department may conduct an investigation without notification to
6225 a contractor if the act under investigation is a criminal
Page 249 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6226 offense.
6227 Section 194. Paragraphs (c) and (f) of subsection (3),
6228 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (6), paragraphs (c), (d),
6229 (e), and (f) of subsection (7), and subsections (10), (11), and
6230 (12) of section 489.131, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
6231 489.131 Applicability.—
6232 (3) Nothing in this part limits the power of a
6233 municipality or county:
6234 (c) To collect business taxes, subject to s. 205.065, and
6235 inspection fees for engaging in contracting or examination fees
6236 from persons who are registered with the department board
6237 pursuant to local examination requirements and issue business
6238 tax receipts. However, nothing in this part shall be construed
6239 to require general contractors, building contractors, or
6240 residential contractors to obtain additional business tax
6241 receipts for specialty work when such specialty work is
6242 performed by employees of such contractors on projects for which
6243 they have substantially full responsibility and such contractors
6244 do not hold themselves out to the public as being specialty
6245 contractors.
6246 (f) To refuse to issue permits or issue permits with
6247 specific conditions to a contractor who has committed multiple
6248 violations, when he or she has been disciplined for each of them
6249 by the department board and when each disciplinary action has
6250 involved revocation or suspension of a license, imposition of an
Page 250 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6251 administrative fine of at least $1,000, or probation; or to
6252 issue permits with specific conditions to a contractor who,
6253 within the previous 12 months, has had disciplinary action other
6254 than a citation or letter of guidance taken against him or her
6255 by the department or by a local board or agency which licenses
6256 contractors and has reported the action pursuant to paragraph
6257 (6)(c), for engaging in the business or acting in the capacity
6258 of a contractor without a license. However, this subsection does
6259 not supersede the provisions of s. 489.113(4), and no county or
6260 municipality may require any certificateholder to obtain a local
6261 professional license or pay a local professional license fee as
6262 a condition of performing any services within the scope of the
6263 certificateholder's statewide license as established under this
6264 part.
6265 (6)
6266 (b) To engage in contracting in the territorial area, an
6267 applicant shall also be registered with the department board, as
6268 required by s. 489.117.
6269 (c) Each local board or agency that licenses contractors
6270 must transmit quarterly to the department board a report of any
6271 disciplinary action taken against contractors and of any
6272 administrative or disciplinary action taken against unlicensed
6273 persons for engaging in the business or acting in the capacity
6274 of a contractor including any cease and desist orders issued
6275 pursuant to s. 489.113(2)(b) and any fine issued pursuant to s.
Page 251 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6276 489.127(5).
6277 (7)
6278 (c) In addition to any action the local jurisdiction
6279 enforcement body may take against the individual's local
6280 license, and any fine the local jurisdiction may impose, the
6281 local jurisdiction enforcement body shall issue a recommended
6282 penalty for department board action. This recommended penalty
6283 may include a recommendation for no further action, or a
6284 recommendation for suspension, restitution, revocation, or
6285 restriction of the registration, or a fine to be levied by the
6286 department board, or a combination thereof. The recommended
6287 penalty must specify the violations of this chapter upon which
6288 the recommendation is based. The local jurisdiction enforcement
6289 body shall inform the disciplined contractor and the complainant
6290 of the local license penalty imposed, the department board
6291 penalty recommended, his or her rights to appeal, and the
6292 consequences should he or she decide not to appeal. The local
6293 jurisdiction enforcement body shall, upon having reached
6294 adjudication or having accepted a plea of nolo contendere,
6295 immediately inform the department board of its action and the
6296 recommended department board penalty.
6297 (d) The department, the disciplined contractor, or the
6298 complainant may challenge the local jurisdiction enforcement
6299 body's recommended penalty for department board action to the
6300 department Construction Industry Licensing Board. A challenge
Page 252 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6301 shall be filed within 60 days after the issuance of the
6302 recommended penalty to the department board. If challenged,
6303 there is a presumptive finding of probable cause and the case
6304 may proceed without the need for a probable cause hearing.
6305 (e) Failure of the department, the disciplined contractor,
6306 or the complainant to challenge the local jurisdiction's
6307 recommended penalty within the time period set forth in this
6308 subsection shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing
6309 before the department board. A waiver of the right to a hearing
6310 before the department board shall be deemed an admission of the
6311 violation, and the penalty recommended shall become a final
6312 order according to procedures developed by department board rule
6313 without further department board action. The disciplined
6314 contractor may appeal this department board action to the
6315 district court.
6316 (f)1. The department may investigate any complaint which
6317 is made with the department. However, the department may not
6318 initiate or pursue any complaint against a registered contractor
6319 who is not also a certified contractor where a local
6320 jurisdiction enforcement body has jurisdiction over the
6321 complaint, unless summary procedures are initiated by the
6322 department secretary pursuant to s. 455.225(8), or unless the
6323 local jurisdiction enforcement body has failed to investigate
6324 and prosecute a complaint, or make a finding of no violation,
6325 within 6 months of receiving the complaint. The department shall
Page 253 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6326 refer the complaint to the local jurisdiction enforcement body
6327 for investigation, and if appropriate, prosecution. However, the
6328 department may investigate such complaints to the extent
6329 necessary to determine whether summary procedures should be
6330 initiated.
6331 2. Upon a recommendation by the department, the department
6332 board may make conditional, suspend, or rescind its
6333 determination of the adequacy of the local government
6334 enforcement body's disciplinary procedures granted under s.
6335 489.117(2).
6336 (10) No municipal or county government may issue any
6337 certificate of competency or license for any contractor defined
6338 in s. 489.105(2)(a)-(o) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) after July 1, 1993,
6339 unless such local government exercises disciplinary control and
6340 oversight over such locally licensed contractors, including
6341 forwarding a recommended order in each action to the department
6342 board as provided in subsection (7). Each local board that
6343 licenses and disciplines contractors must have at least two
6344 consumer representatives on that board. If the local board has
6345 seven or more members, at least three of those members must be
6346 consumer representatives. The consumer representative may be any
6347 resident of the local jurisdiction who is not, and has never
6348 been, a contractor member or practitioner of a profession
6349 regulated by the board or a member of any closely related
6350 profession.
Page 254 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6351 (11) Any municipal or county government which enters or
6352 has in place a reciprocal agreement which accepts a certificate
6353 of competency or license issued by another municipal or county
6354 government in lieu of its own certificate of competency or
6355 license allowing contractors defined in s. 489.105(2)(a)-(o) s.
6356 489.105(3)(a)-(o), shall file a certified copy of such agreement
6357 with the department board not later than 60 days after July 1,
6358 1993, or 30 days after the effective date of such agreement.
6359 (12) Unless specifically provided, the provisions of this
6360 part does shall not be construed to create a civil cause of
6361 action.
6362 Section 195. Subsection (5) of section 489.132, Florida
6363 Statutes, is amended to read:
6364 489.132 Prohibited acts by unlicensed principals;
6365 investigation; hearing; penalties.—
6366 (5) The department may suspend, revoke, or deny issuance
6367 or renewal of a certificate or registration for any individual
6368 or business organization that associates a person as an officer,
6369 director, or partner, or in a managerial or supervisory
6370 capacity, after such person has been found under a final order
6371 to have violated this section or was an officer, director,
6372 partner, trustee, or manager of a business organization
6373 disciplined by the department board by revocation, suspension,
6374 or fine in excess of $2,500, upon finding reasonable cause that
6375 such person knew or reasonably should have known of the conduct
Page 255 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6376 leading to the discipline.
6377 Section 196. Subsections (2) and (4) of section 489.133,
6378 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
6379 489.133 Pollutant storage systems specialty contractors;
6380 definitions; certification; restrictions.—
6381 (2) The department board shall adopt rules providing
6382 standards for registration of precision tank testers who
6383 precision test a pollutant storage tank. The Department of
6384 Environmental Protection shall approve the methodology,
6385 procedures, and equipment used and shall approve the applicant
6386 as being eligible for registration as a registered precision
6387 tank tester. A registered precision tank tester is subject to
6388 the provisions of ss. 489.129 and 489.132 and is considered a
6389 contractor operating as a primary qualifying agent for the
6390 business entity employing him or her, which is considered a
6391 contracting firm for the purposes of ss. 489.129 and 489.132. A
6392 person who registers under this subsection is exempt from
6393 municipal, county, or development district registration under s.
6394 489.117 and may operate as a precision tank tester statewide.
6395 (4) The department board shall adopt rules providing
6396 standards for certification of pollutant storage systems
6397 specialty contractors, including persons who remove such
6398 systems. The department board shall provide the proposed rules
6399 to the Department of Environmental Protection for review and
6400 comment before prior to adoption. The rules shall include, but
Page 256 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6401 not be limited to:
6402 (a) Standards for operating as a pollutant storage systems
6403 specialty contractor.
6404 (b) Requirements for certification as a pollutant storage
6405 systems specialty contractor.
6406 (c) Requirements for certification without examination of
6407 pollutant storage systems specialty contractors for any person
6408 who has passed a local licensure examination, a licensure
6409 examination in another state, or a licensure examination of a
6410 national organization, which is at least as stringent as the
6411 examination adopted by the department board.
6412 Section 197. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 489.1401,
6413 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
6414 489.1401 Legislative intent.—
6415 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that actions taken
6416 by the department Construction Industry Licensing Board with
6417 respect to contractor sanctions and pursuant to this chapter are
6418 an exercise of the department's regulatory power for the
6419 protection of public safety and welfare.
6420 (2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the sole
6421 purpose of the Florida Homeowners' Construction Recovery Fund is
6422 to compensate an aggrieved claimant who contracted for the
6423 construction or improvement of the homeowner's residence located
6424 within this state and who has obtained a final judgment in a
6425 court of competent jurisdiction, was awarded restitution by the
Page 257 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6426 department Construction Industry Licensing Board, or received an
6427 award in arbitration against a licensee on grounds of financial
6428 mismanagement or misconduct, abandoning a construction project,
6429 or making a false statement with respect to a project. Such
6430 grievance must arise directly out of a transaction conducted
6431 when the judgment debtor was licensed and must involve an act
6432 enumerated in s. 489.129(1)(g), (j), or (k).
6433 Section 198. Paragraphs (c) through (l) of subsection (1)
6434 of section 489.1402, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
6435 paragraphs (b) through (k), respectively, and paragraph (b) and
6436 present paragraph (d) of that subsection are amended, to read:
6437 489.1402 Homeowners' Construction Recovery Fund;
6438 definitions.—
6439 (1) The following definitions apply to ss. 489.140-
6440 489.144:
6441 (b) "Board" means the Construction Industry Licensing
6442 Board.
6443 (c)(d) "Contractor" means a Division I or Division II
6444 contractor performing his or her respective services described
6445 in s. 489.105(2) s. 489.105(3).
6446 Section 199. Paragraphs (a), (e), (f), and (g) of
6447 subsection (1), paragraph (f) of subsection (2), and subsection
6448 (3) of section 489.141, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
6449 489.141 Conditions for recovery; eligibility.—
6450 (1) A claimant is eligible to seek recovery from the
Page 258 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6451 recovery fund after making a claim and exhausting the limits of
6452 any available bond, cash bond, surety, guarantee, warranty,
6453 letter of credit, or policy of insurance if each of the
6454 following conditions is satisfied:
6455 (a) The claimant has received a final judgment in a court
6456 of competent jurisdiction in this state or has received an award
6457 in arbitration or the department Construction Industry Licensing
6458 Board has issued a final order directing the licensee to pay
6459 restitution to the claimant. The department board may waive this
6460 requirement if:
6461 1. The claimant is unable to secure a final judgment
6462 against the licensee due to the death of the licensee; or
6463 2. The claimant has sought to have assets involving the
6464 transaction that gave rise to the claim removed from the
6465 bankruptcy proceedings so that the matter might be heard in a
6466 court of competent jurisdiction in this state and, after due
6467 diligence, the claimant is precluded by action of the bankruptcy
6468 court from securing a final judgment against the licensee.
6469 (e) The contract was executed and the violation occurred
6470 on or after July 1, 1993, and provided that:
6471 1. The claimant has caused to be issued a writ of
6472 execution upon such judgment, and the officer executing the writ
6473 has made a return showing that no personal or real property of
6474 the judgment debtor or licensee liable to be levied upon in
6475 satisfaction of the judgment can be found or that the amount
Page 259 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6476 realized on the sale of the judgment debtor's or licensee's
6477 property pursuant to such execution was insufficient to satisfy
6478 the judgment;
6479 2. If the claimant is unable to comply with subparagraph
6480 1. for a valid reason to be determined by the department board,
6481 the claimant has made all reasonable searches and inquiries to
6482 ascertain whether the judgment debtor or licensee is possessed
6483 of real or personal property or other assets subject to being
6484 sold or applied in satisfaction of the judgment and by his or
6485 her search has discovered no property or assets or has
6486 discovered property and assets and has taken all necessary
6487 action and proceedings for the application thereof to the
6488 judgment but the amount thereby realized was insufficient to
6489 satisfy the judgment; and
6490 3. The claimant has made a diligent attempt, as defined by
6491 department board rule, to collect the restitution awarded by the
6492 department board.
6493 (f) A claim for recovery is made within 1 year after the
6494 conclusion of any civil, criminal, or administrative action or
6495 award in arbitration based on the act. This paragraph applies to
6496 any claim filed with the department board after October 1, 1998.
6497 (g) Any amounts recovered by the claimant from the
6498 judgment debtor or licensee, or from any other source, have been
6499 applied to the damages awarded by the court or the amount of
6500 restitution ordered by the department board.
Page 260 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6501 (2) A claimant is not qualified to make a claim for
6502 recovery from the recovery fund if:
6503 (f) The claimant had entered into a contract with a
6504 licensee to perform a scope of work described in s.
6505 489.105(2)(d)-(q) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(q) before July 1, 2016.
6506 (3) The department board may determine by rule
6507 documentation that is required to complete a claim.
6508 Section 200. Section 489.142, Florida Statutes, is amended
6509 to read:
6510 489.142 Department Board powers relating to recovery;
6511 conduct of hearings and service.—
6512 (1) With respect to actions for recovery from the recovery
6513 fund, the department board may intervene, enter an appearance,
6514 file an answer, defend the action, or take any action it deems
6515 appropriate and may take recourse through any appropriate method
6516 of review on behalf of the State of Florida. The department
6517 board may delegate to the department by rule the authority to
6518 close any case when a claimant is not qualified to make a claim
6519 for recovery from the recovery fund under s. 489.141(2); when
6520 after notice the claimant has failed to provide documentation in
6521 support of the claim as required by the department board; or
6522 when the licensee has reached the aggregate limit.
6523 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
6524 department board shall cause a notice of hearing to be served 14
6525 days in advance of the hearing on the claimant and on the
Page 261 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6526 licensee whose license is subject to suspension by s. 489.143.
6527 Each notice shall inform the recipient of any administrative
6528 hearing or judicial review that is available under s. 120.569,
6529 s. 120.57, or s. 120.68; shall indicate the procedure that must
6530 be followed to obtain the hearing or judicial review; and shall
6531 state the time limits that apply. Service of the notice on the
6532 licensee shall be made in accordance with s. 455.275. Service of
6533 the notice on the claimant shall be by regular United States
6534 mail at the address provided on the claim. The service of notice
6535 in accordance with this section is complete upon expiration of
6536 14 days after deposit in the United States mail. Proof of
6537 service of a notice shall be made by entry in the records of the
6538 department that the notice was given. The entry shall be
6539 admissible in judicial and administrative proceedings of this
6540 state and shall constitute sufficient proof that notice was
6541 given.
6542 (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, department
6543 board hearings on claims shall be conducted in accordance with
6544 ss. 120.569 and 120.57(2). All claim hearings shall be conducted
6545 at the department's board's regular meeting at the place, date,
6546 and time published. Orders of the department board denying or
6547 awarding funds to a claimant constitute final orders that may be
6548 appealed in accordance with s. 120.68. Orders awarding or
6549 denying claims shall be served in the same manner as notices of
6550 hearing in this section.
Page 262 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6551 Section 201. Section 489.1425, Florida Statutes, is
6552 amended to read:
6553 489.1425 Duty of contractor to notify residential property
6554 owner of recovery fund.—
6555 (1) Each agreement or contract for repair, restoration,
6556 improvement, or construction to residential real property must
6557 contain a written statement explaining the consumer's rights
6558 under the recovery fund, except where the value of all labor and
6559 materials does not exceed $2,500. The written statement must be
6560 substantially in the following form:
6561 FLORIDA HOMEOWNERS' CONSTRUCTION
6562 RECOVERY FUND
6563 PAYMENT, UP TO A LIMITED AMOUNT, MAY BE AVAILABLE FROM THE
6564 FLORIDA HOMEOWNERS' CONSTRUCTION RECOVERY FUND IF YOU LOSE MONEY
6565 ON A PROJECT PERFORMED UNDER CONTRACT, WHERE THE LOSS RESULTS
6566 FROM SPECIFIED VIOLATIONS OF FLORIDA LAW BY A LICENSED
6567 CONTRACTOR. FOR INFORMATION ABOUT THE RECOVERY FUND AND FILING A
6568 CLAIM, CONTACT THE FLORIDA DEPARTMENT OF BUSINESS AND
6569 PROFESSIONAL REGULATION CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY LICENSING BOARD AT
6570 THE FOLLOWING TELEPHONE NUMBER AND ADDRESS:
6571 The statement must shall be immediately followed by the
6572 department's board's address and telephone number as established
6573 by department board rule.
6574 (2)(a) Upon finding a first violation of subsection (1),
6575 the department board may fine the contractor up to $500, and the
Page 263 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6576 moneys must be deposited into the recovery fund.
6577 (b) Upon finding a second or subsequent violation of
6578 subsection (1), the department board shall fine the contractor
6579 $1,000 per violation, and the moneys must be deposited into the
6580 recovery fund.
6581 Section 202. Subsections (1), (2), (4), and (6) of section
6582 489.143, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
6583 489.143 Payment from the fund.—
6584 (1) The fund shall be disbursed as provided in s. 489.141
6585 on a final order of the department board.
6586 (2) A claimant who meets all of the conditions prescribed
6587 in s. 489.141 may apply to the department board to cause payment
6588 to be made to a claimant from the recovery fund in an amount
6589 equal to the judgment, award, or restitution order or $25,000,
6590 whichever is less, or an amount equal to the unsatisfied portion
6591 of such person's judgment, award, or restitution order, but only
6592 to the extent and amount of actual damages suffered by the
6593 claimant, and only up to the maximum payment allowed for each
6594 respective Division I and Division II claim. Payment from the
6595 fund for other costs related to or pursuant to civil proceedings
6596 such as postjudgment interest, attorney fees, court costs,
6597 medical damages, and punitive damages is prohibited. The
6598 recovery fund is not obligated to pay a judgment, an award, or a
6599 restitution order, or any portion thereof, which is not
6600 expressly based on one of the grounds for recovery set forth in
Page 264 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6601 s. 489.141.
6602 (4) Upon receipt by a claimant under subsection (2) of
6603 payment from the recovery fund, the claimant shall assign his or
6604 her additional right, title, and interest in the judgment,
6605 award, or restitution order, to the extent of such payment, to
6606 the department board, and thereupon the department board shall
6607 be subrogated to the right, title, and interest of the claimant;
6608 and any amount subsequently recovered on the judgment, award, or
6609 restitution order, to the extent of the right, title, and
6610 interest of the department board therein, shall be for the
6611 purpose of reimbursing the recovery fund.
6612 (6) For contracts entered into before July 1, 2004,
6613 payments for claims against any one licensee may not exceed, in
6614 the aggregate, $100,000 annually, up to a total aggregate of
6615 $250,000. For any claim approved by the department board which
6616 is in excess of the annual cap, the amount in excess of $100,000
6617 up to the total aggregate cap of $250,000 is eligible for
6618 payment in the next and succeeding fiscal years, but only after
6619 all claims for the then-current calendar year have been paid.
6620 Payments may not exceed the aggregate annual or per claimant
6621 limits under law. Beginning January 1, 2005, for each Division I
6622 contract entered into after July 1, 2004, payment from the
6623 recovery fund is subject only to a total aggregate cap of
6624 $500,000 for each Division I licensee. Beginning January 1,
6625 2017, for each Division II contract entered into on or after
Page 265 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6626 July 1, 2016, payment from the recovery fund is subject only to
6627 a total aggregate cap of $150,000 for each Division II licensee.
6628 Beginning January 1, 2025, for Division I and Division II
6629 contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2024, payment from
6630 the recovery fund is subject only to a total aggregate cap of $2
6631 million for each Division I licensee and $600,000 for each
6632 Division II licensee.
6633 Section 203. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
6634 489.1455, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
6635 489.1455 Journeyman; reciprocity; standards.—
6636 (1) Counties and municipalities are authorized to issue
6637 journeyman licenses in the plumbing, pipe fitting, mechanical,
6638 or HVAC trades to an individual who:
6639 (a) Has scored at least 70 percent, or after October 1,
6640 1997, at least 75 percent, on a proctored journeyman Block and
6641 Associates examination or other proctored examination approved
6642 by the department board for the trade in which he or she is
6643 licensed;
6644 Section 204. Section 489.146, Florida Statutes, is amended
6645 to read:
6646 489.146 Privatization of services.—Notwithstanding any
6647 other provision of this part relating to the review of licensure
6648 applications, issuance of licenses and renewals, collection of
6649 revenues, fees, and fines, service of documents, publications,
6650 and printing, and other ministerial functions of the department
Page 266 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6651 relating to the regulation of contractors, the department shall
6652 make all reasonable efforts to contract with one or more private
6653 entities for provision of such services, when such services can
6654 be provided in a more efficient manner by private entities. The
6655 department or the department board shall retain final authority
6656 for licensure decisions and rulemaking, including all appeals or
6657 other legal action resulting from such licensure decisions or
6658 rulemaking.
6659 Section 205. Subsections (4) through (29) of section
6660 489.505, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
6661 through (28), respectively, and subsection (3) and present
6662 subsections (14), (15), (19), and (23) of that section are
6663 amended to read:
6664 489.505 Definitions.—As used in this part:
6665 (3) "Board," except "local board," means the Electrical
6666 Contractors' Licensing Board created by this part.
6667 (13)(14) "Primary qualifying agent" means a person who
6668 possesses the requisite skill, knowledge, and experience, and
6669 has the responsibility, to supervise, direct, manage, and
6670 control the electrical or alarm system contracting activities of
6671 the business organization with which he or she is connected; and
6672 whose technical and personal qualifications have been determined
6673 by investigation and examination as provided in this part by the
6674 department, as attested to by the department board; and who has
6675 been issued a certificate of competency by the department.
Page 267 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6676 (14)(15) "Secondary qualifying agent" means a person who
6677 possesses the requisite skill, knowledge, and experience, and
6678 has the responsibility to supervise, direct, manage, and control
6679 the electrical or alarm system contracting activities on a job
6680 for which he or she has obtained a permit; and whose technical
6681 and personal qualifications have been determined by
6682 investigation and examination as provided in this part by the
6683 department, as attested to by the department board; and who has
6684 been issued a certificate of competency by the department.
6685 (18)(19) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose
6686 scope of practice is limited to a specific segment of electrical
6687 or alarm system contracting established in a category adopted by
6688 department board rule, including, but not limited to,
6689 residential electrical contracting, maintenance of electrical
6690 fixtures, and fabrication, erection, installation, and
6691 maintenance of electrical and nonelectrical advertising signs
6692 together with the interrelated parts and supports thereof.
6693 (22)(23) "Registered residential alarm system contractor"
6694 means an alarm system contractor whose business is limited to
6695 burglar alarm systems in single-family residential, quadruplex
6696 housing, and mobile homes of a residential occupancy class and
6697 who is registered with the department pursuant to s. 489.513.
6698 The department board shall define "residential occupancy class"
6699 by rule. A registered residential alarm system contractor may
6700 contract only in the jurisdiction for which his or her
Page 268 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6701 registration is issued.
6702 Section 206. Subsection (1) of section 489.509, Florida
6703 Statutes, is amended to read:
6704 489.509 Fees.—
6705 (1) The department board, by rule, shall establish fees to
6706 be paid for applications, examination, reexamination, transfers,
6707 licensing and renewal, reinstatement, and recordmaking and
6708 recordkeeping. The examination fee shall be in an amount that
6709 covers the cost of obtaining and administering the examination
6710 and shall be refunded if the applicant is found ineligible to
6711 sit for the examination. The application fee is nonrefundable.
6712 The fee for initial application and examination for
6713 certification of electrical contractors may not exceed $400. The
6714 initial application fee for registration may not exceed $150.
6715 The biennial renewal fee may not exceed $400 for
6716 certificateholders and $200 for registrants. The fee for initial
6717 application and examination for certification of alarm system
6718 contractors may not exceed $400. The biennial renewal fee for
6719 certified alarm system contractors may not exceed $450. The
6720 department board may establish a fee for a temporary certificate
6721 as an alarm system contractor not to exceed $75. The department
6722 board may also establish by rule a delinquency fee not to exceed
6723 $50. The fee to transfer a certificate or registration from one
6724 business organization to another may not exceed $200. The fee
6725 for reactivation of an inactive license may not exceed $50. The
Page 269 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6726 department board shall establish fees that are adequate to
6727 ensure the continued operation of the department board. Fees
6728 shall be based on department estimates of the revenue required
6729 to implement this part and the provisions of law with respect to
6730 the regulation of electrical contractors and alarm system
6731 contractors.
6732 Section 207. Section 489.510, Florida Statutes, is amended
6733 to read:
6734 489.510 Evidence of workers' compensation coverage.—Except
6735 as provided in s. 489.515(3)(b), any person, business
6736 organization, or qualifying agent engaged in the business of
6737 contracting in this state and certified or registered under this
6738 part shall, as a condition precedent to the issuance or renewal
6739 of a certificate or registration of the contractor, provide to
6740 the department Electrical Contractors' Licensing Board, as
6741 provided by department board rule, evidence of workers'
6742 compensation coverage pursuant to chapter 440. In the event that
6743 the Division of Workers' Compensation of the Department of
6744 Financial Services receives notice of the cancellation of a
6745 policy of workers' compensation insurance insuring a person or
6746 entity governed by this section, the Division of Workers'
6747 Compensation shall certify and identify all persons or entities
6748 by certification or registration license number to the
6749 department after verification is made by the Division of
6750 Workers' Compensation that persons or entities governed by this
Page 270 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6751 section are no longer covered by workers' compensation
6752 insurance. Such certification and verification by the Division
6753 of Workers' Compensation may result from records furnished to
6754 the Division of Workers' Compensation by the persons or entities
6755 governed by this section or an investigation completed by the
6756 Division of Workers' Compensation. The department shall notify
6757 the persons or entities governed by this section who have been
6758 determined to be in noncompliance with chapter 440, and the
6759 persons or entities notified shall provide certification of
6760 compliance with chapter 440 to the department and pay an
6761 administrative fine in the amount of $500. The failure to
6762 maintain workers' compensation coverage as required by law shall
6763 be grounds for the department board to revoke, suspend, or deny
6764 the issuance or renewal of a certificate or registration of the
6765 contractor under the provisions of s. 489.533.
6766 Section 208. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and
6767 subsections (2) through (5) of section 489.511, Florida
6768 Statutes, are amended to read:
6769 489.511 Certification; application; examinations;
6770 endorsement.—
6771 (1)
6772 (b) Any person desiring to be certified as a contractor
6773 shall apply to the department in writing and must meet the
6774 following criteria:
6775 1. Be of good moral character;
Page 271 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6776 2. Pass the certification examination, achieving a passing
6777 grade as established by department board rule; and
6778 3. Meet eligibility requirements according to one of the
6779 following criteria:
6780 a. Has, within the 6 years immediately preceding the
6781 filing of the application, at least 3 years of proven management
6782 experience in the trade or education equivalent thereto, or a
6783 combination thereof, but not more than one-half of such
6784 experience may be educational equivalent;
6785 b. Has, within the 8 years immediately preceding the
6786 filing of the application, at least 4 years of experience as a
6787 supervisor or contractor in the trade for which he or she is
6788 making application, or at least 4 years of experience as a
6789 supervisor in electrical or alarm system work with the United
6790 States Armed Forces;
6791 c. Has, within the 12 years immediately preceding the
6792 filing of the application, at least 6 years of comprehensive
6793 training, technical education, or supervisory experience
6794 associated with an electrical or alarm system contracting
6795 business, or at least 6 years of technical experience,
6796 education, or training in electrical or alarm system work with
6797 the United States Armed Forces or a governmental entity;
6798 d. Has, within the 12 years immediately preceding the
6799 filing of the application, been licensed for 3 years as a
6800 professional engineer who is qualified by education, training,
Page 272 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6801 or experience to practice electrical engineering; or
6802 e. Has any combination of qualifications under sub-
6803 subparagraphs a.-c. totaling 6 years of experience.
6804 (2) The department board may determine by rule the number
6805 of times per year the applicant may take the examination and
6806 after three unsuccessful attempts may require the applicant to
6807 complete additional college-level or technical education courses
6808 in the areas of deficiency, as determined by the department
6809 board, as a condition of future eligibility to take the
6810 examination.
6811 (3)(a) "Good moral character" means a personal history of
6812 honesty, fairness, and respect for the rights of others and for
6813 laws of this state and nation.
6814 (b) The department board may determine that an individual
6815 applying for certification is ineligible for failure to satisfy
6816 the requirement of good moral character only if:
6817 1. There is a substantial connection between the lack of
6818 good moral character of the individual and the professional
6819 responsibilities of a certified contractor; and
6820 2. The finding by the department board of lack of good
6821 moral character is supported by clear and convincing evidence.
6822 (c) When an individual is found to be unqualified for
6823 certification because of a lack of good moral character, the
6824 department board shall furnish such individual a statement
6825 containing the findings of the department board, a complete
Page 273 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6826 record of the evidence upon which the determination was based,
6827 and a notice of the rights of the individual to a rehearing and
6828 appeal.
6829 (4) The department board shall, by rule, designate those
6830 types of specialty electrical or alarm system contractors who
6831 may be certified under this part. The limit of the scope of work
6832 and responsibility of a certified specialty contractor shall be
6833 established by department board rule. A certified specialty
6834 contractor category exists as an optional statewide licensing
6835 category. Qualification for certification in a specialty
6836 category created by rule shall be the same as set forth in
6837 paragraph (1)(b). The existence of a specialty category created
6838 by rule does not itself create any licensing requirement;
6839 however, neither does its optional nature remove any licensure
6840 requirement established elsewhere in this part.
6841 (5) The department board shall certify as qualified for
6842 certification by endorsement any individual applying for
6843 certification who:
6844 (a) Meets the requirements for certification as set forth
6845 in this section; has passed a national, regional, state, or
6846 United States territorial licensing examination that is
6847 substantially equivalent to the examination required by this
6848 part; and has satisfied the requirements set forth in s.
6849 489.521;
6850 (b) Holds a valid license to practice electrical or alarm
Page 274 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6851 system contracting issued by another state or territory of the
6852 United States, if the criteria for issuance of such license were
6853 substantially equivalent to the certification criteria that
6854 existed in this state at the time the certificate was issued; or
6855 (c) Has held a valid, current license to practice
6856 electrical or alarm system contracting issued by another state
6857 or territory of the United States for at least 10 years before
6858 the date of application and is applying for the same or similar
6859 license in this state, subject to ss. 489.510 and 489.521(3)(a)
6860 and subparagraph (1)(b)1. Such application must be made either
6861 when the license in another state or territory is active or
6862 within 2 years after such license was last active. Electrical
6863 contractors and alarm system contractors must complete a 2-hour
6864 course on the Florida Building Code. The required courses may be
6865 completed online.
6866 Section 209. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) and
6867 subsections (3) and (6) of section 489.513, Florida Statutes,
6868 are amended to read:
6869 489.513 Registration; application; requirements.—
6870 (1) Any person engaged in the business of contracting in
6871 the state shall be registered in the proper classification
6872 unless he or she is certified. Any person desiring to be a
6873 registered contractor shall apply to the department for
6874 registration and must:
6875 (c) Meet eligibility requirements according to the
Page 275 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6876 following criteria:
6877 1. As used in this subsection, the term "good moral
6878 character" means a personal history of honesty, fairness, and
6879 respect for the rights of others and for state and federal law.
6880 2. The department board may determine that an individual
6881 applying for registration is ineligible due to failure to
6882 satisfy the requirement of good moral character only if:
6883 a. There is a substantial connection between the lack of
6884 good moral character of the individual and the professional
6885 responsibilities of a registered contractor; and
6886 b. The finding by the department board of lack of good
6887 moral character is supported by clear and convincing evidence.
6888 3. When an individual is found to be unqualified because
6889 of lack of good moral character, the department board must
6890 furnish such individual a statement containing the findings of
6891 the department board, a complete record of evidence upon which
6892 the determination was based, and a notice of the rights of the
6893 individual to a rehearing and an appeal.
6894 (3) To be registered as an electrical contractor, an alarm
6895 system contractor I, an alarm system contractor II, or a
6896 residential alarm system contractor, the applicant shall file
6897 evidence of holding a current certificate of competency issued
6898 by any municipality or county of the state for the type of work
6899 for which registration is desired, on a form provided by the
6900 department, together with evidence of having passed an
Page 276 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6901 appropriate local examination, written or oral, designed to test
6902 skills and knowledge relevant to the technical performance of
6903 the profession, accompanied by the registration fee fixed
6904 pursuant to this part. For any person working or wishing to work
6905 in any local jurisdiction that does not require an examination
6906 for its license, the applicant may apply and shall be considered
6907 qualified to be issued a registration in the appropriate
6908 electrical or alarm system category, provided that he or she
6909 shows that he or she has scored at least 75 percent on an
6910 examination which is substantially equivalent to the examination
6911 approved by the department board for certification in the
6912 category and that he or she has had at least 3 years' technical
6913 experience in the trade. The requirement to take and pass an
6914 examination in order to obtain a registration does shall not
6915 apply to persons making application before prior to the
6916 effective date of this act.
6917 (6) The local jurisdictions are responsible for providing
6918 the following information to the department board within 30 days
6919 after licensure of, or any disciplinary action against, a
6920 locally licensed contractor who is registered under this part:
6921 (a) Licensure information.
6922 (b) Code violation information pursuant to s. 553.781.
6923 (c) Disciplinary information.
6924
6925 The department board shall maintain such licensure and
Page 277 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6926 disciplinary information as it is provided to the department
6927 board and shall make the information available through the
6928 automated information system provided pursuant to s. 455.2286.
6929 Section 210. Section 489.514, Florida Statutes, is amended
6930 to read:
6931 489.514 Certification for registered contractors;
6932 grandfathering provisions.—
6933 (1) The department board shall, upon receipt of a
6934 completed application, appropriate fee, and proof of compliance
6935 with the provisions of this section, issue:
6936 (a) To an applying registered electrical contractor, a
6937 certificate as an electrical contractor, as defined in s.
6938 489.505(12);
6939 (b) To an applying registered alarm system contractor, a
6940 certificate in the matching alarm system contractor category, as
6941 defined in s. 489.505(2)(a) or (b); or
6942 (c) To an applying registered electrical specialty
6943 contractor, a certificate in the matching electrical specialty
6944 contractor category, as defined in s. 489.505(19).
6945 (2) Any contractor registered under this part who makes
6946 application under this section to the department board shall
6947 meet each of the following requirements for certification:
6948 (a) Currently holds a valid registered local license in
6949 the category of electrical contractor, alarm system contractor,
6950 or electrical specialty contractor.
Page 278 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6951 (b) Has, for that category, passed a written, proctored
6952 examination that the department board finds to be substantially
6953 similar to the examination required to be licensed as a
6954 certified contractor under this part. For purposes of this
6955 subsection, a written, proctored examination such as that
6956 produced by the National Assessment Institute, Block and
6957 Associates, NAI/Block, Experior Assessments, Professional
6958 Testing, Inc., or Assessment Systems, Inc., shall be considered
6959 to be substantially similar to the examination required to be
6960 licensed as a certified contractor. The department board may not
6961 impose or make any requirements regarding the nature or content
6962 of these cited examinations.
6963 (c) Has at least 5 years of experience as a contractor in
6964 that contracting category, or as an inspector or building
6965 administrator with oversight over that category, at the time of
6966 application. For contractors, only time periods in which the
6967 contractor license is active and the contractor is not on
6968 probation shall count toward the 5 years required under this
6969 subsection.
6970 (d) Has not had his or her contractor's license revoked at
6971 any time, had his or her contractor's license suspended in the
6972 last 5 years, or been assessed a fine in excess of $500 in the
6973 last 5 years.
6974 (e) Is in compliance with the insurance and financial
6975 responsibility requirements in s. 489.515(1)(b).
Page 279 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
6976 Section 211. Section 489.515, Florida Statutes, is amended
6977 to read:
6978 489.515 Issuance of certificates; registrations.—
6979 (1)(a) The department shall issue a certificate to a
6980 person who the department board certifies is qualified to become
6981 a certified contractor.
6982 (b) The department board shall certify as qualified for
6983 certification any person who satisfies the requirements of s.
6984 489.511 and who submits satisfactory evidence that he or she has
6985 obtained both workers' compensation insurance or an acceptable
6986 exemption certificate issued by the department and public
6987 liability and property damage insurance for the health, safety,
6988 and welfare of the public in amounts determined by rule of the
6989 department board, and furnishes evidence of financial
6990 responsibility, credit, and business reputation of either
6991 himself or herself or the business organization he or she
6992 desires to qualify.
6993 (c) Upon compliance with the provisions of this section
6994 and payment of the certification fee, the department shall issue
6995 the person a certificate.
6996 (2) The department shall issue a registration to a person
6997 who is in compliance with the provisions of s. 489.513 and who
6998 the department board certifies is qualified to be registered.
6999 (3)(a) As a prerequisite to the initial issuance or the
7000 renewal of a certificate or registration, the applicant shall
Page 280 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7001 submit an affidavit on a form provided by the department board
7002 attesting to the fact that the applicant has obtained both
7003 workers' compensation insurance or an acceptable exemption
7004 certificate issued by the department and public liability and
7005 property damage insurance for the health, safety, and welfare of
7006 the public in amounts determined by rule of the department
7007 board. The department board shall by rule establish a procedure
7008 to verify the accuracy of such affidavits based upon a random
7009 audit method.
7010 (b) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate or
7011 registration shall submit as a prerequisite to qualifying for an
7012 exemption from workers' compensation coverage requirements under
7013 s. 440.05 an affidavit attesting to the fact that the applicant
7014 will obtain an exemption within 30 days after the date the
7015 initial certificate or registration is issued by the department
7016 board.
7017 (4) The department board may refuse to certify any
7018 applicant who has violated any of the provisions of s. 489.533.
7019 (5) A certificate or registration is not transferable.
7020 Section 212. Subsection (4) of section 489.516, Florida
7021 Statutes, is amended to read:
7022 489.516 Qualifications to practice; restrictions;
7023 prerequisites.—
7024 (4) A county or municipality may suspend or deny a locally
7025 issued permit when the local building official, tax collector,
Page 281 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7026 or other authorized person determines that the contractor has
7027 failed to obtain both workers' compensation insurance or an
7028 acceptable exemption certificate issued by the department and
7029 public liability and property damage insurance in the amounts
7030 determined by rule of the department board.
7031 Section 213. Section 489.5161, Florida Statutes, is
7032 amended to read:
7033 489.5161 Credit for relevant military training and
7034 education.—
7035 (1) The department shall provide a method by which
7036 honorably discharged veterans may apply for licensure. The
7037 method must include a veteran-specific application and provide,
7038 to the fullest extent possible, credit toward the requirements
7039 for licensure for military experience, training, and education
7040 received and completed during service in the United States Armed
7041 Forces if the military experience, training, or education is
7042 substantially similar to the experience, training, or education
7043 required for licensure. The department board may adopt rules
7044 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this
7045 subsection.
7046 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning
7047 October 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the department, in
7048 conjunction with the board, is directed to prepare and submit a
7049 report titled "Construction and Electrical Contracting Veteran
7050 Applicant Statistics" to the Governor, the President of the
Page 282 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7051 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The
7052 report shall include statistics and information relating to this
7053 section and s. 489.1131 which detail:
7054 (a) The number of applicants who identified themselves as
7055 veterans.
7056 (b) The number of veterans whose application for a license
7057 was approved.
7058 (c) The number of veterans whose application for a license
7059 was denied, including data on the reasons for denial.
7060 (d) Data on the application processing times for veterans.
7061 (e) Recommendations on ways to improve the department's
7062 ability to meet the needs of veterans which would effectively
7063 address the challenges that veterans face when separating from
7064 military service and seeking a license regulated by the
7065 department pursuant to this part.
7066 Section 214. Subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section
7067 489.517, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3),
7068 (4), and (5), respectively, and present subsections (3), (5),
7069 and (6) of that section are amended to read:
7070 489.517 Renewal of certificate or registration; continuing
7071 education.—
7072 (3)(a) Each certificateholder or registrant licensed as a
7073 specialty contractor or an alarm system contractor shall provide
7074 proof, in a form established by rule of the board, that the
7075 certificateholder or registrant has completed at least 7
Page 283 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7076 classroom hours of at least 50 minutes each of continuing
7077 education courses during each biennium since the issuance or
7078 renewal of the certificate or registration. The board shall by
7079 rule establish criteria for the approval of continuing education
7080 courses and providers and may by rule establish criteria for
7081 accepting alternative nonclassroom continuing education on an
7082 hour-for-hour basis.
7083 (b) Each certificateholder or registrant licensed as an
7084 electrical contractor shall provide proof, in a form established
7085 by rule of the board, that the certificateholder or registrant
7086 has completed at least 11 classroom hours of at least 50 minutes
7087 each of continuing education courses during each biennium since
7088 the issuance or renewal of the certificate or registration. The
7089 board shall by rule establish criteria for the approval of
7090 continuing education courses and providers and may by rule
7091 establish criteria for accepting alternative nonclassroom
7092 continuing education on an hour-for-hour basis.
7093 (4)(5) By applying for renewal, each certificateholder or
7094 registrant certifies that he or she has continually maintained
7095 the required amounts of public liability and property damage
7096 insurance as specified by department board rule. The department
7097 board shall establish by rule a procedure to verify the public
7098 liability and property damage insurance for a specified period,
7099 based upon a random sampling method.
7100 (6) The board shall require, by rule adopted pursuant to
Page 284 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7101 ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54, a specialized number of hours in
7102 specialized or advanced module courses, approved by the Florida
7103 Building Commission, on any portion of the Florida Building
7104 Code, adopted pursuant to part IV of chapter 553, relating to
7105 the contractor's respective discipline.
7106 Section 215. Subsection (6) of section 489.518, Florida
7107 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5), and paragraph (b) of
7108 subsection (1), paragraphs (b) and (d) of subsection (4), and
7109 subsection (5) of that section are amended, to read:
7110 489.518 Alarm system agents.—
7111 (1) A licensed electrical or alarm system contractor may
7112 not employ a person to perform the duties of a burglar alarm
7113 system agent unless the person:
7114 (b) Has successfully completed a minimum of 14 hours of
7115 training within 90 days after employment, to include basic alarm
7116 system electronics in addition to related training including
7117 CCTV and access control training, with at least 2 hours of
7118 training in the prevention of false alarms. Such training shall
7119 be from a department-approved board-approved provider, and the
7120 employee or applicant for employment shall provide proof of
7121 successful completion to the licensed employer. The department
7122 board shall by rule establish criteria for the approval of
7123 training courses and providers and may by rule establish
7124 criteria for accepting alternative nonclassroom education on an
7125 hour-for-hour basis. The department board shall approve
Page 285 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7126 providers that conduct training in other than the English
7127 language. The department board shall establish a fee for the
7128 approval of training providers or courses, not to exceed $60.
7129 Qualified employers may conduct training classes for their
7130 employees, with department board approval.
7131 (4)
7132 (b) The identification card shall be designed in a
7133 department-approved board-approved format. The card must include
7134 a picture of the agent, must specify at least the name of the
7135 holder of the card and the name and license number of the
7136 contractor, and must be signed by the contractor and by the
7137 holder of the card. Each identification card is valid for a
7138 period of 4 2 years after the date of issuance. The
7139 identification card must be in the possession of each burglar
7140 alarm system agent while engaged in burglar alarm system agent
7141 duties.
7142 (d) Each identification card must be renewed every 4 2
7143 years and in a board-approved format to show compliance with the
7144 6 hours of continuing education necessary to maintain
7145 certification as a burglar alarm system agent.
7146 (5) Each burglar alarm system agent must receive 6 hours
7147 of continuing education on burglar alarm system installation and
7148 repair and false alarm prevention every 2 years from a board-
7149 approved sponsor of training and through a board-approved
7150 training course.
Page 286 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7151 Section 216. Subsection (6) of section 489.5185, Florida
7152 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5) and paragraph (b) of
7153 subsection (1), paragraphs (a) and (f) of subsection (2),
7154 paragraphs (b) and (d) of subsection (4), and subsection (5) of
7155 that section are amended, to read:
7156 489.5185 Fire alarm system agents.—
7157 (1) A certified unlimited electrical contractor or
7158 licensed fire alarm contractor may not employ a person to
7159 perform the duties of a fire alarm system agent unless the
7160 person:
7161 (b) Has successfully completed a minimum of 14 hours of
7162 initial training, to include basic fire alarm system technology
7163 in addition to related training in National Fire Protection
7164 Association (NFPA) codes and standards and access control
7165 training, with at least 2 hours of training in the prevention of
7166 false alarms. Such training must be from a department-approved
7167 board-approved provider, and the employee or applicant for
7168 employment must provide proof of successful completion to the
7169 licensed employer. The department board, by rule, shall
7170 establish criteria for the approval of training courses and
7171 providers. The department board shall approve qualified
7172 providers that conduct training in other than the English
7173 language. The department board shall establish a fee for the
7174 approval of training providers, not to exceed $200, and a fee
7175 for the approval of courses at $25 per credit hour, not to
Page 287 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7176 exceed $100 per course.
7177 (2)(a) Any applicant for employment as a fire alarm system
7178 agent, or any individual employed as a fire alarm system agent
7179 on the effective date of this act, who has completed alarm
7180 system agent or burglar alarm system agent training before prior
7181 to the effective date of this act in a department-certified
7182 board-certified program is not required to take additional
7183 training in order to comply with the initial training
7184 requirements of this section.
7185 (f) If a person holds a current National Institute of
7186 Certification in Engineering Technologies (NICET) Level II
7187 certification or higher in Fire Alarm Systems or Inspection and
7188 Testing of Fire Alarm Systems, a current certification as an
7189 Electronic Security Association (ESA) Certified Fire Alarm
7190 Technician, or a current certification as an ESA Certified Fire
7191 Alarm Designer, he or she is required to complete only the 2
7192 hours of training in the prevention of false alarms required by
7193 paragraph (1)(b) from a department-approved board-approved
7194 sponsor of training and through a department-approved board-
7195 approved training course.
7196 (4)
7197 (b) The card shall follow a department-approved board-
7198 approved format, to include a picture of the agent; shall
7199 specify at least the name of the holder of the card and the name
7200 and license number of the certified unlimited electrical
Page 288 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7201 contractor or licensed fire alarm contractor; and shall be
7202 signed by both the contractor and the holder of the card. Each
7203 identification card shall be valid for a period of 4 2 years
7204 after the date of issuance. The identification card must be in
7205 the possession of the fire alarm system agent while engaged in
7206 fire alarm system agent duties.
7207 (d) Each identification card must be renewed every 2 years
7208 and in a board-approved format to show compliance with the 6
7209 hours of continuing education necessary to maintain
7210 certification as a fire alarm system agent.
7211 (5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), each fire
7212 alarm system agent must receive 6 hours of continuing education
7213 on fire alarm system installation and repair and false alarm
7214 prevention every 2 years from a board-approved sponsor of
7215 training and through a board-approved training course.
7216 (b) A person holding a current NICET Level II
7217 certification or higher in Fire Alarm Systems or Inspection and
7218 Testing of Fire Alarm Systems, certification as an ESA Certified
7219 Fire Alarm Technician, or certification as an ESA Certified Fire
7220 Alarm Designer is required to complete only 2 hours of
7221 continuing education training in the prevention of false alarms
7222 every 2 years from a board-approved sponsor of training and
7223 through a board-approved training course.
7224 Section 217. Subsection (4) of section 489.519, Florida
7225 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (3), and subsection (1)
Page 289 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7226 and present subsection (3) of that section are amended to read:
7227 489.519 Inactive status.—
7228 (1) A certificate or registration that becomes inactive
7229 may be reactivated under s. 489.517 upon application to the
7230 department. The board may not require a licensee to complete
7231 more than one renewal cycle of continuing education to
7232 reactivate a certificate or registration.
7233 (3) The board shall impose, by rule, continuing education
7234 requirements for inactive certificateholders, when inactive
7235 status is sought by certificateholders who are also building
7236 code administrators, plans examiners, or inspectors certified
7237 pursuant to part XII of chapter 468.
7238 Section 218. Section 489.520, Florida Statutes, is amended
7239 to read:
7240 489.520 Automated licensure status information system.—By
7241 January 1, 1995, the department shall implement an automated
7242 licensure status information system for electrical and alarm
7243 system contracting. The system shall provide instant
7244 notification to local building departments and other interested
7245 parties, as determined by the board or department, regarding the
7246 status of the certification or registration of any contractor
7247 certified or registered pursuant to the provisions of this part.
7248 The provision of such information shall consist, at a minimum,
7249 of an indication of whether the certification or registration of
7250 the contractor applying for a permit is active, of any current
Page 290 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7251 failure of the contractor to make restitution according to the
7252 terms of any final action by the department board, of any
7253 ongoing disciplinary cases against the contractor that are
7254 subject to public disclosure, and whether there are any
7255 outstanding fines against the contractor.
7256 Section 219. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2),
7257 subsections (3), (4), and (5), paragraph (c) of subsection (7),
7258 subsections (8) and (9), and paragraph (b) of subsection (10) of
7259 section 489.521, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
7260 489.521 Business organizations; qualifying agents.—
7261 (2)(a)1. If the applicant proposing to engage in
7262 contracting is a partnership, corporation, business trust, or
7263 other legal entity, other than a sole proprietorship, the
7264 application shall state the name of the partnership and its
7265 partners; the name of the corporation and its officers and
7266 directors and the name of each of its stockholders who is also
7267 an officer or director; the name of the business trust and its
7268 trustees; or the name of such other legal entity and its
7269 members. In addition, the applicant shall furnish evidence of
7270 statutory compliance if a fictitious name is used. A joint
7271 venture, including a joint venture composed of qualified
7272 business organizations, is itself a separate and distinct
7273 organization that shall be qualified in accordance with
7274 department board rules. The registration or certification, when
7275 issued upon application of a business organization, shall be in
Page 291 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7276 the name of the qualifying agent, and the name of the business
7277 organization shall be noted thereon. If there is a change in any
7278 information that is required to be stated on the application,
7279 the business organization shall, within 45 days after such
7280 change occurs, mail the correct information to the department.
7281 2. Any person certified or registered pursuant to this
7282 part who has had his or her license revoked may shall not be
7283 eligible for a 5-year period to be a partner, officer, director,
7284 or trustee of a business organization as defined by this
7285 section. Such person shall also be ineligible to reapply for
7286 certification or registration under this part for a period of 5
7287 years.
7288 (b) The applicant shall also show that the proposed
7289 qualifying agent is legally qualified to act for the business
7290 organization in all matters connected with its electrical or
7291 alarm system contracting business and concerning regulations by
7292 the department board and that he or she has authority to
7293 supervise electrical or alarm system contracting undertaken by
7294 the business organization.
7295 (3)(a) The applicant shall furnish evidence of financial
7296 responsibility, credit, and business reputation of the business
7297 organization, as well as the name of the qualifying agent. The
7298 department board shall adopt rules defining financial
7299 responsibility based upon the business organization's credit
7300 history, ability to be bonded, and any history of bankruptcy or
Page 292 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7301 assignment of receivers. Such rules shall specify the financial
7302 responsibility grounds on which the department board may
7303 determine that a business organization is not qualified to
7304 engage in contracting.
7305 (b) In the event a qualifying agent must take the
7306 certification examination, the department board shall, within 60
7307 days from the date of the examination, inform the business
7308 organization in writing whether or not its qualifying agent has
7309 qualified.
7310 (c) If the qualifying agent of a business organization
7311 applying to engage in contracting, after having been notified to
7312 do so, does not appear for examination within 1 year from the
7313 date of filing of the application, the examination fee paid by
7314 it shall be credited as an earned fee to the department. A new
7315 application to engage in contracting shall be accompanied by
7316 another application fee fixed pursuant to this act. Forfeiture
7317 of a fee may be waived by the department board for good cause.
7318 (d) Once the department board has determined that the
7319 business organization's proposed qualifying agent has qualified,
7320 the business organization shall be authorized to engage in the
7321 contracting business. The certificate, when issued, shall be in
7322 the name of the qualifying agent, and the name of the business
7323 organization shall be noted thereon.
7324 (4) As a prerequisite to the initial issuance of a
7325 certificate, the applicant or the business organization he or
Page 293 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7326 she qualifies shall submit evidence that he or she or the
7327 business organization has obtained public liability and property
7328 damage insurance for the safety and welfare of the public in an
7329 amount to be determined by department board rule.
7330 (5) At least one officer or supervising employee of the
7331 business organization must be qualified under this act in order
7332 for the business organization to be qualified to engage in
7333 contracting in the category of the business conducted. If any
7334 individual so qualified on behalf of the business organization
7335 ceases to qualify the business organization, he or she shall
7336 notify the board and the department thereof within 30 days after
7337 such occurrence. In addition, if the individual is the only
7338 individual who qualifies the business organization, the business
7339 organization shall notify the board and the department of the
7340 individual's termination, and it shall have a period of 60 days
7341 from the termination of the individual to qualify another person
7342 under the provision of this act, failing which, the department
7343 board shall determine that the business organization is no
7344 longer qualified to engage in contracting. The individual shall
7345 also inform the department board in writing when he or she
7346 proposes to engage in contracting in his or her own name or in
7347 affiliation with another business organization, and the
7348 individual, or such new business organization, shall supply the
7349 same information to the department board as required for
7350 applicants under this act. After an investigation of the
Page 294 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7351 financial responsibility, credit, and business reputation of the
7352 individual or the new business organization and upon a favorable
7353 determination, the department board shall certify the business
7354 organization as qualified, and the department shall issue,
7355 without examination, a new certificate in the individual's name,
7356 which shall include the name of the new business organization,
7357 as provided in this section.
7358 (7)
7359 (c) The department board shall assess a fine of not less
7360 than $100 or issue a citation to any contractor who fails to
7361 include that contractor's certification or registration number
7362 when submitting an advertisement for publication, broadcast, or
7363 printing. In addition, any person who claims in any
7364 advertisement to be a certified or registered contractor, but
7365 who does not hold a valid state certification or registration,
7366 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as
7367 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
7368 (8) Each qualifying agent shall pay the department an
7369 amount equal to the original fee for certification or
7370 registration to qualify any additional business organizations.
7371 If the qualifying agent for a business organization desires to
7372 qualify additional business organizations, the department board
7373 shall require him or her to present evidence of supervisory
7374 ability and financial responsibility of each such organization.
7375 Allowing a licensee to qualify more than one business
Page 295 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7376 organization shall be conditioned upon the licensee showing that
7377 the licensee has both the capacity and intent to adequately
7378 supervise each business organization in accordance with s.
7379 489.522(1). The department may board shall not limit the number
7380 of business organizations which the licensee may qualify except
7381 upon the licensee's failing to provide such information as is
7382 required under this subsection or upon a finding that such
7383 information or evidence as is supplied is incomplete or
7384 unpersuasive in showing the licensee's capacity and intent to
7385 comply with the requirements of this subsection. A qualification
7386 for an additional business organization may be revoked or
7387 suspended upon a finding by the department board that the
7388 licensee has failed in the licensee's responsibility to
7389 adequately supervise the operations of that business
7390 organization in accordance with s. 489.522(1). Failure of the
7391 responsibility to adequately supervise the operations of a
7392 business organization in accordance with s. 489.522(1) shall be
7393 grounds for denial to qualify additional business organizations.
7394 (9) If a business organization or any of its partners,
7395 officers, directors, trustees, or members is disciplined for
7396 violating s. 489.533(1), the department board may, on that basis
7397 alone, deny issuance of a certificate or registration to a
7398 qualifying agent on behalf of that business organization.
7399 (10)
7400 (b) Any business organization engaging in contracting
Page 296 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7401 under this subsection shall provide the department board with
7402 the name and license number of each registered or certified
7403 contractor employed by the business organization to supervise
7404 its contracting activities. The business organization is not
7405 required to post a bond or otherwise evidence any financial or
7406 credit information except as necessary to demonstrate compliance
7407 with paragraph (a).
7408 Section 220. Subsection (2) and paragraph (a) of
7409 subsection (3) of section 489.522, Florida Statutes, are amended
7410 to read:
7411 489.522 Qualifying agents; responsibilities.—
7412 (2) One of the qualifying agents for a business
7413 organization that has more than one qualifying agent may be
7414 designated as the sole primary qualifying agent for the business
7415 organization by a joint agreement that is executed, on a form
7416 provided by the department board, by all qualifying agents for
7417 the business organization. The joint agreement shall be
7418 submitted to the department board for approval. If the
7419 department board determines that the joint agreement is in good
7420 order, it shall approve the designation and immediately notify
7421 the qualifying agents of such approval. The designation made by
7422 the joint agreement is effective upon receipt of the notice by
7423 the qualifying agents. The qualifying agent designated for a
7424 business organization by a joint agreement is the sole primary
7425 qualifying agent for the business organization, and all other
Page 297 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7426 qualifying agents for the business organization are secondary
7427 qualifying agents.
7428 (a) A designated sole primary qualifying agent has all the
7429 responsibilities and duties of a primary qualifying agent,
7430 notwithstanding that there are secondary qualifying agents for
7431 specified jobs. The designated sole primary qualifying agent is
7432 jointly and equally responsible with secondary qualifying agents
7433 for field work supervision.
7434 (b) A secondary qualifying agent is responsible only for:
7435 1. The supervision of field work at sites where his or her
7436 license was used to obtain the building permit; and
7437 2. Any other work for which he or she accepts
7438 responsibility.
7439
7440 A secondary qualifying agent is not responsible for supervision
7441 of financial matters.
7442 (c) A primary qualifying agent shall have approval
7443 authority for checks, payments, drafts, and contracts issued by
7444 or entered into by the business organization.
7445 (3)(a) A qualifying agent who has been designated by a
7446 joint agreement as the sole primary qualifying agent for a
7447 business organization may terminate this status as such by
7448 giving actual notice to the business organization, to the
7449 department board, and to all secondary qualifying agents of his
7450 or her intention to terminate this status. The notice to the
Page 298 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7451 department board shall include proof satisfactory to the
7452 department board that he or she has given the notice required in
7453 this paragraph. The status of the qualifying agent shall cease
7454 upon the designation of a new primary qualifying agent or 60
7455 days after satisfactory notice of termination has been provided
7456 to the department board, whichever first occurs. If no new
7457 primary qualifying agent has been designated within 60 days, all
7458 secondary qualifying agents for the business organization shall
7459 become primary qualifying agents, unless the joint agreement
7460 specifies that one or more of them shall become sole qualifying
7461 agents under such circumstances, in which case only they shall
7462 become sole qualifying agents.
7463 Section 221. Section 489.523, Florida Statutes, is amended
7464 to read:
7465 489.523 Emergency registration upon death of contractor.—
7466 If an incomplete contract exists at the time of death of a
7467 contractor, the contract may be completed by any person even
7468 though not certified. The person shall notify the department
7469 appropriate board, within 30 days after the death of the
7470 contractor, of his or her name and address, knowledge of the
7471 contract, and ability to complete it. If the department board
7472 approves, he or she may proceed with the contract. The
7473 department board shall then issue an emergency registration
7474 which shall expire upon the completion of the contract. For
7475 purposes of this section, and upon written approval of the
Page 299 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7476 department board, an incomplete contract may be one which has
7477 been awarded to, or entered into by, the contractor before his
7478 or her death, or on which he or she was the low bidder and the
7479 contract is subsequently awarded to him or her, regardless of
7480 whether any actual work has commenced under the contract before
7481 the contractor's death.
7482 Section 222. Section 489.525, Florida Statutes, is amended
7483 to read:
7484 489.525 Report to local building officials.—The department
7485 may report to all building officials the contents of this part
7486 and the contents of the rules of the department board. Any
7487 information that is available through the Internet or other
7488 electronic means may be excluded from the report.
7489 Section 223. Subsections (2) through (6) and paragraphs
7490 (b) and (e) of subsection (7) of section 489.533, Florida
7491 Statutes, are amended to read:
7492 489.533 Disciplinary proceedings.—
7493 (2) When the department board finds any applicant,
7494 contractor, or business organization for which the contractor is
7495 a primary qualifying agent or secondary qualifying agent
7496 responsible under s. 489.522 guilty of any of the grounds set
7497 forth in subsection (1), it may enter an order imposing one or
7498 more of the following penalties:
7499 (a) Denial of an application for certification or
7500 registration.
Page 300 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7501 (b) Revocation or suspension of a certificate or
7502 registration.
7503 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
7504 $10,000 for each count or separate offense.
7505 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
7506 (e) Placement of the contractor on probation for a period
7507 of time and subject to such conditions as the department board
7508 may specify, including requiring the contractor to attend
7509 continuing education courses or to work under the supervision of
7510 another contractor.
7511 (f) Restriction of the authorized scope of practice by the
7512 contractor.
7513 (g) Require financial restitution to a consumer.
7514 (3) In recommending penalties in any proposed recommended
7515 final order, the department shall follow the penalty guidelines
7516 established by the department board by rule. The department
7517 shall advise the administrative law judge of the appropriate
7518 penalty, including mitigating and aggravating circumstances, and
7519 the specific rule citation.
7520 (4) The department board may not reinstate the certificate
7521 or registration of, or cause a certificate or registration to be
7522 issued to, a person who the department board has determined
7523 unqualified until it is satisfied that such person has complied
7524 with all the terms and conditions set forth in the final order
7525 and is capable of competently engaging in the business of
Page 301 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7526 contracting.
7527 (5) When the department board imposes administrative fines
7528 pursuant to subsection (2) resulting from violation of chapter
7529 633 or violation of the rules of the State Fire Marshal, 50
7530 percent of the fine shall be paid into the Insurance Regulatory
7531 Trust Fund to help defray the costs of investigating the
7532 violations and obtaining the corrective action. The State Fire
7533 Marshal may participate at its discretion, but not as a party,
7534 in any proceedings before the department board relating to
7535 violation of chapter 633 or the rules of the State Fire Marshal,
7536 in order to make recommendations as to the appropriate penalty
7537 in such case. However, the State Fire Marshal does shall not
7538 have standing to bring disciplinary proceedings regarding
7539 certification.
7540 (6) The department board may restrain any violation of
7541 this part by action in a court of competent jurisdiction.
7542 (7)
7543 (b) A No licensee may not avail himself or herself of the
7544 mediation process more than three times without the approval of
7545 the department board. The department board may consider the
7546 subject and the dates of the earlier complaints in rendering its
7547 decision. The board's decision shall not be considered a final
7548 agency action and is not appealable.
7549 (e) The department, in conjunction with the board, shall
7550 determine by rule the types of cases which may be included in
Page 302 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7551 the mediation process. The department may initiate or continue
7552 disciplinary action, pursuant to chapter 455 and this chapter
7553 against the licensee as determined by rule.
7554 Section 224. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
7555 489.5335, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
7556 489.5335 Journeyman; reciprocity; standards.—
7557 (1) Counties and municipalities are authorized to issue
7558 journeyman licenses in the electrical and alarm system trades to
7559 an individual who:
7560 (a) Has scored at least 70 percent, or after October 1,
7561 1997, at least 75 percent, on a proctored journeyman Block and
7562 Associates examination or other proctored examination approved
7563 by the department board for the trade in which he or she is
7564 licensed;
7565 Section 225. Paragraph (e) of subsection (3) and
7566 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (5) of section 489.537,
7567 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
7568 489.537 Application of this part.—
7569 (3) Nothing in this act limits the power of a municipality
7570 or county:
7571 (e)1. To refuse to issue permits or issue permits with
7572 specific conditions to a contractor who has committed multiple
7573 violations, when he or she has been disciplined for each of them
7574 by the department board and when each disciplinary action has
7575 involved revocation or suspension of a license, imposition of an
Page 303 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7576 administrative fine of at least $1,000, or probation.
7577 2. To issue permits with specific conditions to a
7578 contractor who, within the previous 12 months, has had final
7579 action taken against him or her, by the department or by a local
7580 board or agency which licenses contractors and has reported the
7581 action pursuant to paragraph (5)(c), for engaging in the
7582 business or acting in the capacity of a contractor without a
7583 license.
7584 (5)
7585 (b) To engage in contracting in the territorial area, an
7586 applicant shall also be registered with the department board.
7587 (c) Each local board or agency which licenses contractors
7588 shall transmit monthly to the department board a report of any
7589 disciplinary action taken against contractors and any
7590 administrative or disciplinary action taken against unlicensed
7591 persons for engaging in the business or acting in the capacity
7592 of a contractor, including any cease and desist order issued
7593 pursuant to s. 489.516(2)(b).
7594 Section 226. Section 489.552, Florida Statutes, is amended
7595 to read:
7596 489.552 Registration required.—A person may shall not hold
7597 himself or herself out as a septic tank contractor or a master
7598 septic tank contractor in this state unless he or she is
7599 registered by the department in accordance with the provisions
7600 of this part. However, nothing in this part prohibits any person
Page 304 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7601 licensed pursuant to s. 489.105(2)(m) s. 489.105(3)(m) in this
7602 state from engaging in the profession for which he or she is
7603 licensed.
7604 Section 227. Subsection (1) of section 492.102, Florida
7605 Statutes, is amended to read:
7606 492.102 Definitions.—For the purposes of this chapter,
7607 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
7608 (1) "Board" means the Board of Professional Geologists.
7609 Section 228. Section 492.104, Florida Statutes, is amended
7610 to read:
7611 492.104 Rulemaking authority.—The department may Board of
7612 Professional Geologists has authority to adopt rules pursuant to
7613 ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this chapter. Every
7614 licensee shall be governed and controlled by this chapter and
7615 the rules adopted by the department board. The department board
7616 is authorized to set, by rule, fees for application,
7617 examination, late renewal, initial licensure, and license
7618 renewal. These fees may not exceed the cost of implementing the
7619 application, examination, initial licensure, and license renewal
7620 or other administrative process and shall be established as
7621 follows:
7622 (1) The application fee may shall not exceed $150 and
7623 shall be nonrefundable.
7624 (2) The examination fee may shall not exceed $250, and the
7625 fee may be apportioned to each part of a multipart examination.
Page 305 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7626 The examination fee shall be refundable in whole or part if the
7627 applicant is found to be ineligible to take any portion of the
7628 licensure examination.
7629 (3) The initial license fee may shall not exceed $100.
7630 (4) The biennial renewal fee may shall not exceed $150.
7631 (5) The fee for reactivation of an inactive license may
7632 not exceed $50.
7633 (6) The fee for a provisional license may not exceed $400.
7634 (7) The fee for application, examination, and licensure
7635 for a license by endorsement is as provided in this section for
7636 licenses in general.
7637 Section 229. Subsection (1), paragraph (b) of subsection
7638 (2), and subsection (3) of section 492.105, Florida Statutes,
7639 are amended to read:
7640 492.105 Licensure by examination; requirements; fees.—
7641 (1) Any person desiring to be licensed as a professional
7642 geologist shall apply to the department to take the licensure
7643 examination. The written licensure examination shall be designed
7644 to test an applicant's qualifications to practice professional
7645 geology, and shall include such subjects as will tend to
7646 ascertain the applicant's knowledge of the fundamentals, theory,
7647 and practice of professional geology and may include such
7648 subjects as are taught in curricula of accredited colleges and
7649 universities. The written licensure examination may be a
7650 multipart examination. The department shall examine each
Page 306 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7651 applicant who the department board certifies:
7652 (a) Has completed the application form and remitted a
7653 nonrefundable application fee and an examination fee which is
7654 refundable if the applicant is found to be ineligible to take
7655 the examination.
7656 (b) Is at least 18 years of age.
7657 (c) Has not committed any act or offense in any
7658 jurisdiction which would constitute the basis for disciplining a
7659 professional geologist licensed pursuant to this chapter.
7660 (d) Has fulfilled the following educational requirements
7661 at a college or university, the geological curricula of which
7662 meet the criteria established by an accrediting agency
7663 recognized by the United States Department of Education:
7664 1. Graduation from such college or university with a major
7665 in geology or other related science acceptable to the department
7666 board; and
7667 2. Satisfactory completion of at least 30 semester hours
7668 or 45 quarter hours of geological coursework.
7669 (e) Has at least 5 years of verified professional
7670 geological work experience, which includes a minimum of 3 years
7671 of professional geological work under the supervision of a
7672 licensed or qualified geologist or professional engineer
7673 registered under chapter 471 as qualified in the field or
7674 discipline of professional engineering work performed; or has a
7675 minimum of 5 accumulative years of verified geological work
Page 307 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7676 experience in responsible charge of geological work as
7677 determined by the department board.
7678 (2) The department shall issue a license to practice
7679 professional geology to any person who has:
7680 (b) Been certified by the department board as qualified to
7681 practice professional geology; and
7682 (3) The department may shall not issue a license to any
7683 applicant who is under investigation in any jurisdiction for an
7684 offense which would constitute a violation of this chapter. Upon
7685 completion of the investigation, the disciplinary provisions of
7686 s. 492.113 shall apply.
7687 Section 230. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 492.1051,
7688 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
7689 492.1051 Registered geologist-in-training; requirements.—
7690 (1) A person desiring to register as a geologist-in-
7691 training shall apply to the department to take a discrete
7692 portion of the examination required for licensure as a
7693 professional geologist in this state. This discrete portion
7694 shall cover the fundamentals of geology. The department shall
7695 examine each applicant who the department board certifies:
7696 (a) Has completed the application form and remitted a
7697 nonrefundable application fee and an examination fee that is
7698 refundable if the applicant is found to be ineligible to take
7699 the examination.
7700 (b) Has not committed an act or offense in any
Page 308 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7701 jurisdiction which constitutes grounds for disciplining a
7702 professional geologist licensed under this chapter; and
7703 (c) Has successfully completed at least 30 semester hours
7704 or 45 quarter hours of geological coursework at a college or
7705 university, the geological curricula of which meet the criteria
7706 established by an accrediting agency recognized by the United
7707 States Department of Education and, if still enrolled, has
7708 provided a letter of good academic standing from the college or
7709 university.
7710 (2) The department shall register as a geologist-in-
7711 training each applicant who the department board certifies has
7712 passed the fundamentals of geology portion of the licensure
7713 examination.
7714 Section 231. Section 492.106, Florida Statutes, is amended
7715 to read:
7716 492.106 Provisional licenses.—The department may provide a
7717 provisional license to any person who is not a resident of and
7718 has not established a place of business in this state, and who
7719 is duly licensed in another state, territory, or possession of
7720 the United States, or in the District of Columbia, and who has
7721 qualifications which the department board, upon advice of a
7722 committee of the department board, deems comparable to those
7723 required of professional geologists in this state, upon written
7724 application accompanied by the proper application fee, offered
7725 before prior to the practice of professional geology in this
Page 309 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7726 state, under the following restrictions:
7727 (1) Satisfactory proof of licensure as required above
7728 shall include the name, residence address, business address, and
7729 certification of the license of the applicant from the issuing
7730 state, together with the name and address of the authority
7731 issuing such license.
7732 (2) The practice of professional geology under a
7733 provisional license may shall not exceed 1 year.
7734 (3) The practice of professional geology under a
7735 provisional license shall be confined to one specified project.
7736 Such license may not be renewed or reissued for 5 years from the
7737 date of original issuance.
7738 (4) A written statement shall be furnished to the
7739 department within 60 days of completion of the work, indicating
7740 the time engaged and the nature of the work. A person holding a
7741 provisional license shall exhibit such provisional license each
7742 time and on each occasion that an indication of licensure is
7743 required.
7744 Section 232. Subsection (1) of section 492.107, Florida
7745 Statutes, is amended to read:
7746 492.107 Seals.—
7747 (1) The department board shall prescribe, by rule, a form
7748 of seal, including its electronic form, to be used by persons
7749 holding valid licenses. All geological papers, reports, and
7750 documents prepared or issued by the licensee shall be signed,
Page 310 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7751 dated, and sealed by the licensee who performed or is
7752 responsible for the supervision, direction, or control of the
7753 work contained in the papers, reports, or documents. Such
7754 signature, date, and seal shall be evidence of the authenticity
7755 of that to which they are affixed. Geological papers, reports,
7756 and documents prepared or issued by the licensee may be
7757 transmitted electronically provided they have been signed by the
7758 licensee, dated, and electronically sealed. It is unlawful for
7759 any person to sign or seal any document as a professional
7760 geologist unless that person holds a current, active license as
7761 a professional geologist which has not expired or been revoked
7762 or suspended, unless reinstated or reissued.
7763 Section 233. Subsection (1) of section 492.108, Florida
7764 Statutes, is amended to read:
7765 492.108 Licensure by endorsement; requirements; fees.—
7766 (1) The department shall issue a license by endorsement to
7767 any applicant who, upon applying to the department and remitting
7768 an application fee, has been certified by the department board
7769 that he or she:
7770 (a) Has met the qualifications for licensure in s.
7771 492.105(1)(b)-(e) and:
7772 1. Is the holder of an active license in good standing in
7773 a state, trust, territory, or possession of the United States.
7774 2. Was licensed through written examination in at least
7775 one state, trust, territory, or possession of the United States,
Page 311 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7776 the examination requirements of which have been approved by the
7777 department board as substantially equivalent to or more
7778 stringent than those of this state, and has received a score on
7779 such examination which is equal to or greater than the score
7780 required by this state for licensure by examination.
7781 3. Has taken and successfully passed the laws and rules
7782 portion of the examination required for licensure as a
7783 professional geologist in this state.
7784 (b) Has held a valid license to practice geology in
7785 another state, trust, territory, or possession of the United
7786 States for at least 10 years before the date of application and
7787 has successfully completed a state, regional, national, or other
7788 examination that is equivalent to or more stringent than the
7789 examination required by the department. If such applicant has
7790 met the requirements for a license by endorsement except
7791 successful completion of an examination that is equivalent to or
7792 more stringent than the examination required by the department
7793 board, such applicant may take the examination required by the
7794 department board. Such application must be submitted to the
7795 department board while the applicant holds a valid license in
7796 another state or territory or within 2 years after the
7797 expiration of such license.
7798 Section 234. Subsection (2) of section 492.109, Florida
7799 Statutes, is amended to read:
7800 492.109 Renewal of license; fees.—
Page 312 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7801 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
7802 procedure for the biennial renewal of licenses.
7803 Section 235. Subsection (2) of section 492.1101, Florida
7804 Statutes, is amended to read:
7805 492.1101 Inactive status.—
7806 (2) The department board shall adopt promulgate rules
7807 relating to the reactivation of inactive licenses and shall
7808 prescribe by rule a fee for the reactivation of inactive
7809 licenses.
7810 Section 236. Subsection (1) of section 492.111, Florida
7811 Statutes, is amended to read:
7812 492.111 Practice of professional geology by a firm,
7813 corporation, or partnership.—The practice of, or offer to
7814 practice, professional geology by individual professional
7815 geologists licensed under the provisions of this chapter through
7816 a firm, corporation, or partnership offering geological services
7817 to the public through individually licensed professional
7818 geologists as agents, employees, officers, or partners thereof
7819 is permitted subject to the provisions of this chapter, if:
7820 (1) At all times that it offers geological services to the
7821 public, the firm, corporation, or partnership is qualified by
7822 one or more individuals who hold a current, active license as a
7823 professional geologist in the state and are serving as a
7824 geologist of record for the firm, corporation, or partnership. A
7825 geologist of record may be any principal officer or employee of
Page 313 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7826 such firm or corporation, or any partner or employee of such
7827 partnership, who holds a current, active license as a
7828 professional geologist in this state, or any other Florida-
7829 licensed professional geologist with whom the firm, corporation,
7830 or partnership has entered into a long-term, ongoing
7831 relationship, as defined by rule of the department board, to
7832 serve as one of its geologists of record. The geologist of
7833 record shall notify the department of any changes in the
7834 relationship or identity of that geologist of record within 30
7835 days after such change.
7836 Section 237. Paragraph (k) of subsection (1) and
7837 subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 492.113, Florida
7838 Statutes, are amended to read:
7839 492.113 Disciplinary proceedings.—
7840 (1) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
7841 disciplinary actions in subsection (3) may be taken:
7842 (k) Violating a rule of the department or board or any
7843 order of the department or board previously entered in a
7844 disciplinary hearing.
7845 (2) The department board shall specify, by rule, what acts
7846 or omissions constitute a violation of subsection (1).
7847 (3) When the department board finds any person guilty of
7848 any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1), it may enter an
7849 order imposing one or more of the following penalties:
7850 (a) Denial of an application for licensure.
Page 314 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7851 (b) Revocation or suspension of a license.
7852 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
7853 $1,000 for each count or separate offense.
7854 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
7855 (e) Placement of the licensee on probation for a period of
7856 time and subject to such conditions as the department board may
7857 specify.
7858 (f) Restriction of the authorized scope of practice by the
7859 licensee.
7860 (4) The department shall reissue the license of a
7861 disciplined professional geologist upon certification by the
7862 department board that the disciplined person has complied with
7863 the terms and conditions set forth in the final order.
7864 Section 238. Subsections (11) and (12) of section
7865 493.6101, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
7866 493.6101 Definitions.—
7867 (11) "Sponsor" means any Class "C," Class "MA," or Class
7868 "M" licensee who supervises and maintains under his or her
7869 direction and control a Class "CC" provisional licensee intern;
7870 or any Class "E" or Class "MR" licensee who supervises and
7871 maintains under his or her direction and control a Class "EE"
7872 intern.
7873 (12) "Provisional licensee" "Intern" means an individual
7874 who studies as a trainee or apprentice under the direction and
7875 control of a designated sponsoring licensee.
Page 315 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7876 Section 239. Subsection (7) of section 493.6105, Florida
7877 Statutes, is amended to read:
7878 493.6105 Initial application for license.—
7879 (7) In addition to the application requirements for
7880 individuals, partners, or officers outlined under subsection
7881 (3), the application for an agency license must contain the
7882 following information:
7883 (a) The proposed name under which the agency intends to
7884 operate.
7885 (b) The street address, mailing address, and telephone
7886 numbers of the principal location at which business is to be
7887 conducted in this state.
7888 (c) The street address, mailing address, and telephone
7889 numbers of all branch offices within this state.
7890 (d) The names and titles of all partners or, in the case
7891 of a corporation, the names and titles of its principal
7892 officers.
7893 Section 240. Subsection (2) of section 493.6106, Florida
7894 Statutes, is amended to read:
7895 493.6106 License requirements; posting.—
7896 (2) Each agency shall have a minimum of one physical
7897 location within this state from which the normal business of the
7898 agency is conducted, and this location shall be considered the
7899 primary office for that agency in this state.
7900 (a) If an agency or branch office desires to change the
Page 316 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7901 physical location of the business, as it appears on the license,
7902 the department must be notified within 10 days after the change,
7903 and, except upon renewal, the fee prescribed in s. 493.6107 must
7904 be submitted for each license requiring revision. Each license
7905 requiring revision must be returned with such notification.
7906 (b) The Class "A," Class "B," or Class "R" license and any
7907 branch office or school license shall at all times be posted in
7908 a conspicuous place at the licensed physical location in this
7909 state where the business is conducted.
7910 (c) Each Class "A," Class "B," Class "R," branch office,
7911 or school licensee shall display, in a place that is in clear
7912 and unobstructed public view, a notice on a form prescribed by
7913 the department stating that the business operating at this
7914 location is licensed and regulated by the Department of
7915 Agriculture and Consumer Services and that any questions or
7916 complaints should be directed to the department.
7917 (d) A minimum of one properly licensed manager shall be
7918 designated for each agency and branch office location.
7919 Section 241. Subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section
7920 493.6111, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3),
7921 (4), and (5), respectively, and subsection (2) and present
7922 subsection (3) of that section are amended to read:
7923 493.6111 License; contents; identification card.—
7924 (2) Licenses shall be valid for a period of 4 2 years,
7925 except for Class "A," Class "B," Class "AB," Class "K," Class
Page 317 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7926 "R," and branch agency licenses, which shall be valid for a
7927 period of 3 years.
7928 (3) The department shall, upon complete application and
7929 payment of the appropriate fees, issue a separate license to
7930 each branch office for which application is made.
7931 Section 242. Subsection (1) and paragraph (b) of
7932 subsection (3) of section 493.6113, Florida Statutes, are
7933 amended to read:
7934 493.6113 Renewal application for licensure.—
7935 (1) A license granted under the provisions of this chapter
7936 shall be renewed every 4 years biennially by the department,
7937 except for Class "A," Class "B," Class "AB," Class "K," Class
7938 "R," and branch agency licenses, which shall be renewed every 3
7939 years.
7940 (3) Each licensee is responsible for renewing his or her
7941 license on or before its expiration by filing with the
7942 department an application for renewal accompanied by payment of
7943 the renewal fee and the fingerprint retention fee to cover the
7944 cost of ongoing retention in the statewide automated biometric
7945 identification system established in s. 943.05(2)(b). Upon the
7946 first renewal of a license issued under this chapter before
7947 January 1, 2017, the licensee shall submit a full set of
7948 fingerprints and fingerprint processing fees to cover the cost
7949 of entering the fingerprints into the statewide automated
7950 biometric identification system pursuant to s. 493.6108(4)(a)
Page 318 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7951 and the cost of enrollment in the Federal Bureau of
7952 Investigation's national retained print arrest notification
7953 program. Subsequent renewals may be completed without submission
7954 of a new set of fingerprints.
7955 (b) Each Class "G" licensee shall additionally submit
7956 proof that he or she has received during each year of the
7957 license period a minimum of 4 hours of firearms requalification
7958 training taught by a Class "K" licensee and has complied with
7959 such other health and training requirements that the department
7960 shall adopt by rule. Proof of completion of firearms
7961 requalification training shall be submitted to the department
7962 upon completion of the training. A Class "G" licensee must
7963 successfully complete this requalification training for each
7964 type and caliber of firearm carried in the course of performing
7965 his or her regulated duties. At the discretion of a Class "K"
7966 instructor, a Class "G" licensee may qualify for up to two
7967 calibers of firearms in one 4-hour firearm requalification class
7968 if the licensee successfully completes training for each
7969 firearm, including a separate course of fire for each caliber of
7970 firearm. If the licensee fails to complete the required 4 hours
7971 of annual training during the first year of the 2-year term of
7972 the license, the license is automatically suspended. The
7973 licensee must complete the minimum number of hours of range and
7974 classroom training required at the time of initial licensure and
7975 submit proof of completion of such training to the department
Page 319 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
7976 before the license may be reinstated. If the licensee fails to
7977 complete the required 4 hours of annual training during the
7978 second year of the 4-year 2-year term of the license, the
7979 licensee must complete the minimum number of hours of range and
7980 classroom training required at the time of initial licensure and
7981 submit proof of completion of such training to the department
7982 before the license may be renewed. The department may waive the
7983 firearms training requirement if:
7984 1. The applicant provides proof that he or she is
7985 currently certified as a law enforcement officer or correctional
7986 officer under the Criminal Justice Standards and Training
7987 Commission and has completed law enforcement firearms
7988 requalification training annually during the previous 4 years 2
7989 years of the licensure period;
7990 2. The applicant provides proof that he or she is
7991 currently certified as a federal law enforcement officer and has
7992 received law enforcement firearms training administered by a
7993 federal law enforcement agency annually during the previous 4
7994 years 2 years of the licensure period;
7995 3. The applicant submits a valid firearm certificate among
7996 those specified in s. 493.6105(6)(a) and provides proof of
7997 having completed requalification training during the previous 4
7998 years 2 years of the licensure period; or
7999 4. The applicant provides proof that he or she has
8000 completed annual firearms training in accordance with the
Page 320 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8001 requirements of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act
8002 under 18 U.S.C. ss. 926B-926C.
8003 Section 243. Section 493.6116, Florida Statutes, is
8004 amended to read:
8005 493.6116 Sponsorship of provisional licensees interns.—
8006 (1) Only licensees may sponsor provisional licensees
8007 interns. A Class "C," Class "M," or Class "MA" licensee may
8008 sponsor a Class "CC" provisional licensees private investigator
8009 intern; a Class "E" or Class "MR" licensee may sponsor a Class
8010 "EE" recovery agent intern.
8011 (2) Provisional licensure An internship may not commence
8012 until the sponsor has submitted to the department the notice of
8013 intent to sponsor. Such notice shall be on a form provided by
8014 the department.
8015 (3) Provisional licensure Internship is intended to serve
8016 as a learning process. Sponsors shall assume a training status
8017 by providing direction and control of provisional licensees
8018 interns. Sponsors shall not allow provisional licensees interns
8019 to operate independently of such direction and control or
8020 require provisional licensees interns to perform activities that
8021 do not enhance the provisional licensee's intern's qualification
8022 for licensure. Provisional licensees Interns must perform
8023 regulated duties within the boundaries of this state during the
8024 period of provisional licensure internship.
8025 (4) No sponsor may sponsor more than six provisional
Page 321 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8026 licensees interns at the same time.
8027 (5) A sponsor shall certify a biannual progress report on
8028 each intern and shall certify completion or termination of
8029 provisional licensure an internship to the department within 15
8030 days after such completion or termination. The report must be
8031 made on a form provided by the department and must include at a
8032 minimum:
8033 (a) The inclusive dates of the provisional licensure
8034 internship.
8035 (b) A narrative part explaining the primary duties, types
8036 of experiences gained, and the scope of training received.
8037 (c) An evaluation of the performance of the provisional
8038 licensee intern and a recommendation regarding future licensure.
8039 Section 244. Paragraphs (r) and (x) of subsection (1) of
8040 section 493.6118, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
8041 493.6118 Grounds for disciplinary action.—
8042 (1) The following constitute grounds for which
8043 disciplinary action specified in subsection (2) may be taken by
8044 the department against any licensee, agency, or applicant
8045 regulated by this chapter, or any unlicensed person engaged in
8046 activities regulated under this chapter:
8047 (r) Failure or refusal by a sponsor to certify a biannual
8048 written report on an provisional private investigator intern or
8049 to certify completion or termination of an provisional private
8050 investigator internship to the department within 15 working
Page 322 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8051 days.
8052 (x) In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action
8053 prescribed in paragraphs (a)-(t) and, Class "R" recovery
8054 agencies , Class "E" recovery agents, and Class "EE" recovery
8055 agent interns are prohibited from committing the following acts:
8056 1. Recovering a motor vehicle, mobile home, motorboat,
8057 aircraft, personal watercraft, all-terrain vehicle, farm
8058 equipment, or industrial equipment that has been sold under a
8059 conditional sales agreement or under the terms of a chattel
8060 mortgage before authorization has been received from the legal
8061 owner or mortgagee.
8062 2. Charging for expenses not actually incurred in
8063 connection with the recovery, transportation, storage, or
8064 disposal of repossessed property or personal property obtained
8065 in a repossession.
8066 3. Using any repossessed property or personal property
8067 obtained in a repossession for the personal benefit of a
8068 licensee or an officer, director, partner, manager, or employee
8069 of a licensee.
8070 4. Selling property recovered under the provisions of this
8071 chapter, except with written authorization from the legal owner
8072 or the mortgagee thereof.
8073 5. Failing to notify the police or sheriff's department of
8074 the jurisdiction in which the repossessed property is recovered
8075 within 2 hours after recovery.
Page 323 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8076 6. Failing to remit moneys collected in lieu of recovery
8077 of a motor vehicle, mobile home, motorboat, aircraft, personal
8078 watercraft, all-terrain vehicle, farm equipment, or industrial
8079 equipment to the client within 10 working days.
8080 7. Failing to deliver to the client a negotiable
8081 instrument that is payable to the client, within 10 working days
8082 after receipt of such instrument.
8083 8. Falsifying, altering, or failing to maintain any
8084 required inventory or records regarding disposal of personal
8085 property contained in or on repossessed property pursuant to s.
8086 493.6404(1).
8087 9. Carrying any weapon or firearm when he or she is on
8088 private property and performing duties under his or her license
8089 whether or not he or she is licensed pursuant to s. 790.06.
8090 10. Soliciting from the legal owner the recovery of
8091 property subject to repossession after such property has been
8092 seen or located on public or private property if the amount
8093 charged or requested for such recovery is more than the amount
8094 normally charged for such a recovery.
8095 11. Wearing, presenting, or displaying a badge in the
8096 course of performing a repossession regulated by this chapter.
8097 Section 245. Subsection (6) of section 493.6120, Florida
8098 Statutes, is amended to read:
8099 493.6120 Violations; penalty.—
8100 (6) A person who was an owner, officer, partner, or
Page 324 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8101 manager of an a licensed agency or a Class "DS" or "RS" school
8102 or training facility at the time of any activity that is the
8103 basis for revocation of the agency or branch office license or
8104 the school or training facility license and who knew or should
8105 have known of unlawful the activity shall have his or her
8106 personal licenses or approval suspended for 3 years and may not
8107 have any financial interest in or be employed in any capacity by
8108 an a licensed agency or a school or training facility during the
8109 period of suspension.
8110 Section 246. Subsection (2) of section 493.6123, Florida
8111 Statutes, is amended to read:
8112 493.6123 Publication to industry.—
8113 (2) The department shall develop and make available to
8114 each Class "C," Class "D," and Class "E" licensee and all
8115 provisional private investigators interns a pamphlet detailing
8116 in plain language the legal authority, rights, and obligations
8117 of his or her class of licensure. Within the pamphlet, the
8118 department should endeavor to present situations that the
8119 licensee may be expected to commonly encounter in the course of
8120 doing business pursuant to his or her specific license, and
8121 provide to the licensee information on his or her legal options,
8122 authority, limits to authority, and obligations. The department
8123 shall supplement this with citations to statutes and legal
8124 decisions, as well as a selected bibliography that would direct
8125 the licensee to materials the study of which would enhance his
Page 325 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8126 or her professionalism. The department shall provide a single
8127 copy of the appropriate pamphlet without charge to each
8128 individual to whom a license is issued, but may charge for
8129 additional copies to recover its publication costs. The pamphlet
8130 shall be updated every 2 years as necessary to reflect rule or
8131 statutory changes, or court decisions. Intervening changes to
8132 the regulatory situation shall be noticed in the industry
8133 newsletter issued pursuant to subsection (1).
8134 Section 247. Section 493.6201, Florida Statutes, is
8135 amended to read:
8136 493.6201 Classes of licenses.—
8137 (1) Any person, firm, company, partnership, or corporation
8138 which engages in business as a private investigative agency
8139 shall have a Class "A" license. A Class "A" license is valid for
8140 all locations only one location.
8141 (2) Each branch office of a Class "A" agency shall have a
8142 Class "AA" license. Where a person, firm, company, partnership,
8143 or corporation holds both a Class "A" and Class "B" license,
8144 each additional or branch office shall have a Class "AB"
8145 license.
8146 (3) Any individual who performs the services of a manager
8147 for a:
8148 (a) Class "A" private investigative agency or Class "AA"
8149 branch office shall have a Class "MA" license. A Class "C" or
8150 Class "M" licensee may be designated as the manager, in which
Page 326 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8151 case the Class "MA" license is not required.
8152 (b) Class "A" and "B" agency or a Class "AB" branch office
8153 shall have a Class "M" license.
8154 (4) Class "C" or Class "CC" licensees shall own or be an
8155 employee of a Class "A" agency, a Class "A" and Class "B"
8156 agency, or a branch office. This does not include those who are
8157 exempt under s. 493.6102, but who possess a Class "C" license
8158 solely for the purpose of holding a Class "G" license.
8159 (2)(5) Any individual who performs the services of a
8160 private investigator shall have a Class "C" license.
8161 (3)(6) Any individual who performs private investigative
8162 work as an provisional private investigator intern under the
8163 direction and control of a designated, sponsoring Class "C"
8164 licensee or a designated, sponsoring Class "MA" or Class "M"
8165 licensee must have a Class "CC" license.
8166 (4)(7) Only Class "M," Class "MA," Class "C," or Class
8167 "CC" licensees are permitted to bear a firearm, and any such
8168 licensee who bears a firearm shall also have a Class "G"
8169 license.
8170 (5)(8) A Class "C" or Class "CC" licensee may perform
8171 bodyguard services without obtaining a Class "D" license.
8172 Section 248. Section 493.6202, Florida Statutes, is
8173 amended to read:
8174 493.6202 Fees.—
8175 (1) The department shall establish by rule examination and
Page 327 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8176 license fees, not to exceed a the following:
8177 (a) Class "A" license—private investigative agency: $450.
8178 (b) Class "AA" or "AB" license—branch office: $125.
8179 (c) Class "MA" license—private investigative agency
8180 manager: $75.
8181 (b)(d) Class "C" license—private investigator: $75.
8182 (c)(e) Class "CC" license—provisional private investigator
8183 intern: $60.
8184 (2) The department may establish by rule a fee for the
8185 replacement or revision of a license, which fee shall not exceed
8186 $30.
8187 (3) The fees set forth in this section must be paid by
8188 check or money order or, at the discretion of the department, by
8189 electronic funds transfer at the time the application is
8190 approved, except that the applicant for a Class "G," Class "C,"
8191 or Class "CC," Class "M," or Class "MA" license must pay the
8192 license fee at the time the application is made. If a license is
8193 revoked or denied or if the application is withdrawn, the
8194 license fee is nonrefundable.
8195 (4) The initial license fee for a veteran, as defined in
8196 s. 1.01, shall be waived if he or she applies for a Class "C,"
8197 or Class "CC," or Class "MA" license within 24 months after
8198 being discharged from any branch of the United States Armed
8199 Forces. An eligible veteran must include a copy of his or her DD
8200 Form 214, as issued by the United States Department of Defense,
Page 328 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8201 or another acceptable form of identification as specified by the
8202 Department of Veterans' Affairs with his or her application in
8203 order to obtain a waiver.
8204 Section 249. Section 493.6203, Florida Statutes, is
8205 amended to read:
8206 493.6203 License requirements.—In addition to the license
8207 requirements set forth elsewhere in this chapter, each
8208 individual or agency shall comply with the following additional
8209 requirements:
8210 (1) Each agency or branch office shall designate a minimum
8211 of one appropriately licensed individual to act as manager,
8212 directing the activities of the Class "C" or Class "CC"
8213 employees.
8214 (2) An applicant for a Class "MA" license must have 2
8215 years of lawfully gained, verifiable, full-time experience, or
8216 training in:
8217 (a) Private investigative work or related fields of work
8218 that provided equivalent experience or training;
8219 (b) Work as a Class "CC" licensed intern;
8220 (c) Any combination of paragraphs (a) and (b);
8221 (d) Experience described in paragraph (a) for 1 year and
8222 experience described in paragraph (e) for 1 year;
8223 (e) No more than 1 year using:
8224 1. College coursework related to criminal justice,
8225 criminology, or law enforcement administration; or
Page 329 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8226 2. Successfully completed law enforcement-related training
8227 received from any federal, state, county, or municipal agency;
8228 or
8229 (f) Experience described in paragraph (a) for 1 year and
8230 work in a managerial or supervisory capacity for 1 year.
8231
8232 However, experience in performing bodyguard services is not
8233 creditable toward the requirements of this subsection.
8234 (3) An applicant for a Class "M" license shall qualify for
8235 licensure as a Class "MA" manager as outlined under subsection
8236 (2) and as a Class "MB" manager as outlined under s.
8237 493.6303(2).
8238 (2)(4) An applicant for a Class "C" license shall have 6
8239 months 2 years of lawfully gained, verifiable, full-time
8240 experience, or training in one, or a combination of more than
8241 one, of the following:
8242 (a) Private investigative work or related fields of work
8243 that provided equivalent experience or training.
8244 (b) College coursework related to criminal justice,
8245 criminology, or law enforcement administration, or successful
8246 completion of any law enforcement-related training received from
8247 any federal, state, county, or municipal agency, except that no
8248 more than 1 year may be used from this category.
8249 (c) Work as a Class "CC" licensed provisional private
8250 investigator intern.
Page 330 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8251
8252 However, experience in performing bodyguard services is not
8253 creditable toward the requirements of this subsection.
8254 (3)(5) An applicant for a Class "MA," Class "M," or Class
8255 "C" license must pass an examination that covers the provisions
8256 of this chapter and is administered by the department or by a
8257 provider approved by the department. The applicant must pass the
8258 examination before applying for licensure and must submit proof
8259 with the license application on a form approved by rule of the
8260 department that he or she has passed the examination. The
8261 administrator of the examination shall verify the identity of
8262 each applicant taking the examination.
8263 (a) The examination requirement in this subsection does
8264 not apply to an individual who holds a valid Class "CC," or
8265 Class "C," Class "MA," or Class "M" license.
8266 (b) Notwithstanding the exemption provided in paragraph
8267 (a), if the license of an applicant for relicensure has been
8268 invalid for more than 1 year, the applicant must take and pass
8269 the examination.
8270 (c) The department shall establish by rule the content of
8271 the examination, the manner and procedure of its administration,
8272 and an examination fee that may not exceed $100.
8273 (4)(a)(6)(a) A Class "CC" licensee must serve an
8274 internship under the direction and control of a designated
8275 sponsor, who is a Class "C," Class "MA," or Class "M" licensee.
Page 331 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8276 (b) Before submission of an application to the department,
8277 the applicant for a Class "CC" license must have completed a
8278 minimum of 40 hours of professional training pertaining to
8279 general investigative techniques and this chapter, which course
8280 is offered by a state university or by a school, community
8281 college, college, or university under the purview of the
8282 Department of Education, and the applicant must pass an
8283 examination. The certificate evidencing satisfactory completion
8284 of the 40 hours of professional training must be submitted with
8285 the application for a Class "CC" license. The training specified
8286 in this paragraph may be provided by face-to-face presentation,
8287 online technology, or a home study course in accordance with
8288 rules and procedures of the Department of Education. The
8289 administrator of the examination must verify the identity of
8290 each applicant taking the examination.
8291 1. Upon an applicant's successful completion of each part
8292 of the approved training and passage of any required
8293 examination, the school, community college, college, or
8294 university shall issue a certificate of completion to the
8295 applicant. The certificates must be on a form established by
8296 rule of the department.
8297 2. The department shall establish by rule the general
8298 content of the professional training and the examination
8299 criteria.
8300 3. If the license of an applicant for relicensure is
Page 332 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8301 invalid for more than 1 year, the applicant must complete the
8302 required training and pass any required examination.
8303 (c) An individual licensed on or before August 31, 2008,
8304 is not required to complete additional training hours in order
8305 to renew an active license beyond the total required hours, and
8306 the timeframe for completion in effect at the time he or she was
8307 licensed applies.
8308 (5)(7) In addition to any other requirement, an applicant
8309 for a Class "G" license shall satisfy the firearms training set
8310 forth in s. 493.6115.
8311 Section 250. Section 493.6301, Florida Statutes, is
8312 amended to read:
8313 493.6301 Classes of licenses.—
8314 (1) Any person, firm, company, partnership, or corporation
8315 which engages in business as a security agency shall have a
8316 Class "B" license. A Class "B" license is valid for only one
8317 location.
8318 (2) Each branch office of a Class "B" agency shall have a
8319 Class "BB" license. Where a person, firm, company, partnership,
8320 or corporation holds both a Class "A" and Class "B" license,
8321 each branch office shall have a Class "AB" license.
8322 (3) Any individual who performs the services of a manager
8323 for a:
8324 (a) Class "B" security agency or Class "BB" branch office
8325 shall have a Class "MB" license. A Class "M" licensee, or a
Page 333 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8326 Class "D" licensee who has been so licensed for a minimum of 2
8327 years, may be designated as the manager, in which case the Class
8328 "MB" license is not required.
8329 (b) Class "A" and Class "B" agency or a Class "AB" branch
8330 office shall have a Class "M" license.
8331 (4) A Class "D" licensee shall own or be an employee of a
8332 Class "B" security agency or branch office. This does not
8333 include those individuals who are exempt under s. 493.6102(4)
8334 but who possess a Class "D" license solely for the purpose of
8335 holding a Class "G" license.
8336 (2)(5) Any individual who performs the services of a
8337 security officer shall have a Class "D" license. However, a
8338 Class "C" licensee or a Class "CC" licensee may perform
8339 bodyguard services without a Class "D" license.
8340 (3)(6) Only Class "M," Class "MB," or Class "D" licensees
8341 are permitted to bear a firearm, and any such licensee who bears
8342 a firearm shall also have a Class "G" license.
8343 (4)(7) Any person who operates a security officer school
8344 or training facility must have a Class "DS" license.
8345 (5)(8) Any individual who teaches or instructs at a Class
8346 "DS" security officer school or training facility must have a
8347 Class "DI" license.
8348 Section 251. Section 493.6302, Florida Statutes, is
8349 amended to read:
8350 493.6302 Fees.—
Page 334 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8351 (1) The department shall establish by rule license fees,
8352 not to exceed the following:
8353 (a) Class "B" license—security agency: $450.
8354 (b) Class "BB" or Class "AB" license—branch office: $125.
8355 (c) Class "MB" license—security agency manager: $75.
8356 (a)(d) Class "D" license—security officer: $45.
8357 (b)(e) Class "DS" license—security officer school or
8358 training facility: $60.
8359 (c)(f) Class "DI" license—security officer school or
8360 training facility instructor: $60.
8361 (2) The department may establish by rule a fee for the
8362 replacement or revision of a license, which fee shall not exceed
8363 $30.
8364 (3) The fees set forth in this section must be paid by
8365 check or money order or, at the discretion of the department, by
8366 electronic funds transfer at the time the application is
8367 approved, except that the applicant for a Class "D," or Class
8368 "G," Class "M," or Class "MB" license must pay the license fee
8369 at the time the application is made. If a license is revoked or
8370 denied or if the application is withdrawn, the license fee is
8371 nonrefundable.
8372 (4) The initial license fee for a veteran, as defined in
8373 s. 1.01, shall be waived if he or she applies for a Class "D,"
8374 or Class "DI," or Class "MB" license within 24 months after
8375 being discharged from any branch of the United States Armed
Page 335 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8376 Forces. An eligible veteran must include a copy of his or her DD
8377 Form 214, as issued by the United States Department of Defense,
8378 or another acceptable form of identification as specified by the
8379 Department of Veterans' Affairs with his or her application in
8380 order to obtain a waiver.
8381 Section 252. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 493.6303,
8382 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
8383 493.6303 License requirements.—In addition to the license
8384 requirements set forth elsewhere in this chapter, each
8385 individual or agency must comply with the following additional
8386 requirements:
8387
8388 (2) An applicant for a Class "MB" license shall have 2
8389 years of lawfully gained, verifiable, full-time experience, or
8390 training in:
8391 (a) Security work or related fields of work that provided
8392 equivalent experience or training;
8393 (b) Experience described in paragraph (a) for 1 year and
8394 experience described in paragraph (c) for 1 year;
8395 (c) No more than 1 year using:
8396 1. Either college coursework related to criminal justice,
8397 criminology, or law enforcement administration; or
8398 2. Successfully completed law enforcement-related training
8399 received from any federal, state, county, or municipal agency;
8400 or
Page 336 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8401 (d) Experience described in paragraph (a) for 1 year and
8402 work in a managerial or supervisory capacity for 1 year.
8403 (3) An applicant for a Class "M" license shall qualify for
8404 licensure as a Class "MA" manager as outlined under s.
8405 493.6203(2) and as a Class "MB" manager as outlined under
8406 subsection (2).
8407 Section 253. Subsection (1) of section 493.6304, Florida
8408 Statutes, is amended to read:
8409 493.6304 Security officer school or training facility.—
8410 (1) Any school, training facility, or instructor who
8411 offers the training specified in s. 493.6303(2) s. 493.6303(4)
8412 for Class "D" applicants shall, before licensure of such school,
8413 training facility, or instructor, file with the department an
8414 application accompanied by an application fee in an amount to be
8415 determined by rule, not to exceed $60. The fee is not
8416 refundable.
8417 Section 254. Subsection (2) of section 493.631, Florida
8418 Statutes, is amended to read:
8419 493.631 Temporary detention by a licensed security officer
8420 or licensed security agency manager at critical infrastructure
8421 facilities.—
8422 (2) As used in this section, the terms "security officer"
8423 and "security agency manager" mean a security officer or
8424 security agency manager who possess a valid Class "D" or Class
8425 "MB" license pursuant to s. 493.6301 and a valid Class "G"
Page 337 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8426 license pursuant to s. 493.6115.
8427 Section 255. Section 493.6401, Florida Statutes, is
8428 amended to read:
8429 493.6401 Classes of licenses.—
8430 (1) Any person, firm, company, partnership, or corporation
8431 which engages in business as a recovery agency shall have a
8432 Class "R" license. A Class "R" license is valid for any only one
8433 location.
8434 (2) Each branch office of a Class "R" agency shall have a
8435 Class "RR" license.
8436 (3) Any individual who performs the services of a manager
8437 for a Class "R" recovery agency or a Class "RR" branch office
8438 must have a Class "MR" license. A Class "E" licensee may be
8439 designated as the manager, in which case the Class "MR" license
8440 is not required.
8441 (2)(4) Any individual who performs the services of a
8442 recovery agent must have a Class "E" license.
8443 (5) Any individual who performs repossession as an intern
8444 under the direction and control of a designated, sponsoring
8445 Class "E" licensee or a designated, sponsoring Class "MR"
8446 licensee shall have a Class "EE" license.
8447 (3)(6) Class "E" or Class "EE" licensees shall own or be
8448 an employee of a Class "R" agency or branch office.
8449 (4)(7) Any person who operates a recovery agent school or
8450 training facility or who conducts an Internet-based training
Page 338 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8451 course or a correspondence training course must have a Class
8452 "RS" license.
8453 (5)(8) Any individual who teaches or instructs at a Class
8454 "RS" recovery agent school or training facility shall have a
8455 Class "RI" license.
8456 Section 256. Section 493.6402, Florida Statutes, is
8457 amended to read:
8458 493.6402 Fees.—
8459 (1) The department shall establish by rule license fees
8460 not to exceed the following:
8461 (a) Class "R" license—recovery agency: $450.
8462 (b) Class "RR" license—branch office: $125.
8463 (c) Class "MR" license—recovery agency manager: $75.
8464 (b)(d) Class "E" license—recovery agent: $75.
8465 (e) Class "EE" license—recovery agent intern: $60.
8466 (c)(f) Class "RS" license—recovery agent school or
8467 training facility: $60.
8468 (d)(g) Class "RI" license—recovery agent school or
8469 training facility instructor: $60.
8470 (2) The department may establish by rule a fee for the
8471 replacement or revision of a license, which fee shall not exceed
8472 $30.
8473 (3) The fees set forth in this section must be paid by
8474 check or money order, or, at the discretion of the department,
8475 by electronic funds transfer at the time the application is
Page 339 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8476 approved, except that the applicant for a Class "E," Class "EE,"
8477 or Class "MR" license must pay the license fee at the time the
8478 application is made. If a license is revoked or denied, or if an
8479 application is withdrawn, the license fee is nonrefundable.
8480 (4) The initial license fee for a veteran, as defined in
8481 s. 1.01, shall be waived if he or she applies for a Class "E,"
8482 Class "EE," Class "MR," or Class "RI" license within 24 months
8483 after being discharged from any branch of the United States
8484 Armed Forces. An eligible veteran must include a copy of his or
8485 her DD Form 214, as issued by the United States Department of
8486 Defense, or another acceptable form of identification as
8487 specified by the Department of Veterans' Affairs with his or her
8488 application in order to obtain a waiver.
8489 Section 257. Section 493.6403, Florida Statutes, is
8490 amended to read:
8491 493.6403 License requirements.—
8492 (1) In addition to the license requirements set forth in
8493 this chapter, each individual or agency shall comply with the
8494 following additional requirements:
8495 (a) Each agency or branch office must designate a minimum
8496 of one appropriately licensed individual to act as manager,
8497 directing the activities of the Class "E" or Class "EE"
8498 employees. A Class "E" licensee may be designated to act as
8499 manager of a Class "R" agency or branch office in which case the
8500 Class "MR" license is not required.
Page 340 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8501 (b) An applicant for Class "MR" license shall have at
8502 least 1 year of lawfully gained, verifiable, full-time
8503 experience as a Class "E" licensee performing repossessions of
8504 motor vehicles, mobile homes, motorboats, aircraft, personal
8505 watercraft, all-terrain vehicles, farm equipment, or industrial
8506 equipment.
8507 (b)(c) An applicant for a Class "E" license shall have at
8508 least 1 year of lawfully gained, verifiable, full-time
8509 experience in one, or a combination of more than one, of the
8510 following:
8511 1. repossession of motor vehicles as defined in s.
8512 320.01(1), mobile homes as defined in s. 320.01(2), motorboats
8513 as defined in s. 327.02, aircraft as defined in s. 330.27,
8514 personal watercraft as defined in s. 327.02, all-terrain
8515 vehicles as defined in s. 316.2074, farm equipment as defined
8516 under s. 686.402, or industrial equipment as defined in s.
8517 493.6101(22).
8518 2. Work as a Class "EE" licensed intern.
8519 (2) An applicant for a Class "E" or a Class "EE" license
8520 must submit proof of successful completion of 40 hours of
8521 professional training at a school or training facility licensed
8522 by the department. The department shall by rule establish the
8523 general content for the training.
8524 Section 258. Subsection (1) of section 493.6406, Florida
8525 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 341 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8526 493.6406 Recovery agent school or training facility.—
8527 (1) Any school, training facility, or instructor who
8528 offers the training outlined in s. 493.6403(2) for Class "E" or
8529 Class "EE" applicants shall, before licensure of such school,
8530 training facility, or instructor, file with the department an
8531 application accompanied by an application fee in an amount to be
8532 determined by rule, not to exceed $60. The fee shall not be
8533 refundable. This training may be offered as face-to-face
8534 training, Internet-based training, or correspondence training.
8535 Section 259. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
8536 499.067, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
8537 499.067 Denial, suspension, or revocation of permit,
8538 certification, or registration.—
8539 (1)
8540 (b) The department may deny an application for a permit or
8541 certification, or suspend or revoke a permit or certification,
8542 if the department finds that:
8543 1. The applicant is not of good moral character or that it
8544 would be a danger or not in the best interest of the public
8545 health, safety, and welfare if the applicant were issued a
8546 permit or certification.
8547 2. The applicant has not met the requirements for the
8548 permit or certification.
8549 3. The applicant is not eligible for a permit or
8550 certification for any of the reasons enumerated in s. 499.012.
Page 342 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8551 4. The applicant, or permittee, or person certified under
8552 s. 499.012(15) demonstrates any of the conditions enumerated in
8553 s. 499.012.
8554 5. The applicant, or permittee, or person certified under
8555 s. 499.012(15) has committed any violation of this chapter.
8556 Section 260. Subsection (2) of section 501.015, Florida
8557 Statutes, is amended to read:
8558 501.015 Health studios; registration requirements and
8559 fees.—Each health studio shall:
8560 (2) Remit a an annual registration fee every 4 years of
8561 $300 to the department at the time of registration for each of
8562 the health studio's business locations.
8563 (a) The department shall waive the initial registration
8564 fee for an honorably discharged veteran of the United States
8565 Armed Forces, the spouse or surviving spouse of such a veteran,
8566 a current member of the United States Armed Forces who has
8567 served on active duty, the spouse of such a member, the
8568 surviving spouse of a member of the United States Armed Forces
8569 if the member died while serving on active duty, or a business
8570 entity that has a majority ownership held by such a veteran or
8571 spouse or surviving spouse if the department receives an
8572 application, in a format prescribed by the department. The
8573 application format must include the applicant's signature, under
8574 penalty of perjury, and supporting documentation. To qualify for
8575 the waiver:
Page 343 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8576 1. A veteran must provide to the department a copy of his
8577 or her DD Form 214, as issued by the United States Department of
8578 Defense, or another acceptable form of identification as
8579 specified by the Department of Veterans' Affairs;
8580 2. The spouse or surviving spouse of a veteran must
8581 provide to the department a copy of the veteran's DD Form 214,
8582 as issued by the United States Department of Defense, or another
8583 acceptable form of identification as specified by the Department
8584 of Veterans' Affairs, and a copy of a valid marriage license or
8585 certificate verifying that he or she was lawfully married to the
8586 veteran at the time of discharge; or
8587 3. A business entity must provide to the department proof
8588 that a veteran or the spouse or surviving spouse of a veteran
8589 holds a majority ownership in the business, a copy of the
8590 veteran's DD Form 214, as issued by the United States Department
8591 of Defense, or another acceptable form of identification as
8592 specified by the Department of Veterans' Affairs, and, if
8593 applicable, a copy of a valid marriage license or certificate
8594 verifying that the spouse or surviving spouse of the veteran was
8595 lawfully married to the veteran at the time of discharge.
8596 (b) The department shall waive the registration renewal
8597 fee for a registrant who:
8598 1. Is an active duty member of the United States Armed
8599 Forces or the spouse of such member;
8600 2. Is or was a member of the United States Armed Forces
Page 344 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8601 and served on active duty within the 2 years preceding the
8602 renewal date. To qualify for the fee waiver, a registrant who is
8603 a former member of the United States Armed Forces who served on
8604 active duty within the 2 years preceding the expiration date of
8605 the registration must have received an honorable discharge upon
8606 separation or discharge from the United States Armed Forces; or
8607 3. Is the surviving spouse of a member of the United
8608 States Armed Forces if the member was serving on active duty at
8609 the time of death and died within the 2 years preceding the date
8610 of renewal.
8611
8612 A registrant seeking such waiver must apply in a format
8613 prescribed by the department, including the applicant's
8614 signature, under penalty of perjury, and supporting
8615 documentation.
8616 Section 261. Subsections (1) and (5) of section 501.609,
8617 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
8618 501.609 License renewal.—
8619 (1) Each person licensed under the provisions of this part
8620 must renew his or her license every 4 years annually by paying
8621 the fee for licensing and submitting to the department the
8622 application required by this part.
8623 (5) The department shall waive the annual fee to renew for
8624 a licensee who:
8625 (a) Is an active duty member of the United States Armed
Page 345 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8626 Forces or the spouse of such member;
8627 (b) Is or was a member of the United States Armed Forces,
8628 and served on active duty within the 2 years preceding the
8629 renewal date. To qualify for the fee waiver, a licensee who is a
8630 former member of the United States Armed Forces who served on
8631 active duty within the 2 years preceding the expiration date of
8632 the registration must have received an honorable discharge upon
8633 separation or discharge from the United States Armed Forces; or
8634 (c) Is the surviving spouse of a member of the United
8635 States Armed Forces if the member was serving on active duty at
8636 the time of death and died within the 2 years preceding the
8637 renewal.
8638
8639 A licensee seeking such waiver must apply in a format prescribed
8640 by the department, including the applicant's signature, under
8641 penalty of perjury, and supporting documentation.
8642 Section 262. Subsection (4) of section 507.03, Florida
8643 Statutes, is amended to read:
8644 507.03 Registration.—
8645 (4) A registration must be renewed every 4 years
8646 biennially on or before its expiration date. In order to
8647 establish staggered expiration dates, the department may extend
8648 the expiration date of a registration for a period not to exceed
8649 12 months.
8650 Section 263. Subsection (3) of section 514.0315, Florida
Page 346 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8651 Statutes, is amended to read:
8652 514.0315 Required safety features for public swimming
8653 pools and spas.—
8654 (3) The determination and selection of a feature under
8655 subsection (2) for a public swimming pool or spa constructed
8656 before January 1, 1993, is at the sole discretion of the owner
8657 or operator of the public swimming pool or spa. A licensed
8658 contractor described in s. 489.105(2)(j), (k), or (l) s.
8659 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) must install the feature.
8660 Section 264. Section 514.075, Florida Statutes, is amended
8661 to read:
8662 514.075 Public pool service technician; certification.—The
8663 department may require that a public pool, as defined in s.
8664 514.011, be serviced by a person certified as a pool service
8665 technician. To be certified, an individual must demonstrate
8666 knowledge of public pools which includes, but is not limited to:
8667 pool cleaning; general pool maintenance; source of the water
8668 supply; bacteriological, chemical, and physical quality of
8669 water; and water purification, testing, treatment, and
8670 disinfection procedures. The department may, by rule, establish
8671 the requirement for the certification course and course
8672 approval. The department shall deem certified any individual who
8673 is certified by a course of national recognition or any person
8674 licensed under s. 489.105(2)(j), (k), or (l) s. 489.105(3)(j),
8675 (k), or (l). This requirement does not apply to a person, or the
Page 347 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8676 direct employee of a person, permitted as a public pool operator
8677 under s. 514.031.
8678 Section 265. Section 527.03, Florida Statutes, is amended
8679 to read:
8680 527.03 Renewal of license.—All licenses required under
8681 this chapter shall be renewed every 4 years annually,
8682 biennially, or triennially, as elected by the licensee, subject
8683 to the license fees prescribed in s. 527.02. All renewals must
8684 meet the same requirements and conditions as an annual license
8685 for each licensed year. Any license allowed to expire will
8686 become inoperative because of failure to renew. The fee for
8687 restoration of a license is equal to the original license fee
8688 and must be paid before the licensee may resume operations.
8689 Section 266. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
8690 539.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
8691 539.001 The Florida Pawnbroking Act.—
8692 (3) LICENSE REQUIRED.—
8693 (c) Each license is valid for a period of 4 years 1 year
8694 unless it is earlier relinquished, suspended, or revoked. Each
8695 license shall be renewed every 4 years annually, and each
8696 licensee shall, initially and annually thereafter, pay to the
8697 agency a license fee of $300 for each license held. The agency
8698 shall waive the initial license fee for an honorably discharged
8699 veteran of the United States Armed Forces, the spouse or
8700 surviving spouse of such a veteran, a current member of the
Page 348 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8701 United States Armed Forces who has served on active duty, the
8702 spouse of such a member, the surviving spouse of a member of the
8703 United States Armed Forces if the member died while serving on
8704 active duty, or a business entity that has a majority ownership
8705 held by such a veteran or spouse or surviving spouse if the
8706 agency receives an application, in a format prescribed by the
8707 agency. The application format must include the applicant's
8708 signature, under penalty of perjury, and supporting
8709 documentation. To qualify for the waiver:
8710 1. A veteran must provide to the agency a copy of his or
8711 her DD Form 214, as issued by the United States Department of
8712 Defense, or another acceptable form of identification as
8713 specified by the Department of Veterans' Affairs;
8714 2. The spouse or surviving spouse of a veteran must
8715 provide to the agency a copy of the veteran's DD Form 214, as
8716 issued by the United States Department of Defense, or another
8717 acceptable form of identification as specified by the Department
8718 of Veterans' Affairs, and a copy of a valid marriage license or
8719 certificate verifying that he or she was lawfully married to the
8720 veteran at the time of discharge; or
8721 3. A business entity must provide to the agency proof that
8722 a veteran or the spouse or surviving spouse of a veteran holds a
8723 majority ownership in the business, a copy of the veteran's DD
8724 Form 214, as issued by the United States Department of Defense,
8725 or another acceptable form of identification as specified by the
Page 349 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8726 Department of Veterans' Affairs, and, if applicable, a copy of a
8727 valid marriage license or certificate verifying that the spouse
8728 or surviving spouse of the veteran was lawfully married to the
8729 veteran at the time of discharge.
8730 Section 267. Subsection (10) of section 553.79, Florida
8731 Statutes, is amended to read:
8732 553.79 Permits; applications; issuance; inspections.—
8733 (10) No enforcing agency may issue a building permit for
8734 construction of any threshold building except to a licensed
8735 general contractor, as defined in s. 489.105(2)(a) s.
8736 489.105(3)(a), or to a licensed building contractor, as defined
8737 in s. 489.105(2)(b) s. 489.105(3)(b), within the scope of her or
8738 his license. The named contractor to whom the building permit is
8739 issued shall have the responsibility for supervision, direction,
8740 management, and control of the construction activities on the
8741 project for which the building permit was issued.
8742 Section 268. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
8743 553.791, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
8744 553.791 Alternative plans review and inspection.—
8745 (1) As used in this section, the term:
8746 (d) "Building code inspection services" means those
8747 services described in s. 468.603 (4) and (7) s. 468.603(5) and
8748 (8) involving the review of building plans as well as those
8749 services involving the review of site plans and site work
8750 engineering plans or their functional equivalent, to determine
Page 350 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8751 compliance with applicable codes and those inspections required
8752 by law, conducted either in person or virtually, of each phase
8753 of construction for which permitting by a local enforcement
8754 agency is required to determine compliance with applicable
8755 codes.
8756 Section 269. Section 553.998, Florida Statutes, is amended
8757 to read:
8758 553.998 Compliance.—All ratings must be determined using
8759 tools and procedures developed by the systems recognized under
8760 this part and must be certified by the rater as accurate and
8761 correct and in compliance with procedures of the system under
8762 which the rater is certified. The local enforcement agency shall
8763 accept duct and air infiltration tests conducted in accordance
8764 with the Florida Building Code, 5th Edition (2014) Energy
8765 Conservation, by individuals as defined in s. 553.993(5) or (7)
8766 or individuals licensed as set forth in s. 489.105(2)(f), (g),
8767 or (i) s. 489.105(3)(f), (g), or (i). The local enforcement
8768 agency may accept inspections in whole or in part by individuals
8769 as defined in s. 553.993(5) or (7).
8770 Section 270. Subsections (2), (5), and (8) of section
8771 559.904, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
8772 559.904 Motor vehicle repair shop registration;
8773 application; exemption.—
8774 (2) Any motor vehicle repair shop maintaining more than
8775 one place of business may file a single application every 4
Page 351 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8776 years biennially, which, along with the other information
8777 required by this part, clearly indicates the location of and the
8778 individual in charge of each facility or in the case of a mobile
8779 motor vehicle repair shop, the home address of the owner, if
8780 different from the business address. In such case, fees shall be
8781 paid for each place of business.
8782 (5) No biennial registration fee is required for any motor
8783 vehicle repair shop which has a local municipal or county
8784 license issued pursuant to an ordinance containing standards
8785 which the department determines are at least equal to the
8786 requirements of this part, or for any motor vehicle dealer
8787 licensed pursuant to chapter 320.
8788 (8) Each registration must be renewed biennially on or
8789 before the expiration date of the current registration. A late
8790 fee of $25 shall be paid, in addition to the registration fee or
8791 any other penalty, for any registration renewal application that
8792 is received by the department after the expiration date of the
8793 current registration. The department may not issue the
8794 registration until all fees are paid.
8795 Section 271. Subsection (3) of section 559.928, Florida
8796 Statutes, is amended to read:
8797 559.928 Registration.—
8798 (3) Each independent agent shall annually file an
8799 application with the department every 4 years before engaging in
8800 business in this state. This application must include the
Page 352 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8801 independent agent's full name, legal business or trade name,
8802 mailing address, business address, telephone number, and the
8803 name and address of each seller of travel represented by the
8804 independent agent. A letter evidencing proof of filing must be
8805 issued by the department and must be prominently displayed in
8806 the independent agent's primary place of business. Each
8807 independent agent must also submit a an annual registration fee
8808 of $50. All moneys collected pursuant to the imposition of the
8809 fee shall be deposited by the Chief Financial Officer into the
8810 General Inspection Trust Fund of the Department of Agriculture
8811 and Consumer Services for the sole purpose of administrating
8812 this part. As used in this subsection, the term "independent
8813 agent" means a person who represents a seller of travel by
8814 soliciting persons on its behalf; who has a written contract
8815 with a seller of travel which is operating in compliance with
8816 this part and any rules adopted thereunder; who does not receive
8817 a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration directly from
8818 the purchaser for the seller of travel; who does not at any time
8819 have any unissued ticket stock or travel documents in his or her
8820 possession; and who does not have the ability to issue tickets,
8821 vacation certificates, or any other travel document. The term
8822 "independent agent" does not include an affiliate of the seller
8823 of travel, as that term is used in s. 559.935(3), or the
8824 employees of the seller of travel or of such affiliates.
8825 Section 272. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
Page 353 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8826 627.192, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
8827 627.192 Workers' compensation insurance; employee leasing
8828 arrangements.—
8829 (2) For purposes of the Florida Insurance Code:
8830 (a) "Employee leasing" shall have the same meaning as
8831 provided in s. 468.520(3) set forth in s. 468.520(4).
8832 Section 273. Subsection (6) of section 633.216, Florida
8833 Statutes, is amended to read:
8834 633.216 Inspection of buildings and equipment; orders;
8835 firesafety inspection training requirements; certification;
8836 disciplinary action.—The State Fire Marshal and her or his
8837 agents or persons authorized to enforce laws and rules of the
8838 State Fire Marshal shall, at any reasonable hour, when the State
8839 Fire Marshal has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of
8840 this chapter or s. 509.215, or a rule adopted thereunder, or a
8841 minimum firesafety code adopted by the State Fire Marshal or a
8842 local authority, may exist, inspect any and all buildings and
8843 structures which are subject to the requirements of this chapter
8844 or s. 509.215 and rules adopted thereunder. The authority to
8845 inspect shall extend to all equipment, vehicles, and chemicals
8846 which are located on or within the premises of any such building
8847 or structure.
8848 (6) The division and the Florida Building Code
8849 Administrators and Inspectors Board, established pursuant to s.
8850 468.605, shall enter into a reciprocity agreement to facilitate
Page 354 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8851 joint recognition of continuing education recertification hours
8852 for certificateholders licensed under s. 468.609 and firesafety
8853 inspectors certified under subsection (2).
8854 Section 274. Subsection (8) of section 713.01, Florida
8855 Statutes, is amended to read:
8856 713.01 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
8857 (8) "Contractor" means a person other than a materialman
8858 or laborer who enters into a contract with the owner of real
8859 property for improving it or who takes over from a contractor as
8860 so defined the entire remaining work under such contract. The
8861 term "contractor" includes an architect, landscape architect, or
8862 engineer who improves real property pursuant to a design-build
8863 contract authorized by s. 489.103(16). The term also includes a
8864 licensed general contractor or building contractor, as those
8865 terms are defined in s. 489.105(2)(a) and (b) s. 489.105(3)(a)
8866 and (b), respectively, who provides construction management
8867 services, which include scheduling and coordinating
8868 preconstruction and construction phases for the construction
8869 project, or who provides program management services, which
8870 include schedule control, cost control, and coordinating the
8871 provision or procurement of planning, design, and construction
8872 for the construction project.
8873 Section 275. Subsection (4) of section 259.1053, Florida
8874 Statutes, is amended, to read:
8875 259.1053 Babcock Ranch Preserve; Babcock Ranch Advisory
Page 355 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8876 Group.—
8877 (4) BABCOCK RANCH ADVISORY GROUP.—
8878 (a) The purpose of the Babcock Ranch Advisory Group is to
8879 assist the department by providing guidance and advice
8880 concerning the management and stewardship of the Babcock Ranch
8881 Preserve.
8882 (b) The Babcock Ranch Advisory Group shall be comprised of
8883 nine members appointed to 5-year terms. Based on recommendations
8884 from the Governor and Cabinet, the commission, and the governing
8885 boards of Charlotte County and Lee County, the commissioner
8886 shall appoint members as follows:
8887 1. One member with experience in sustainable management of
8888 forest lands for commodity purposes.
8889 2. One member with experience in financial management,
8890 budget and program analysis, and small business operations.
8891 3. One member with experience in management of game and
8892 nongame wildlife and fish populations, including hunting,
8893 fishing, and other recreational activities.
8894 4. One member with experience in domesticated livestock
8895 management, production, and marketing, including range
8896 management and livestock business management.
8897 5. One member with experience in agriculture operations or
8898 forestry management.
8899 6. One member with experience in hunting, fishing, nongame
8900 species management, or wildlife habitat management, restoration,
Page 356 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8901 and conservation.
8902 7. One member with experience in public outreach and
8903 education.
8904 8. One member who is a resident of Lee County, to be
8905 designated by the Board of County Commissioners of Lee County.
8906 9. One member who is a resident of Charlotte County, to be
8907 designated by the Board of County Commissioners of Charlotte
8908 County.
8909
8910 Vacancies will be filled in the same manner in which the
8911 original appointment was made. A member appointed to fill a
8912 vacancy shall serve for the remainder of that term.
8913 (c) Members of the Babcock Ranch Advisory Group shall:
8914 1. Elect a chair and vice chair from among the group
8915 members.
8916 2. Meet regularly as determined by the chair.
8917 3. Serve without compensation but shall receive
8918 reimbursement for travel and per diem expenses as provided in s.
8919 112.061.
8920 Section 276. Subsection (2) of section 399.035, Florida
8921 Statutes, is amended to read:
8922 399.035 Elevator accessibility requirements for the
8923 physically handicapped.—
8924 (2) Any building that is more than three stories high or
8925 in which the vertical distance between the bottom terminal
Page 357 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8926 landing and the top terminal landing exceeds 25 feet must be
8927 constructed to contain at least one passenger elevator that is
8928 operational and will accommodate an ambulance stretcher size
8929 specified in the edition of the Florida Building Code that was
8930 in effect at the time of receipt of an application for
8931 construction permit for the elevator 76 inches long and 24
8932 inches wide in the horizontal position.
8933 Section 277. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
8934 455.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
8935 455.02 Licensure of members of the Armed Forces in good
8936 standing and their spouses or surviving spouses with
8937 administrative boards or programs.—
8938 (3)(a) The department shall issue a professional license
8939 to an applicant who is or was an active duty member of the Armed
8940 Forces of the United States, or who is a spouse or surviving
8941 spouse of such member, upon application to the department in a
8942 format prescribed by the department. An application must include
8943 proof that:
8944 1. The applicant is or was an active duty member of the
8945 Armed Forces of the United States or is married to a member of
8946 the Armed Forces of the United States and was married to the
8947 member during any period of active duty or was married to such a
8948 member who at the time of the member's death was serving on
8949 active duty. An applicant who was an active duty member of the
8950 Armed Forces of the United States must have received an
Page 358 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8951 honorable discharge upon separation or discharge from the Armed
8952 Forces of the United States.
8953 2. The applicant holds a valid license for the profession
8954 issued by another state, the District of Columbia, any
8955 possession or territory of the United States, or any foreign
8956 jurisdiction.
8957 3. The applicant, where required by the specific practice
8958 act, has complied with insurance or bonding requirements.
8959 4.a. A complete set of the applicant's fingerprints is
8960 submitted to the Department of Law Enforcement for a statewide
8961 criminal history check for those professions that require
8962 fingerprints for initial licensure.
8963 b. The Department of Law Enforcement shall forward the
8964 fingerprints submitted pursuant to sub-subparagraph a. to the
8965 Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history
8966 check. The department shall, and the board may, review the
8967 results of the criminal history checks according to the level 2
8968 screening standards in s. 435.04 and determine whether the
8969 applicant meets the licensure requirements. The costs of
8970 fingerprint processing shall be borne by the applicant. If the
8971 applicant's fingerprints are submitted through an authorized
8972 agency or vendor, the agency or vendor must shall collect the
8973 required processing fees and remit the fees to the Department of
8974 Law Enforcement.
8975 Section 278. Subsection (1), paragraph (c) of subsection
Page 359 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
8976 (2), subsections (4) and (5), paragraphs (b) and (e) of
8977 subsection (6), paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (7), and
8978 subsections (8) and (10) of section 468.609, Florida Statutes,
8979 are amended to read:
8980 468.609 Administration of this part; standards for
8981 certification; additional categories of certification.—
8982 (1) Except as provided in this part, any person who
8983 desires to be certified shall apply to the department board, in
8984 writing upon forms approved and furnished by the department
8985 board, to take the certification examination.
8986 (2) A person may take the examination for certification as
8987 a building code inspector or plans examiner pursuant to this
8988 part if the person:
8989 (c) Meets eligibility requirements according to one of the
8990 following criteria:
8991 1. Demonstrates 4 years' combined experience in the field
8992 of construction or a related field, building code inspection, or
8993 plans review corresponding to the certification category sought;
8994 2. Demonstrates a combination of postsecondary education
8995 in the field of construction or a related field and experience
8996 which totals 3 years, with at least 1 year of such total being
8997 experience in construction, building code inspection, or plans
8998 review;
8999 3. Demonstrates a combination of technical education in
9000 the field of construction or a related field and experience
Page 360 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9001 which totals 3 years, with at least 1 year of such total being
9002 experience in construction, building code inspection, or plans
9003 review;
9004 4. Currently holds a standard certificate issued by the
9005 department board or a firesafety inspector license issued under
9006 chapter 633, with a minimum of 3 years' verifiable full-time
9007 experience in firesafety inspection or firesafety plan review,
9008 and has satisfactorily completed a building code inspector or
9009 plans examiner training program that provides at least 100 hours
9010 but not more than 200 hours of cross-training in the
9011 certification category sought. The department board shall
9012 establish by rule criteria for the development and
9013 implementation of the training programs. The department board
9014 must accept all classroom training offered by an approved
9015 provider if the content substantially meets the intent of the
9016 classroom component of the training program;
9017 5. Demonstrates a combination of the completion of an
9018 approved training program in the field of building code
9019 inspection or plan review and a minimum of 2 years' experience
9020 in the field of building code inspection, plan review, fire code
9021 inspections and fire plans review of new buildings as a
9022 firesafety inspector certified under s. 633.216, or
9023 construction. The approved training portion of this requirement
9024 must include proof of satisfactory completion of a training
9025 program that provides at least 200 hours but not more than 300
Page 361 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9026 hours of cross-training that is approved by the department board
9027 in the chosen category of building code inspection or plan
9028 review in the certification category sought with at least 20
9029 hours but not more than 30 hours of instruction in state laws,
9030 rules, and ethics relating to professional standards of
9031 practice, duties, and responsibilities of a certificateholder.
9032 The department board shall coordinate with the Building
9033 Officials Association of Florida, Inc., to establish by rule the
9034 development and implementation of the training program. However,
9035 the department board must accept all classroom training offered
9036 by an approved provider if the content substantially meets the
9037 intent of the classroom component of the training program;
9038 6. Currently holds a standard certificate issued by the
9039 department board or a firesafety inspector license issued under
9040 chapter 633 and:
9041 a. Has at least 4 years' verifiable full-time experience
9042 as an inspector or plans examiner in a standard certification
9043 category currently held or has a minimum of 4 years' verifiable
9044 full-time experience as a firesafety inspector licensed under
9045 chapter 633.
9046 b. Has satisfactorily completed a building code inspector
9047 or plans examiner classroom training course or program that
9048 provides at least 200 but not more than 300 hours in the
9049 certification category sought, except for residential training
9050 programs, which must provide at least 500 but not more than 800
Page 362 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9051 hours of training as prescribed by the department board. The
9052 department board shall establish by rule criteria for the
9053 development and implementation of classroom training courses and
9054 programs in each certification category; or
9055 7.a. Has completed a 4-year internship certification
9056 program as a building code inspector or plans examiner,
9057 including an internship program for residential inspectors,
9058 while also employed full time by a municipality, county, or
9059 other governmental jurisdiction, under the direct supervision of
9060 a certified building official. A person may also complete the
9061 internship certification program, including an internship
9062 program for residential inspectors, while employed full time by
9063 a private provider or a private provider's firm that performs
9064 the services of a building code inspector or plans examiner,
9065 while under the direct supervision of a certified building
9066 official. Proof of graduation with a related vocational degree
9067 or college degree or of verifiable work experience may be
9068 exchanged for the internship experience requirement year-for-
9069 year, but may reduce the requirement to no less than 1 year.
9070 Proof of verifiable work experience as an inspector or plans
9071 examiner of any other type may be exchanged for the internship
9072 experience requirement year-for-year, but may reduce the
9073 requirement to no less than 1 year.
9074 b. Has passed an examination administered by the
9075 International Code Council in the certification category sought.
Page 363 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9076 Such examination must be passed before beginning the internship
9077 certification program.
9078 c. Has passed the principles and practice examination
9079 before completing the internship certification program.
9080 d. Has passed a department-approved board-approved 40-hour
9081 code training course in the certification category sought before
9082 completing the internship certification program.
9083 e. Has obtained a favorable recommendation from the
9084 supervising building official after completion of the internship
9085 certification program.
9086 (4) No person may engage in the duties of a building code
9087 administrator, plans examiner, or building code inspector
9088 pursuant to this part after October 1, 1993, unless such person
9089 possesses one of the following types of certificates, currently
9090 valid, issued by the department board attesting to the person's
9091 qualifications to hold such position:
9092 (a) A standard certificate.
9093 (b) A limited certificate.
9094 (c) A provisional certificate.
9095 (5)(a) To obtain a standard certificate, an individual
9096 must pass an examination approved by the department board which
9097 demonstrates that the applicant has fundamental knowledge of the
9098 state laws and codes relating to the construction of buildings
9099 for which the applicant has building code administration, plans
9100 examination, or building code inspection responsibilities. It is
Page 364 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9101 the intent of the Legislature that the examination approved for
9102 certification pursuant to this part be substantially equivalent
9103 to the examinations administered by the International Code
9104 Council.
9105 (b) A standard certificate shall be issued to each
9106 applicant who successfully completes the examination, which
9107 certificate authorizes the individual named thereon to practice
9108 throughout the state as a building code administrator, plans
9109 examiner, or building code inspector within such class and level
9110 as is specified by the department board.
9111 (c) The department board may accept proof that the
9112 applicant has passed an examination which is substantially
9113 equivalent to the department-approved board-approved examination
9114 set forth in this section.
9115 (6)
9116 (b) By October 1, 1993, individuals who were employed on
9117 July 1, 1993, as building code administrators, plans examiners,
9118 or building code inspectors, who are not eligible for a standard
9119 certificate, but who wish to continue in such employment, shall
9120 submit to the department board the appropriate application and
9121 certification fees and shall receive a limited certificate
9122 qualifying them to engage in building code administration, plans
9123 examination, or building code inspection in the class, at the
9124 performance level, and within the governmental jurisdiction in
9125 which such person is employed.
Page 365 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9126 (e) By March 1, 2003, or 1 year after the Florida Building
9127 Code is implemented, whichever is later, individuals who were
9128 employed by an educational board, the Department of Education,
9129 or the State University System as building code administrators,
9130 plans examiners, or inspectors, who do not wish to apply for a
9131 standard certificate but who wish to continue in such
9132 employment, shall submit to the department board the appropriate
9133 application and certification fees and shall receive a limited
9134 certificate qualifying such individuals to engage in building
9135 code administration, plans examination, or inspection in the
9136 class, at the performance level, and within the governmental
9137 jurisdiction in which such person is employed.
9138 (7)(a) The department board shall provide for the issuance
9139 of provisional certificates valid for 2 years, as specified by
9140 department board rule, to any building code inspector or plans
9141 examiner who meets the eligibility requirements described in
9142 subsection (2) and any newly employed or promoted building code
9143 administrator who meets the eligibility requirements described
9144 in subsection (3). The provisional license may be renewed by the
9145 department board for just cause; however, a provisional license
9146 is not valid for longer than 3 years.
9147 (c) The department board shall provide for appropriate
9148 levels of provisional certificates and may issue these
9149 certificates with such special conditions or requirements as the
9150 department board deems necessary to protect the public safety
Page 366 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9151 and health. The department board may not place a special
9152 condition or requirement on a provisional certificate with
9153 respect to the requirement of employment by a municipality,
9154 county, or other local governmental agency.
9155 (8) Any individual applying to the department board may be
9156 issued a certificate valid for multiple building code inspection
9157 classes, as deemed appropriate by the department board.
9158 (10)(a) The department board may by rule create categories
9159 of certification in addition to those defined in s. 468.603(4)
9160 and (7) s. 468.603(5) and (8). Such certification categories may
9161 shall not be mandatory and may shall not act to diminish the
9162 scope of any certificate created by statute.
9163 (b) The department board shall by rule establish:
9164 1. Reciprocity of certification with any other state that
9165 requires an examination administered by the International Code
9166 Council.
9167 2. That an applicant for certification as a building code
9168 inspector or plans examiner may apply for a provisional
9169 certificate valid for the duration of the internship period.
9170 3. That partial completion of an internship program is
9171 transferable among jurisdictions, private providers, and firms
9172 of private providers on a form prescribed by the department
9173 board.
9174 4. That an applicant may apply for a standard certificate
9175 on a form prescribed by the department board upon successful
Page 367 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9176 completion of an internship certification program.
9177 5. That an applicant may apply for a standard certificate
9178 at least 30 days but no more than 60 days before completing the
9179 internship certification program.
9180 6. That a building code inspector or plans examiner who
9181 has standard certification may seek an additional certification
9182 in another category by completing an additional nonconcurrent 1-
9183 year internship program in the certification category sought and
9184 passing an examination administered by the International Code
9185 Council and a department-approved board-approved 40-hour code
9186 training course.
9187 Section 279. Subsection (4) is added to section 471.007,
9188 Florida Statutes, to read:
9189 471.007 Board of Professional Engineers.—
9190 (4) The board is abolished July 1, 2033.
9191 Section 280. Subsection (3) of section 471.015, Florida
9192 Statutes, is amended to read:
9193 471.015 Licensure.—
9194 (3) The board shall certify as qualified for a license by
9195 endorsement an applicant who:
9196 (a) Qualifies to take the fundamentals examination and the
9197 principles and practice examination as set forth in s. 471.013,
9198 has passed a United States national, regional, state, or
9199 territorial licensing examination that is substantially
9200 equivalent to the fundamentals examination and principles and
Page 368 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9201 practice examination required by s. 471.013, and has satisfied
9202 the experience requirements set forth in paragraph (2)(a) and s.
9203 471.013; or
9204 (b) Holds a valid license to practice engineering issued
9205 by another state or territory of the United States, or a foreign
9206 jurisdiction if the criteria for issuance of the license were
9207 substantially the same as the licensure criteria that existed in
9208 this state at the time the license was issued; or
9209 (c) Holds a valid license to practice engineering issued
9210 by a foreign jurisdiction approved by the department and holds
9211 an active Council Record with the National Council of Examiners
9212 for Engineering and Surveying.
9213 Section 281. Effective January 1, 2027, section 473.308,
9214 Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
9215 473.308 Licensure.—
9216 (1) A person desiring to be licensed as a Florida
9217 certified public accountant in this state shall apply to the
9218 department for licensure, and the department shall license any
9219 applicant who the department board certifies is qualified to
9220 practice public accounting.
9221 (2) The department board shall certify for licensure any
9222 applicant who successfully passes the licensure examination and
9223 satisfies the requirements of subsections (4), (5), and (6), and
9224 shall certify for licensure any firm that satisfies the
9225 requirements of ss. 473.309 and 473.3101. The department board
Page 369 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9226 may refuse to certify any applicant or firm that has violated
9227 any of the provisions of s. 473.322.
9228 (3) A person desiring to be licensed as a Florida
9229 certified public accountant or a firm desiring to engage in the
9230 practice of public accounting must create and maintain an online
9231 account with the department and provide an e-mail address to
9232 function as the primary means of contact for all communication
9233 from the department. Certified public accountants and firms are
9234 responsible for maintaining accurate contact information on file
9235 with the department and must submit any change in an e-mail
9236 address or street address within 30 days after the change. All
9237 changes must be submitted through the department's online
9238 system.
9239 (4)(a) An applicant for licensure must:
9240 1. Complete have at least 150 semester hours of college
9241 education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred
9242 by an accredited college or university, with a concentration in
9243 accounting and business as prescribed by the department; in the
9244 total educational program to the extent specified by the board.
9245 2. Hold a master's degree in accounting or finance
9246 conferred by an accredited college or university with a
9247 concentration in accounting and business as prescribed by the
9248 department;
9249 3. Hold a baccalaureate degree in accounting or finance
9250 conferred by an accredited college or university with a
Page 370 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9251 concentration in accounting and business as prescribed by the
9252 department; or
9253 4. Hold a baccalaureate degree in any major course of
9254 study conferred by an accredited college or university and have
9255 completed coursework required for a concentration in accounting
9256 and business as prescribed by the department.
9257 (b) The department shall prescribe the coursework required
9258 for a concentration in accounting and business. The department
9259 may deem that an applicant has satisfied requirements for such
9260 coursework if the applicant receives a baccalaureate or higher
9261 degree in accounting or finance conferred by an accredited
9262 college or university in a state or territory of the United
9263 States. An applicant receiving a baccalaureate or higher degree
9264 with a major course of study other than accounting or finance
9265 must complete the coursework required for a concentration in
9266 accounting and business as prescribed by the department.
9267 (5)(a) An applicant for licensure who completes the
9268 education requirements under subparagraph (4)(a)1. or
9269 subparagraph (4)(a)2. after December 31, 2008, must show that he
9270 or she has had 1 year of work experience. An applicant who
9271 completes the education requirements under subparagraph (4)(a)3.
9272 or subparagraph (4)(a)4. must show 2 years of work experience.
9273 (b) The work experience under paragraph (a) This
9274 experience shall include providing any type of service or advice
9275 involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management
Page 371 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9276 advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of
9277 which must be verified by a certified public accountant who is
9278 licensed by a state or territory of the United States. This
9279 experience is acceptable if it was gained through employment in
9280 government, industry, academia, or public practice; constituted
9281 a substantial part of the applicant's duties; and was verified
9282 by a certified public accountant licensed by a state or
9283 territory of the United States.
9284 (c) The department board shall adopt rules specifying
9285 standards and providing for the review and approval of the work
9286 experience required by this subsection section.
9287 (d)(b) However, an applicant who completed the
9288 requirements of subsection (4) on or before December 31, 2008,
9289 and who passes the licensure examination on or before June 30,
9290 2010, is exempt from the requirements of this subsection.
9291 (6)(a) An applicant for licensure must shall show that she
9292 or he the applicant has good moral character. For purposes of
9293 this paragraph, the term
9294 (7)(a) "good moral character" means a personal history of
9295 honesty, fairness, and respect for the rights of others and for
9296 the laws of this state and nation.
9297 (b) The department board may refuse to certify an
9298 applicant for failure to satisfy this requirement if:
9299 1. The department board finds a reasonable relationship
9300 between the lack of good moral character of the applicant and
Page 372 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9301 the professional responsibilities of a certified public
9302 accountant; and
9303 2. The finding by the department board of lack of good
9304 moral character is supported by competent substantial evidence.
9305 (c) When an applicant is found to be unqualified for a
9306 license because of a lack of good moral character, the
9307 department board shall furnish to the applicant a statement
9308 containing the findings of the department board, a complete
9309 record of the evidence upon which the determination was based,
9310 and a notice of the rights of the applicant to a rehearing and
9311 appeal.
9312 (7)(8) The department board shall certify as qualified for
9313 a license by endorsement an applicant who:
9314 (a) Is not licensed and has not been licensed in any state
9315 or territory and who has met the requirements of this section
9316 for education, work experience, and good moral character and has
9317 passed a national, regional, state, or territorial licensing
9318 examination that is substantially equivalent to the examination
9319 required by s. 473.306; or
9320 (b)1. Holds an active a valid license as a certified
9321 public accountant to practice public accounting issued by
9322 another state or a territory of the United States, if the
9323 applicant has maintained good moral character and, at the time
9324 of licensure by such other state or territory, the applicant was
9325 required to show evidence of having obtained at least a
Page 373 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9326 baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or university
9327 and having passed the Uniform CPA Examination. criteria for
9328 issuance of such license were substantially equivalent to the
9329 licensure criteria that existed in this state at the time the
9330 license was issued;
9331 2. Holds a valid license to practice public accounting
9332 issued by another state or territory of the United States but
9333 the criteria for issuance of such license did not meet the
9334 requirements of subparagraph 1.; has met the requirements of
9335 this section for education, work experience, and good moral
9336 character; and has passed a national, regional, state, or
9337 territorial licensing examination that is substantially
9338 equivalent to the examination required by s. 473.306; or
9339 3. Holds a valid license to practice public accounting
9340 issued by another state or territory of the United States for at
9341 least 10 years before the date of application; has passed a
9342 national, regional, state, or territorial licensing examination
9343 that is substantially equivalent to the examination required by
9344 s. 473.306; and has met the requirements of this section for
9345 good moral character.
9346 (9) If the applicant has at least 5 years of experience in
9347 the practice of public accountancy in the United States or in
9348 the practice of public accountancy or its equivalent in a
9349 foreign country that the International Qualifications Appraisal
9350 Board of the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy
Page 374 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9351 has determined has licensure standards that are substantially
9352 equivalent to those in the United States, or has at least 5
9353 years of work experience that meets the requirements of
9354 subsection (5), the board must waive the requirements of
9355 subsection (4) which are in excess of a baccalaureate degree.
9356 All experience that is used as a basis for waiving the
9357 requirements of subsection (4) must be while licensed as a
9358 certified public accountant by another state or territory of the
9359 United States or while licensed in the practice of public
9360 accountancy or its equivalent in a foreign country that the
9361 International Qualifications Appraisal Board of the National
9362 Association of State Boards of Accountancy has determined has
9363 licensure standards that are substantially equivalent to those
9364 in the United States. The board shall have the authority to
9365 establish the standards for experience that meet this
9366 requirement.
9367 (8)(10) The department board may refuse to certify for
9368 licensure any applicant who is under investigation in another
9369 state for any act that would constitute a violation of this act
9370 or chapter 455, until such time as the investigation is complete
9371 and disciplinary proceedings are have been terminated.
9372 Section 282. Section 473.3085, Florida Statutes, is
9373 created to read:
9374 473.3085 Licensure of international applicants.—
9375 (1) An international applicant who seeks licensure as a
Page 375 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9376 certified public accountant in this state must meet the
9377 requirements for education, work experience, and good moral
9378 character under s. 473.308.
9379 (2) An applicant must apply to the department for
9380 licensure.
9381 (3) An international applicant must create and maintain an
9382 online account with the department and provide an e-mail address
9383 to function as the primary means of contact for all
9384 communication from the department. An applicant must submit any
9385 change in e-mail address within 30 days after the change. All
9386 changes must be submitted through the department's online
9387 system.
9388 (4) The department shall certify for licensure any
9389 applicant who satisfies the requirements of subsections (1) and
9390 (2), except the department may refuse to certify an applicant
9391 who has violated s. 473.322.
9392 (5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this
9393 section.
9394 Section 283. Section 473.312, Florida Statutes, is amended
9395 to read:
9396 473.312 Continuing education.—
9397 (1)(a) As part of the license renewal procedure, the
9398 department board shall by rule require Florida certified public
9399 accountants to submit proof satisfactory to the department board
9400 that during the 2 years before prior to application for renewal,
Page 376 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9401 they have successfully completed not less than 48 or more than
9402 80 hours of continuing professional education programs in public
9403 accounting subjects approved by the department board. The
9404 department board may prescribe by rule additional continuing
9405 professional education hours, not to exceed 25 percent of the
9406 total hours required, for failure to complete the hours required
9407 for renewal by the end of the reestablishment period.
9408 (b) Not less than 10 percent of the total hours required
9409 by the department board shall be in accounting-related and
9410 auditing-related subjects, as distinguished from federal and
9411 local taxation matters and management services.
9412 (c) Not less than 5 percent of the total hours required by
9413 the department board shall be in ethics applicable to the
9414 practice of public accounting. This requirement shall be
9415 administered by providers approved by the department board, and
9416 a majority of the hours shall include a review of the provisions
9417 of chapter 455 and this chapter and the related administrative
9418 rules.
9419 (2) Programs of continuing professional education approved
9420 by the department board shall be formal programs of learning
9421 which contribute directly to the professional competency of an
9422 individual following licensure to practice public accounting and
9423 may be any of the following:
9424 (a) Professional development programs of the American
9425 Institute of Certified Public Accountants, state societies of
Page 377 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9426 certified public accountants, or other organizations.
9427 (b) Technical sessions at meetings of the American
9428 Institute of Certified Public Accountants, state societies,
9429 chapters, or other organizations.
9430 (c) University and college courses.
9431 (d) Formal organized in-firm education programs.
9432 (3) The department board shall adopt rules establishing
9433 the continuing education requirements for Florida certified
9434 public accountants who are engaged in the audit of a
9435 governmental entity. The department board shall approve subjects
9436 directly related to the governmental environment and to
9437 governmental auditing for purposes of satisfying the requirement
9438 of this subsection.
9439 (4) For the purposes of maintaining proper continuing
9440 education requirements for renewal of licensure under this
9441 chapter, the department board may appoint a Continuing
9442 Professional Education Advisory Committee, which shall be
9443 composed of one member of the department board, one academician
9444 on the faculty of a university in this state, and six certified
9445 public accountants.
9446 Section 284. Effective January 1, 2027, subsections (1),
9447 (3), and (4) of section 473.3141, Florida Statutes, are amended
9448 to read:
9449 473.3141 Certified public accountants licensed in other
9450 states.—
Page 378 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9451 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, An
9452 individual who holds an active license in good standing as a
9453 certified public accountant in another state or a territory of
9454 the United States and who does not have an office in this state
9455 has the privileges of Florida certified public accountants and
9456 may provide public accounting services in this state without
9457 obtaining a license under this chapter or notifying or
9458 registering with the department board or paying a fee if, at the
9459 time of licensure by such other state or territory, the
9460 individual was required to show evidence of having obtained at
9461 least a baccalaureate degree and having passed the Uniform CPA
9462 Examination:
9463 (a) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant
9464 from a state that the board or its designee has determined by
9465 rule to have adopted standards that are substantially equivalent
9466 to the certificate requirements in s. 5 of the Uniform
9467 Accountancy Act in the issuance of licenses; or
9468 (b) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant
9469 from a state that has not been approved by the board as having
9470 adopted standards in substantial equivalence with s. 5 of the
9471 Uniform Accountancy Act, but obtains verification from the
9472 board, or its designee, as determined by rule, that the
9473 individual's certified public accountant qualifications are
9474 substantially equivalent to the certificate requirements in s. 5
9475 of the Uniform Accountancy Act.
Page 379 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9476
9477 The department board shall define by rule what constitutes an
9478 office.
9479 (3) An individual certified public accountant from another
9480 state or a territory of the United States who practices pursuant
9481 to this section, and the firm that employs that individual,
9482 shall both consent, as a condition of the privilege of
9483 practicing in this state:
9484 (a) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and
9485 disciplinary authority of the department board;
9486 (b) To comply with this chapter and the applicable
9487 department board rules;
9488 (c) That if the individual's license as a certified public
9489 accountant from another the state or a territory of the United
9490 States becomes invalid of the individual's principal place of
9491 business is no longer valid, the individual must will cease
9492 offering or rendering public accounting services in this state,
9493 individually and on behalf of a firm; and
9494 (d) To the appointment of the department state board that
9495 issued the individual's license as the agent upon whom process
9496 may be served in any action or proceeding by the board or
9497 department against the individual or firm.
9498 (4) An individual who qualifies to practice under this
9499 section may perform the services identified in s. 473.302(7)(a)
9500 s. 473.302(8)(a) only through a firm that has obtained a license
Page 380 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9501 issued under s. 473.3101 or is authorized by s. 473.3101 to
9502 provide such services.
9503 Section 285. Subsection (3) and paragraph (e) of
9504 subsection (4) of section 474.2021, Florida Statutes, are
9505 amended to read:
9506 474.2021 Veterinary telehealth.—
9507 (3) The department board has jurisdiction over a
9508 veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth, regardless of
9509 where the veterinarian's physical office is located. The
9510 practice of veterinary medicine is deemed to occur when the
9511 veterinarian, the patient, or both are located within this state
9512 at the time the veterinarian practices veterinary telehealth.
9513 (4) A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth:
9514 (e) Shall prescribe all drugs and medications in
9515 accordance with all federal and state laws and the following
9516 requirements:
9517 1. A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may
9518 order, prescribe, or make available medicinal drugs or drugs
9519 specifically approved for use in animals by the United States
9520 Food and Drug Administration, the use of which conforms to the
9521 approved labeling. Prescriptions based solely on a telehealth
9522 evaluation may be issued for up to 1 year month for products
9523 labeled solely for flea and tick control and up to 14 days of
9524 treatment for other animal drugs. Prescriptions based solely on
9525 a telehealth evaluation may not be renewed without an in-person
Page 381 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9526 examination.
9527 2. A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may not
9528 order, prescribe, or make available medicinal drugs or drugs as
9529 defined in s. 465.003 approved by the United States Food and
9530 Drug Administration for human use or compounded antibacterial,
9531 antifungal, antiviral, or antiparasitic medications, unless the
9532 veterinarian has conducted an in-person physical examination of
9533 the animal or made medically appropriate and timely visits to
9534 the premises where the animal is kept.
9535 3. A veterinarian may not use veterinary telehealth to
9536 prescribe a controlled substance as defined in chapter 893
9537 unless the veterinarian has conducted an in-person physical
9538 examination of the animal or made medically appropriate and
9539 timely visits within the past year to the premises where the
9540 animal is kept.
9541 4. A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may not
9542 prescribe a drug or other medication for use on a horse engaged
9543 in racing or training at a facility under the jurisdiction of
9544 the Florida Gaming Control Commission or on a horse that is a
9545 covered horse as defined in the federal Horseracing Integrity
9546 and Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 3051 et seq.;
9547 Section 286. Subsections (3) through (7) of section
9548 475.17, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
9549 475.17 Qualifications for practice.—
9550 (3)(a) The commission may prescribe a postlicensure
Page 382 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9551 education requirement in order for a person to maintain a valid
9552 sales associate's license, which shall not exceed 45 classroom
9553 hours of 50 minutes each, inclusive of examination, prior to the
9554 first renewal following initial licensure. If prescribed, this
9555 shall consist of one or more commission-approved courses which
9556 total at least 45 classroom hours on one or more subjects which
9557 include, but are not limited to, property management, appraisal,
9558 real estate finance, the economics of real estate management,
9559 marketing, technology, sales and listing of properties, business
9560 office management, courses teaching practical real estate
9561 application skills, development of business plans, marketing of
9562 property, and time management. Required postlicensure education
9563 courses must be provided by an accredited college, university,
9564 or community college, by a career center, by a registered real
9565 estate school, or by a commission-approved sponsor.
9566 (b) Satisfactory completion of the postlicensure education
9567 requirement is demonstrated by successfully meeting all
9568 standards established for the commission-prescribed or
9569 commission-approved institution or school. However, notice of
9570 satisfactory completion shall not be issued if the student has
9571 absences in excess of 10 percent of the required classroom hours
9572 or has not satisfactorily completed a timed distance learning
9573 course examination.
9574 (c) The license of any sales associate who does not
9575 complete the postlicensure education requirement prior to the
Page 383 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9576 first renewal following initial licensure shall be considered
9577 null and void. Such person wishing to again operate as a real
9578 estate sales associate must requalify by satisfactorily
9579 completing the sales associate's prelicensure course and passing
9580 the state examination for licensure as a sales associate.
9581 (d) A sales associate who is required to complete any
9582 postlicensure education requirement must complete any
9583 postlicensure education requirement and hold a current and valid
9584 license in order to be eligible for licensure as a broker.
9585 (4)(a) The commission may prescribe a postlicensure
9586 education requirement in order for a person to maintain a valid
9587 broker's license, which shall not exceed 60 classroom hours of
9588 50 minutes each, inclusive of examination, prior to the first
9589 renewal following initial licensure. If prescribed, this shall
9590 consist of one or more commission-approved courses which total
9591 at least 60 classroom hours on one or more subjects which
9592 include, but are not limited to, advanced appraisal, advanced
9593 property management, real estate marketing, business law,
9594 advanced real estate investment analyses, advanced legal
9595 aspects, general accounting, real estate economics,
9596 syndications, commercial brokerage, feasibility analyses,
9597 advanced real estate finance, residential brokerage, advanced
9598 marketing, technology, advanced business planning, time
9599 management, or real estate brokerage office operations. Required
9600 postlicensure education courses must be provided by an
Page 384 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9601 accredited college, university, or community college, by a
9602 career center, by a registered real estate school, or by a
9603 commission-approved sponsor.
9604 (b) Satisfactory completion of the postlicensure education
9605 requirement is demonstrated by successfully meeting all
9606 standards established for the commission-prescribed or
9607 commission-approved institution or school. However, notice of
9608 satisfactory completion shall not be issued if the student has
9609 absences in excess of 10 percent of the required classroom hours
9610 or has not satisfactorily completed a timed distance learning
9611 course examination.
9612 (c) The license of any broker who does not complete the
9613 postlicensure education requirement prior to the first renewal
9614 following initial licensure shall be considered null and void.
9615 If the licensee wishes to operate as a sales associate, she or
9616 he may be issued a sales associate's license after providing
9617 proof that she or he has satisfactorily completed the 14-hour
9618 continuing education course within the 6 months following
9619 expiration of her or his broker's license. To operate as a
9620 broker, the licensee must requalify by satisfactorily completing
9621 the broker's prelicensure course and passing the state
9622 examination for licensure as a broker.
9623 (5)(a) The commission may allow an additional 6-month
9624 period after the first renewal following initial licensure for
9625 completing the postlicensure education courses for sales
Page 385 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9626 associates and brokers who cannot, due to individual physical
9627 hardship, as defined by rule, complete the courses within the
9628 required time.
9629 (b) Except as provided in subsection (4), sales associates
9630 and brokers are not required to meet the 14-hour continuing
9631 education requirement prior to the first renewal following
9632 initial licensure.
9633 (c)1. A distance learning course or courses shall be
9634 approved by the commission as an option to classroom hours as
9635 satisfactory completion of the postlicensure education course or
9636 courses as required by this section. The schools or sponsors
9637 authorized by this section have the option of providing
9638 classroom courses, distance learning courses, or both. However,
9639 satisfactory completion of a distance learning postlicensure
9640 education course or courses requires the satisfactory completion
9641 of a timed distance learning course examination. Such
9642 examination shall not be required to be monitored or given at a
9643 centralized location.
9644 2. The commission shall provide for postlicensure
9645 education courses to be made available by correspondence or
9646 other suitable means to any person who, by reason of hardship,
9647 as defined by rule, cannot attend the place or places where
9648 courses are regularly conducted or does not have access to the
9649 distance learning courses.
9650 (3)(6) The postlicensure education requirements of this
Page 386 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9651 section, and the education course requirements for one to become
9652 initially licensed, do not apply to any applicant or licensee
9653 who has received a 4-year degree, or higher, in real estate from
9654 an accredited institution of higher education.
9655 (4)(7) The commission may not approve prelicensure or
9656 postlicensure distance learning courses for brokers, broker
9657 associates, and sales associates by correspondence methods,
9658 except in instances of hardship pursuant to subparagraphs
9659 (2)(a)3. and (5)(c)2.
9660 Section 287. Subsection (2) of section 475.175, Florida
9661 Statutes, is amended to read:
9662 475.175 Examinations.—
9663 (2) Each accredited college, university, community
9664 college, or registered real estate school shall notify the
9665 department commission of the names of all persons who have
9666 satisfactorily completed the educational requirements provided
9667 for in s. 475.17(2), (3), and (4) in a manner prescribed by the
9668 department commission. Furthermore, each such educational
9669 institution shall provide to each person satisfactorily
9670 completing the educational requirements provided for in s.
9671 475.17(2), (3), and (4) a certificate as proof of such
9672 satisfactory completion.
9673 Section 288. Subsection (1) of section 475.180, Florida
9674 Statutes, is amended to read:
9675 475.180 Nonresident licenses.—
Page 387 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9676 (1) Notwithstanding the prelicensure requirements set
9677 forth under ss. 475.17(2) and (3) (6) and 475.175, the
9678 department commission in its discretion may enter into written
9679 agreements with similar licensing authorities of other states,
9680 territories, or jurisdictions of the United States or foreign
9681 national jurisdictions to ensure for Florida licensees
9682 nonresident licensure opportunities comparable to those afforded
9683 to nonresidents by this section. Whenever the department
9684 commission determines that another jurisdiction does not offer
9685 nonresident licensure to Florida licensees substantially
9686 comparable to those afforded to licensees of that jurisdiction
9687 by this section, the department commission shall require
9688 licensees of that jurisdiction who apply for nonresident
9689 licensure to meet education, experience, and examination
9690 requirements substantially comparable to those required by that
9691 jurisdiction with respect to Florida licensees who seek
9692 nonresident licensure, not to exceed such requirements as
9693 prescribed in ss. 475.17(2) and (3) (6) and 475.175.
9694 Section 289. Subsection (1) of section 475.182, Florida
9695 Statutes, is amended to read:
9696 475.182 Renewal of license; continuing education.—
9697 (1)(a) The department shall renew a license upon receipt
9698 of the renewal application and fee. The renewal application for
9699 an active license as broker, broker associate, or sales
9700 associate shall include proof satisfactory to the commission
Page 388 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9701 that the licensee has, since the issuance or renewal of her or
9702 his current license, satisfactorily completed at least 14
9703 classroom hours of 50 minutes each of a continuing education
9704 course during each biennium of a license period, as prescribed
9705 by the commission. Approval or denial of a specialty course must
9706 be based on the extent to which the course content focuses on
9707 real estate issues relevant to the modern practice of real
9708 estate by a real estate licensee, including technology used in
9709 the real estate industry. The commission may accept as a
9710 substitute for such continuing education course, on a classroom-
9711 hour-for-classroom-hour basis, any satisfactorily completed
9712 education course that the commission finds is adequate to
9713 educate licensees within the intent of this section, including
9714 an approved distance learning course. However, the commission
9715 may not require, for the purpose of satisfactorily completing an
9716 approved correspondence or distance learning course, a written
9717 examination that is to be taken at a centralized location and is
9718 to be monitored.
9719 (b) The commission may accept as a substitute for 3
9720 classroom hours, one time per renewal cycle, attendance at one
9721 legal agenda session of the commission. In order to obtain
9722 credit, the licensee must notify the division at least 7 days in
9723 advance of his or her intent to attend. A licensee may not earn
9724 any continuing education credit for attending a legal agenda
9725 session of the commission as a party to a disciplinary action.
Page 389 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9726 Section 290. Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of section
9727 475.183, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
9728 475.183 Inactive status.—
9729 (1) A license which has become voluntarily inactive may be
9730 renewed pursuant to s. 475.182 upon application to the
9731 department. The commission shall prescribe by rule continuing
9732 education requirements, not to exceed 12 classroom hours for
9733 each year the license was inactive, as a condition of renewing a
9734 voluntarily inactive license. The commission shall substitute
9735 for such continuing education requirements, on a classroom-hour-
9736 for-classroom-hour basis, any satisfactorily completed education
9737 course approved in the manner specified in s. 475.182(1). A
9738 person whose license is voluntarily inactive and who renews the
9739 license may elect to continue her or his voluntarily inactive
9740 status.
9741 (2)(a) A licensee may reactivate a license that has been
9742 involuntarily inactive for 12 months or less by satisfactorily
9743 completing at least 14 hours of a commission-prescribed
9744 continuing education course. Notwithstanding the provisions of
9745 s. 455.271, a licensee may reactivate a license that has been
9746 involuntarily inactive for more than 12 months but fewer than 24
9747 months by satisfactorily completing 28 hours of a commission-
9748 prescribed education course.
9749 (b) Any license that has been involuntarily inactive for
9750 more than 2 years shall automatically expire. Once a license
Page 390 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9751 expires, it becomes null and void without any further action by
9752 the commission or department. Ninety days prior to expiration of
9753 the license, the department shall give notice to the licensee.
9754 The department commission shall prescribe by rule a fee not to
9755 exceed $100 for the late renewal of an involuntarily inactive
9756 license. The department shall collect the current renewal fee
9757 for each renewal period in which the license was involuntarily
9758 inactive in addition to any applicable late renewal fee.
9759 (4) The department commission may reinstate the license of
9760 an individual whose license has become void if the department
9761 commission determines that the individual failed to comply
9762 because of illness or economic hardship, as defined by rule. The
9763 individual must apply to the department commission for
9764 reinstatement within 6 months after the date that the license
9765 becomes void. Such individual must meet all continuing education
9766 requirements prescribed by law, pay appropriate licensing fees,
9767 and otherwise be eligible for renewal of licensure under this
9768 section.
9769 Section 291. Paragraph (t) of subsection (1) of section
9770 475.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
9771 475.25 Discipline.—
9772 (1) The commission may deny an application for licensure,
9773 registration, or permit, or renewal thereof; may place a
9774 licensee, registrant, or permittee on probation; may suspend a
9775 license, registration, or permit for a period not exceeding 10
Page 391 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9776 years; may revoke a license, registration, or permit; may impose
9777 an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000 for each count or
9778 separate offense; and may issue a reprimand, and any or all of
9779 the foregoing, if it finds that the licensee, registrant,
9780 permittee, or applicant:
9781 (t) Has violated any standard of professional practice
9782 adopted by rule of the department Florida Real Estate Appraisal
9783 Board, including standards for the development or communication
9784 of a real estate appraisal, as approved and adopted by the
9785 Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation, as
9786 defined in s. 475.611. This paragraph does not apply to a real
9787 estate broker or sales associate who, in the ordinary course of
9788 business, performs a comparative market analysis, gives a broker
9789 price opinion, or gives an opinion of value of real estate.
9790 However, in no event may this comparative market analysis,
9791 broker price opinion, or opinion of value of real estate be
9792 referred to as an appraisal, as defined in s. 475.611.
9793 Section 292. Paragraphs (k) through (dd) of subsection (1)
9794 are redesignated as paragraphs (j) through (cc), respectively,
9795 and present paragraphs (j), (p), (q), (z), and (aa) of
9796 subsection (1) and subsection (2) of section 475.611, Florida
9797 Statutes, are amended to read:
9798 475.611 Definitions.—
9799 (1) As used in this part, the term:
9800 (j) "Board" means the Florida Real Estate Appraisal Board
Page 392 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9801 established under s. 475.613.
9802 (o)(p) "Direct supervision" means the degree of
9803 supervision required of a supervisory appraiser overseeing the
9804 work of a registered trainee appraiser by which the supervisory
9805 appraiser has control over and detailed professional knowledge
9806 of the work being done. Direct supervision is achieved when a
9807 registered trainee appraiser has regular direction, guidance,
9808 and support from a supervisory appraiser who has the
9809 competencies as determined by rule of the department board.
9810 (p)(q) "Evaluation" means a valuation permitted by any
9811 federal financial institutions regulatory agency appraisal
9812 regulations for transactions that do not require an appraisal,
9813 as such valuations qualify for an applicable exemption under
9814 federal law. The department board shall adopt rules, as
9815 necessary, to define the term "evaluation" and the applicable
9816 exemptions under federal law.
9817 (y)(z) "Supervisory appraiser" means a certified
9818 residential appraiser or a certified general appraiser
9819 responsible for the direct supervision of one or more registered
9820 trainee appraisers and fully responsible for appraisals and
9821 appraisal reports prepared by those registered trainee
9822 appraisers. The department board, by rule, shall determine the
9823 responsibilities of a supervisory appraiser, the geographic
9824 proximity required, the minimum qualifications and standards
9825 required of a certified appraiser before she or he may act in
Page 393 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9826 the capacity of a supervisory appraiser, and the maximum number
9827 of registered trainee appraisers to be supervised by an
9828 individual supervisory appraiser.
9829 (z)(aa) "Training" means the process of providing for and
9830 making available to a registered trainee appraiser, under direct
9831 supervision, a planned, prepared, and coordinated program, or
9832 routine of instruction and education, in appraisal professional
9833 and technical appraisal skills as determined by rule of the
9834 department board.
9835 (2) Wherever the word "operate" or "operating" appears in
9836 this part with respect to a registered trainee appraiser,
9837 registered appraisal management company, licensed appraiser, or
9838 certified appraiser; in any order, rule, or regulation of the
9839 department board; in any pleading, indictment, or information
9840 under this part; in any court action or proceeding; or in any
9841 order or judgment of a court, it shall be deemed to mean the
9842 commission of one or more acts described in this part as
9843 constituting or defining a registered trainee appraiser,
9844 registered appraisal management company, licensed appraiser, or
9845 certified appraiser, not including, however, any of the
9846 exceptions stated therein. A single act is sufficient to bring a
9847 person within the meaning of this subsection, and each act, if
9848 prohibited herein, constitutes a separate offense.
9849 Section 293. Subsection (7) of section 475.612, Florida
9850 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 394 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9851 475.612 Certification, licensure, or registration
9852 required.—
9853 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
9854 appraiser may perform an evaluation of real property in
9855 connection with a real estate-related financial transaction, as
9856 defined by rule of the department board, which is regulated by a
9857 federal financial institutions regulatory agency. The appraiser
9858 shall comply with the standards for evaluations imposed by the
9859 federal financial institutions regulatory agency and other
9860 standards as prescribed by the department board. However, an
9861 evaluation may not be referred to or construed as an appraisal.
9862 Section 294. Section 475.614, Florida Statutes, is amended
9863 to read:
9864 475.614 Power of department board to adopt rules and
9865 decide questions of practice; requirements for protection of
9866 appraiser's signature.—
9867 (1) The department may board has authority to adopt rules
9868 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement provisions of
9869 law conferring duties upon it. The board may decide questions of
9870 practice arising in the proceedings before it, having regard to
9871 this section and the rules then in force.
9872 (2) The department board shall adopt rules specifying the
9873 means by which an appraiser's signature may be affixed to an
9874 appraisal report or other work performed by the appraiser. The
9875 rules shall include requirements for protecting the security of
Page 395 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9876 an appraiser's signature and prohibiting practices that may
9877 discredit the use of an appraiser's signature to authenticate
9878 the work performed by the appraiser.
9879 Section 295. Section 475.6145, Florida Statutes, is
9880 amended to read:
9881 475.6145 Seal.—The department board shall adopt a seal by
9882 which it shall authenticate its proceedings, records, and acts.
9883 Copies of the proceedings, records, and acts of the board, and
9884 certificates purporting to relate the facts concerning such
9885 proceedings, records, and acts, which are signed by the board
9886 chair, the custodian of such records, or any other person
9887 authorized to make such certification and which are
9888 authenticated by such seal, shall be prima facie evidence of
9889 such proceedings, records, and acts in all courts of this state.
9890 Section 296. Section 475.6147, Florida Statutes, is
9891 amended to read:
9892 475.6147 Fees.—
9893 (1)(a) The department board by rule may establish fees to
9894 be paid for application, licensing and renewal, certification
9895 and recertification, registration and reregistration,
9896 reinstatement, and recordmaking and recordkeeping.
9897 (b) The fee for initial application of an appraiser may
9898 not exceed $150, and the combined cost of the application and
9899 examination may not exceed $300. The initial certification,
9900 registration, or license fee and the certification,
Page 396 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9901 registration, or license renewal fee may not exceed $150 for
9902 each year of the duration of the certification, registration, or
9903 license.
9904 (c) The fee for initial application of an appraisal
9905 management company may not exceed $150. The initial registration
9906 and registration renewal fee may not exceed $150 for each year
9907 of the duration of the registration.
9908 (d) The department board may also establish by rule a late
9909 renewal penalty.
9910 (e) The department board shall establish fees which are
9911 adequate to ensure its continued operation. Fees shall be based
9912 on estimates made by the department of the revenue required to
9913 implement this part and other provisions of law relating to the
9914 regulation of real estate appraisers.
9915 (2) Application and certification, registration, and
9916 license fees shall be refunded upon a determination by the
9917 department board that the state is not entitled to the fees or
9918 that only a portion of the resources have been expended in the
9919 processing of the application or shall be refunded if for any
9920 other reason the application is not completely processed. The
9921 department board shall implement this subsection by rule.
9922 Section 297. Section 475.615, Florida Statutes, is amended
9923 to read:
9924 475.615 Qualifications for registration or certification.—
9925 (1) Any person desiring to act as a registered trainee
Page 397 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9926 appraiser or as a certified appraiser must make application in
9927 writing to the department in such form and detail as the
9928 department board shall prescribe. Each applicant must be at
9929 least 18 years of age and hold a high school diploma or its
9930 equivalent.
9931 (2) The department board is authorized to waive or modify
9932 any education, experience, or examination requirements
9933 established in this part in order to conform with any such
9934 requirements established by the Appraiser Qualifications Board
9935 of the Appraisal Foundation or any successor body recognized by
9936 federal law, including any requirements adopted on December 9,
9937 2011. The department board shall implement this section by rule.
9938 (3) Appropriate fees, as set forth in the rules of the
9939 department board pursuant to s. 475.6147, and a set of
9940 fingerprints must accompany all applications for registration or
9941 certification. The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the
9942 Division of Criminal Justice Information Systems within the
9943 Department of Law Enforcement for processing to determine
9944 whether the applicant has a criminal history record. The
9945 fingerprints shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
9946 Investigation to determine whether the applicant has a criminal
9947 history record. The information obtained by the processing of
9948 the fingerprints by the Department of Law Enforcement and the
9949 Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be sent to the department
9950 to determine whether the applicant is statutorily qualified for
Page 398 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9951 registration or certification.
9952 (4) In the event that the applicant is currently a
9953 registered trainee appraiser or a licensed or certified
9954 appraiser and is making application to obtain a different status
9955 of appraisal credential, should such application be received by
9956 the department within 180 days prior to through 180 days after
9957 the applicant's scheduled renewal, the charge for the
9958 application shall be established by the rules of the department
9959 board pursuant to s. 475.6147.
9960 (5) At the time of filing an application for registration
9961 or certification, the applicant must sign a pledge indicating
9962 that upon becoming registered or certified, she or he will
9963 comply with the standards of professional practice established
9964 by rule of the department board, including standards for the
9965 development or communication of a real estate appraisal, and
9966 must indicate in writing that she or he understands the types of
9967 misconduct for which disciplinary proceedings may be initiated.
9968 The application expires 1 year after the date received by the
9969 department.
9970 (6) All applicants must be competent and qualified to make
9971 real estate appraisals with safety to those with whom they may
9972 undertake a relationship of trust and confidence and the general
9973 public. If any applicant has been denied registration,
9974 licensure, or certification, or has been disbarred, or the
9975 applicant's registration, license, or certificate to practice or
Page 399 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
9976 conduct any regulated profession, business, or vocation has been
9977 revoked or suspended by this or any other state, any nation, or
9978 any possession or district of the United States, or any court or
9979 lawful agency thereof, because of any conduct or practices which
9980 would have warranted a like result under this part, or if the
9981 applicant has been guilty of conduct or practices in this state
9982 or elsewhere which would have been grounds for disciplining her
9983 or his registration, license, or certification under this part
9984 had the applicant then been a registered trainee appraiser or a
9985 licensed or certified appraiser, the applicant is deemed not to
9986 be qualified unless the applicant has met the conditions adopted
9987 by the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal
9988 Foundation on December 9, 2011, as prescribed by rule of the
9989 department board and it appears to the department board that the
9990 interest of the public is not likely to be endangered by the
9991 granting of registration or certification.
9992 (7) No applicant seeking to become registered or certified
9993 under this part may be rejected solely by virtue of membership
9994 or lack of membership in any particular appraisal organization.
9995 Section 298. Section 475.617, Florida Statutes, is amended
9996 to read:
9997 475.617 Education and experience requirements.—
9998 (1) To be registered as a trainee appraiser, an applicant
9999 must present evidence satisfactory to the department board that
10000 she or he has successfully completed at least 100 hours of
Page 400 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10001 approved qualifying education courses in subjects related to
10002 real estate appraisal, which must include coverage of the
10003 Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, or its
10004 equivalent, as established by rule of the department board, from
10005 a nationally recognized or state-recognized appraisal
10006 organization, career center, accredited community college,
10007 college, or university, state or federal agency or commission,
10008 or proprietary real estate school that holds a permit pursuant
10009 to s. 475.451. The department board may increase the required
10010 number of hours to not more than 125 hours. All qualifying
10011 education courses may be completed through in-person classroom
10012 instruction or distance learning. A classroom hour is defined as
10013 50 minutes out of each 60-minute segment. Past courses may be
10014 approved on an hour-for-hour basis.
10015 (2) To be certified as a residential appraiser, an
10016 applicant must present satisfactory evidence to the department
10017 board that she or he has met the minimum education and
10018 experience requirements prescribed by rule of the department
10019 board. The department board shall prescribe by rule education
10020 and experience requirements that meet or exceed the following
10021 real property appraiser qualification criteria adopted on
10022 December 9, 2011, by the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the
10023 Appraisal Foundation:
10024 (a) Has at least 2,500 hours of experience obtained over a
10025 24-month period in real property appraisal as defined by rule.
Page 401 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10026 (b) Has successfully completed at least 200 classroom
10027 hours, inclusive of examination, of approved qualifying
10028 education courses in subjects related to real estate appraisal,
10029 which must include a 15-hour National Uniform Standards of
10030 Professional Appraisal Practice course, or its equivalent, as
10031 established by rule of the department board, from a nationally
10032 recognized or state-recognized appraisal organization, career
10033 center, accredited community college, college, or university,
10034 state or federal agency or commission, or proprietary real
10035 estate school that holds a permit pursuant to s. 475.451. All
10036 qualifying education courses may be completed through in-person
10037 classroom instruction or distance learning. A classroom hour is
10038 defined as 50 minutes out of each 60-minute segment. Past
10039 courses may be approved by the department board and substituted
10040 on an hour-for-hour basis.
10041 (3) To be certified as a general appraiser, an applicant
10042 must present evidence satisfactory to the department board that
10043 she or he has met the minimum education and experience
10044 requirements prescribed by rule of the department board. The
10045 department board shall prescribe education and experience
10046 requirements that meet or exceed the following real property
10047 appraiser qualification criteria adopted on December 9, 2011, by
10048 the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal Foundation:
10049 (a) Has at least 3,000 hours of experience obtained over a
10050 30-month period in real property appraisal as defined by rule.
Page 402 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10051 (b) Has successfully completed at least 300 classroom
10052 hours, inclusive of examination, of approved qualifying
10053 education courses in subjects related to real estate appraisal,
10054 which must include a 15-hour National Uniform Standards of
10055 Professional Appraisal Practice course, or its equivalent, as
10056 established by rule of the department board, from a nationally
10057 recognized or state-recognized appraisal organization, career
10058 center, accredited community college, college, or university,
10059 state or federal agency or commission, or proprietary real
10060 estate school that holds a permit pursuant to s. 475.451. All
10061 qualifying education courses may be completed through in-person
10062 classroom instruction or distance learning. A classroom hour is
10063 defined as 50 minutes out of each 60-minute segment. Past
10064 courses may be approved by the department board and substituted
10065 on an hour-for-hour basis.
10066 (4) A distance learning course may be approved by the
10067 department board as an option to classroom hours for
10068 satisfactory completion of the academic courses required under
10069 this section. The schools authorized by this section have the
10070 option of providing classroom courses, distance learning
10071 courses, or both.
10072 (a) A distance learning course must use a delivery method
10073 that is certified or approved by a department-authorized board-
10074 authorized independent certifying organization.
10075 (b) A distance learning course intended for use as
Page 403 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10076 academic education must include a written, closed-book final
10077 examination. As used in this paragraph, the term "written"
10078 refers to an exam that might be written on paper or administered
10079 electronically on a computer workstation or other device. Oral
10080 exams are not acceptable.
10081 (5) Each applicant must furnish, under oath, a detailed
10082 statement of the experience for each year of experience she or
10083 he claims. Upon request, the applicant shall furnish to the
10084 department board, for its examination, copies of appraisal
10085 reports or file memoranda to support the claim for experience.
10086 Any appraisal report or file memoranda used to support a claim
10087 for experience must be maintained by the applicant for no less
10088 than 5 years after the date of certification.
10089 (6) The department board may implement the provisions of
10090 this section by rule.
10091 Section 299. Section 475.6171, Florida Statutes, is
10092 amended to read:
10093 475.6171 Issuance of registration or certification.—The
10094 registration or certification of an applicant may be issued upon
10095 receipt by the department board of the following:
10096 (1) A complete application indicating compliance with
10097 qualifications as specified in s. 475.615.
10098 (2) Proof of successful course completion as specified in
10099 s. 475.617.
10100 (3) Proof of experience for certification as specified in
Page 404 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10101 s. 475.617.
10102 (4) If required, proof of passing a written examination as
10103 specified in s. 475.616.
10104 (5) The department board shall implement this section by
10105 rule.
10106 Section 300. Subsection (1) of section 475.618, Florida
10107 Statutes, is amended to read:
10108 475.618 Renewal of registration, license, certification,
10109 or instructor permit; continuing education.—
10110 (1)(a) The department shall renew a registration, license,
10111 certification, or instructor permit upon receipt of the renewal
10112 application and proper fee. Such application shall include proof
10113 satisfactory to the department board that the individual has
10114 satisfactorily completed any continuing education that has been
10115 prescribed by the department board.
10116 (b) A distance learning course or courses shall be
10117 approved by the department board as an option to classroom hours
10118 as satisfactory completion of the course or courses as required
10119 by this section. The schools authorized by this section have the
10120 option of providing classroom courses, distance learning
10121 courses, or both.
10122 (c) The department board may authorize independent
10123 certification organizations to certify or approve the delivery
10124 method of distance learning courses. Certification from such
10125 authorized organizations must be provided at the time a distance
Page 405 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10126 learning course is submitted to the department board by an
10127 accredited college, university, community college, career
10128 center, proprietary real estate school, or department-approved
10129 board-approved sponsor for content approval.
10130 Section 301. Section 475.619, Florida Statutes, is amended
10131 to read:
10132 475.619 Inactive status.—
10133 (1) A registration, license, or certification which has
10134 become inactive may be renewed upon application to the
10135 department. The department board shall prescribe by rule
10136 continuing education requirements for each year the
10137 registration, license, or certification was inactive, as a
10138 condition of renewing an inactive registration, license, or
10139 certification.
10140 (2) Any registration, license, or certification which has
10141 been inactive for more than 4 years shall automatically expire.
10142 Once a registration, license, or certification expires, it
10143 becomes null and void without any further action by the board or
10144 department. Two years prior to the expiration of the
10145 registration, license, or certification, the department shall
10146 give notice by mail to the registered trainee, licensee, or
10147 certificateholder at her or his last known address. The
10148 department board shall prescribe by rule a fee not to exceed
10149 $100 for the late renewal of an inactive registration, license,
10150 or certification. The department shall collect the current
Page 406 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10151 renewal fee for each renewal period in which the registration,
10152 license, or certification was inactive, in addition to any
10153 applicable late renewal fee.
10154 (3) The department board shall adopt rules relating to
10155 inactive registrations, licenses, and certifications and for the
10156 renewal of such registrations, licenses, and certifications.
10157 Section 302. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 475.621,
10158 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
10159 475.621 Registry of licensed and certified appraisers;
10160 registry of appraisal management companies.—
10161 (2) The department shall collect from such individuals who
10162 perform or seek to perform appraisals in federally related
10163 transactions an annual fee as set by rule of, and transmitted
10164 to, the appraisal subcommittee. The department shall collect
10165 from such appraisal management companies that perform or seek to
10166 perform appraisal management services in covered transactions an
10167 annual fee set by rule of the department board and transmitted
10168 to the appraisal subcommittee.
10169 (3) Notwithstanding the prohibition against requiring
10170 registration of a federally regulated appraisal management
10171 company as provided in s. 475.6235(8)(b), the department board
10172 shall establish a procedure to collect from a federally
10173 regulated appraisal management company an annual fee as set by
10174 rule of the department board and transmitted to the appraisal
10175 subcommittee.
Page 407 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10176 Section 303. Section 475.6222, Florida Statutes, is
10177 amended to read:
10178 475.6222 Supervision and training of registered trainee
10179 appraisers.—The primary or secondary supervisory appraiser of a
10180 registered trainee appraiser shall provide direct supervision
10181 and training to the registered trainee appraiser. The role and
10182 responsibility of the supervisory appraiser is determined by
10183 rule of the department board.
10184 Section 304. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 475.6235,
10185 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
10186 475.6235 Registration of appraisal management companies
10187 required; exemptions.—
10188 (3) Appropriate fees, as set forth in the rules of the
10189 department board pursuant to s. 475.6147, and a complete set of
10190 fingerprints for each person listed in paragraph (2)(f) must
10191 accompany all applications for registration. The fingerprints
10192 shall be forwarded to the Division of Criminal Justice
10193 Information Systems within the Department of Law Enforcement for
10194 purposes of processing the fingerprints to determine whether the
10195 person has a criminal history record. The fingerprints shall
10196 also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
10197 purposes of processing the fingerprints to determine whether the
10198 person has a criminal history record. The information obtained
10199 by the processing of fingerprints by the Department of Law
10200 Enforcement and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be
Page 408 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10201 sent to the department for the purpose of determining whether
10202 the appraisal management company is statutorily qualified for
10203 registration.
10204 (4) At the time of filing an application for registration
10205 of an appraisal management company, each person listed in
10206 paragraph (2)(f) must sign a pledge to comply with applicable
10207 standards of professional practice established by rule of the
10208 department board, including standards for the development or
10209 communication of a real estate appraisal, and must indicate in
10210 writing that she or he understands the types of misconduct for
10211 which disciplinary proceedings may be initiated. The application
10212 expires 1 year after the date received.
10213 Section 305. Section 475.624, Florida Statutes, is amended
10214 to read:
10215 475.624 Discipline of appraisers.—The department board may
10216 deny an application for registration or certification of an
10217 appraiser; may investigate the actions of any appraiser
10218 registered, licensed, or certified under this part; may
10219 reprimand or impose an administrative fine not to exceed $5,000
10220 for each count or separate offense against any such appraiser;
10221 and may revoke or suspend, for a period not to exceed 10 years,
10222 the registration, license, or certification of any such
10223 appraiser, or place any such appraiser on probation, if the
10224 department board finds that the registered trainee, licensee, or
10225 certificateholder:
Page 409 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10226 (1) Has violated any provision of this part or s.
10227 455.227(1); however, any appraiser registered, licensed, or
10228 certified under this part is exempt from s. 455.227(1)(i).
10229 (2) Has been guilty of fraud, misrepresentation,
10230 concealment, false promises, false pretenses, dishonest conduct,
10231 culpable negligence, or breach of trust in any business
10232 transaction in this state or any other state, nation, or
10233 territory; has violated a duty imposed upon her or him by law or
10234 by the terms of a contract, whether written, oral, express, or
10235 implied, in an appraisal assignment; has aided, assisted, or
10236 conspired with any other person engaged in any such misconduct
10237 and in furtherance thereof; or has formed an intent, design, or
10238 scheme to engage in such misconduct and committed an overt act
10239 in furtherance of such intent, design, or scheme. It is
10240 immaterial to the guilt of the registered trainee appraiser or
10241 licensed or certified appraiser that the victim or intended
10242 victim of the misconduct has sustained no damage or loss; that
10243 the damage or loss has been settled and paid after discovery of
10244 the misconduct; or that such victim or intended victim was a
10245 customer or a person in confidential relation with the
10246 registered trainee appraiser or licensed or certified appraiser,
10247 or was an identified member of the general public.
10248 (3) Has advertised services in a manner that is
10249 fraudulent, false, deceptive, or misleading in form or content.
10250 (4) Has violated any provision of this part or any lawful
Page 410 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10251 order or rule issued under this part or chapter 455.
10252 (5) Has been convicted or found guilty of, or entered a
10253 plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime
10254 in any jurisdiction that directly relates to the activities of a
10255 registered trainee appraiser or licensed or certified appraiser
10256 or that involves moral turpitude or fraudulent or dishonest
10257 conduct. The record of a conviction certified or authenticated
10258 in such form as admissible in evidence under the laws of the
10259 state shall be admissible as prima facie evidence of such guilt.
10260 (6) Has had a registration, license, or certification as
10261 an appraiser revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against; has
10262 been disbarred; has had her or his registration, license, or
10263 certificate to practice or conduct any regulated profession,
10264 business, or vocation revoked or suspended by this or any other
10265 state, any nation, or any possession or district of the United
10266 States; or has had an application for such registration,
10267 licensure, or certification to practice or conduct any regulated
10268 profession, business, or vocation denied by this or any other
10269 state, any nation, or any possession or district of the United
10270 States.
10271 (7) Has become temporarily incapacitated from acting as an
10272 appraiser with safety to those in a fiduciary relationship with
10273 her or him because of drunkenness, use of drugs, or temporary
10274 mental derangement; however, suspension of a license,
10275 certification, or registration in such cases shall only be for
Page 411 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10276 the period of such incapacity.
10277 (8) Is confined in any county jail, postadjudication; is
10278 confined in any state or federal prison or mental institution;
10279 or, through mental disease or deterioration, can no longer
10280 safely be entrusted to deal with the public or in a confidential
10281 capacity.
10282 (9) Has failed to inform the department board in writing
10283 within 30 days after pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or
10284 being convicted or found guilty of, any felony.
10285 (10) Has been found guilty, for a second time, of any
10286 misconduct that warrants disciplinary action, or has been found
10287 guilty of a course of conduct or practice that shows that she or
10288 he is incompetent, negligent, dishonest, or untruthful to an
10289 extent that those with whom she or he may sustain a confidential
10290 relationship may not safely do so.
10291 (11) Has made or filed a report or record, either written
10292 or oral, that the registered trainee appraiser or licensed or
10293 certified appraiser knows to be false; has willfully failed to
10294 file a report or record required by state or federal law; has
10295 willfully impeded or obstructed such filing; or has induced
10296 another person to impede or obstruct such filing. However, such
10297 reports or records shall include only those that are signed or
10298 presented in the capacity of a registered trainee appraiser or
10299 licensed or certified appraiser.
10300 (12) Has obtained or attempted to obtain a registration,
Page 412 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10301 license, or certification by means of knowingly making a false
10302 statement, submitting false information, refusing to provide
10303 complete information in response to an application question, or
10304 engaging in fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment.
10305 (13) Has paid money or other valuable consideration,
10306 except as required by this section, to any member or employee of
10307 the department board to obtain a registration, license, or
10308 certification under this section.
10309 (14) Has violated any standard of professional practice
10310 established by rule of the department board, including standards
10311 for the development or communication of a real estate appraisal.
10312 (15) Has failed or refused to exercise reasonable
10313 diligence in developing an appraisal or preparing an appraisal
10314 report.
10315 (16) Has failed to communicate an appraisal without good
10316 cause.
10317 (17) Has accepted an appraisal assignment if the
10318 employment itself is contingent upon the appraiser reporting a
10319 predetermined result, analysis, or opinion or if the fee to be
10320 paid for the performance of the appraisal assignment is
10321 contingent upon the opinion, conclusion, or valuation reached
10322 upon the consequences resulting from the appraisal assignment.
10323 (18) Has failed to timely notify the department of any
10324 change in business location, or has failed to fully disclose all
10325 business locations from which she or he operates as a registered
Page 413 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10326 trainee appraiser or licensed or certified appraiser.
10327 Section 306. Section 475.6245, Florida Statutes, is
10328 amended to read:
10329 475.6245 Discipline of appraisal management companies.—
10330 (1) The department board may deny an application for
10331 registration or renewal registration of an appraisal management
10332 company; may investigate the actions of any appraisal management
10333 company registered under this part; may reprimand or impose an
10334 administrative fine not to exceed $5,000 for each count or
10335 separate offense against any such appraisal management company;
10336 and may revoke or suspend, for a period not to exceed 10 years,
10337 the registration of any such appraisal management company, or
10338 place any such appraisal management company on probation, if the
10339 department board finds that the appraisal management company or
10340 any person listed in s. 475.6235(2)(f):
10341 (a) Has violated any provision of this part or s.
10342 455.227(1); however, any appraisal management company registered
10343 under this part is exempt from s. 455.227(1)(i).
10344 (b) Has been guilty of fraud, misrepresentation,
10345 concealment, false promises, false pretenses, dishonest conduct,
10346 culpable negligence, or breach of trust in any business
10347 transaction in this state or any other state, nation, or
10348 territory; has violated a duty imposed upon her or him by law or
10349 by the terms of a contract, whether written, oral, express, or
10350 implied, in an appraisal assignment; has aided, assisted, or
Page 414 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10351 conspired with any other person engaged in any such misconduct
10352 and in furtherance thereof; or has formed an intent, design, or
10353 scheme to engage in such misconduct and committed an overt act
10354 in furtherance of such intent, design, or scheme. It is
10355 immaterial to the guilt of the appraisal management company that
10356 the victim or intended victim of the misconduct has sustained no
10357 damage or loss; that the damage or loss has been settled and
10358 paid after discovery of the misconduct; or that such victim or
10359 intended victim was a customer or a person in confidential
10360 relation with the appraisal management company or was an
10361 identified member of the general public.
10362 (c) Has advertised services in a manner that is
10363 fraudulent, false, deceptive, or misleading in form or content.
10364 (d) Has violated any provision of this part or any lawful
10365 order or rule issued under this part or chapter 455.
10366 (e) Has been convicted or found guilty of, or entered a
10367 plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime
10368 in any jurisdiction that directly relates to the activities of
10369 an appraisal management company or that involves moral turpitude
10370 or fraudulent or dishonest conduct. The record of a conviction
10371 certified or authenticated in such form as admissible in
10372 evidence under the laws of the state shall be admissible as
10373 prima facie evidence of such guilt.
10374 (f) Has had a registration, license, or certification as
10375 an appraiser or a registration as an appraisal management
Page 415 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10376 company revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against; has been
10377 disbarred; has had her or his registration, license, or
10378 certificate to practice or conduct any regulated profession,
10379 business, or vocation revoked or suspended by this or any other
10380 state, any nation, or any possession or district of the United
10381 States; or has had an application for such registration,
10382 licensure, or certification to practice or conduct any regulated
10383 profession, business, or vocation denied by this or any other
10384 state, any nation, or any possession or district of the United
10385 States.
10386 (g) Has become temporarily incapacitated from acting as an
10387 appraisal management company with safety to those in a fiduciary
10388 relationship with her or him because of drunkenness, use of
10389 drugs, or temporary mental derangement; however, suspension of a
10390 registration in such cases shall only be for the period of such
10391 incapacity.
10392 (h) Is confined in any county jail, postadjudication; is
10393 confined in any state or federal prison or mental institution;
10394 or, through mental disease or deterioration, can no longer
10395 safely be entrusted to deal with the public or in a confidential
10396 capacity.
10397 (i) Has failed to inform the department board in writing
10398 within 30 days after pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or
10399 being convicted or found guilty of, any felony.
10400 (j) Has been found guilty, for a second time, of any
Page 416 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10401 misconduct that warrants disciplinary action, or has been found
10402 guilty of a course of conduct or practice that shows that she or
10403 he is incompetent, negligent, dishonest, or untruthful to an
10404 extent that those with whom she or he may sustain a confidential
10405 relationship may not safely do so.
10406 (k) Has made or filed a report or record, either written
10407 or oral, that the appraisal management company knows to be
10408 false; has willfully failed to file a report or record required
10409 by state or federal law; has willfully impeded or obstructed
10410 such filing; or has induced another person to impede or obstruct
10411 such filing. However, such reports or records shall include only
10412 those that are signed or presented in the capacity of an
10413 appraisal management company.
10414 (l) Has obtained or attempted to obtain a registration,
10415 license, or certification by means of knowingly making a false
10416 statement, submitting false information, refusing to provide
10417 complete information in response to an application question, or
10418 engaging in fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment.
10419 (m) Has paid money or other valuable consideration, except
10420 as required by this section, to any member or employee of the
10421 department board to obtain a registration, license, or
10422 certification under this section.
10423 (n) Has instructed an appraiser to violate any standard of
10424 professional practice established by rule of the department
10425 board, including standards for the development or communication
Page 417 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10426 of a real estate appraisal or other provision of the Uniform
10427 Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.
10428 (o) Has engaged in the development of an appraisal or the
10429 preparation of an appraisal report, unless the appraisal
10430 management company is owned or controlled by certified
10431 appraisers.
10432 (p) Has failed to communicate an appraisal without good
10433 cause.
10434 (q) Has accepted an appraisal assignment if the employment
10435 itself is contingent upon the appraisal management company
10436 reporting a predetermined result, analysis, or opinion or if the
10437 fee to be paid for the performance of the appraisal assignment
10438 is contingent upon the opinion, conclusion, or valuation reached
10439 upon the consequences resulting from the appraisal assignment.
10440 (r) Has failed to timely notify the department of any
10441 change in principal business location as an appraisal management
10442 company.
10443 (s) Has influenced or attempted to influence the
10444 development, reporting, or review of an appraisal through
10445 coercion, extortion, collusion, compensation, inducement,
10446 intimidation, bribery, or any other means, including, but not
10447 limited to:
10448 1. Withholding or threatening to withhold timely payment
10449 for an appraisal, unless such nonpayment is based upon specific
10450 quality or other service issues that constitute noncompliance
Page 418 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10451 with the appraisal engagement agreement.
10452 2. Withholding or threatening to withhold future business
10453 from an appraiser.
10454 3. Promising future business, promotions, or increased
10455 compensation for an appraiser, whether the promise is express or
10456 implied.
10457 4. Conditioning a request for appraisal services or the
10458 payment of an appraisal fee, salary, or bonus upon the opinion,
10459 conclusion, or valuation to be reached or upon a preliminary
10460 estimate or opinion requested from an appraiser.
10461 5. Requesting that an appraiser provide an estimated,
10462 predetermined, or desired valuation in an appraisal report or
10463 provide estimated values or comparable sales at any time before
10464 the appraiser's completion of appraisal services.
10465 6. Providing to an appraiser an anticipated, estimated,
10466 encouraged, or desired value for a subject property or a
10467 proposed or target amount to be loaned to the borrower, except
10468 that a copy of the sales contract for purchase transactions may
10469 be provided.
10470 7. Providing to an appraiser, or any person related to the
10471 appraiser, stock or other financial or nonfinancial benefits.
10472 8. Allowing the removal of an appraiser from an appraiser
10473 panel without prior written notice to the appraiser.
10474 9. Obtaining, using, or paying for a second or subsequent
10475 appraisal or ordering an automated valuation model in connection
Page 419 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10476 with a mortgage financing transaction unless there is a
10477 reasonable basis to believe that the initial appraisal was
10478 flawed or tainted and such basis is clearly and appropriately
10479 noted in the loan file, or unless such appraisal or automated
10480 valuation model is issued pursuant to a bona fide prefunding or
10481 postfunding appraisal review or quality control process.
10482 10. Any other act or practice that impairs or attempts to
10483 impair an appraiser's independence, objectivity, or
10484 impartiality.
10485 (t) Has altered, modified, or otherwise changed a
10486 completed appraisal report submitted by an appraiser to an
10487 appraisal management company.
10488 (u) Has employed, contracted with, or otherwise retained
10489 an appraiser whose registration, license, or certification is
10490 suspended or revoked to perform appraisal services or appraisal
10491 management services.
10492 (v) Has required or attempted to require an appraiser to
10493 sign any indemnification agreement that would require the
10494 appraiser to hold harmless the appraisal management company or
10495 its owners, agents, employees, or independent contractors from
10496 any liability, damage, loss, or claim arising from the services
10497 performed by the appraisal management company or its owners,
10498 agents, employees, or independent contractors and not the
10499 services performed by the appraiser.
10500 (w) Has required or attempted to require a client to sign
Page 420 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10501 any indemnification agreement that would require the client to
10502 hold harmless the appraisal management company or its owners,
10503 agents, or employees from any liability, damage, loss, or claim
10504 arising from the services performed by an appraiser.
10505 (2) The department board may reprimand an appraisal
10506 management company, conditionally or unconditionally suspend or
10507 revoke any registration of an appraisal management company
10508 issued under this part, or impose administrative fines not to
10509 exceed $5,000 for each count or separate offense against any
10510 such appraisal management company if the department board
10511 determines that the appraisal management company is attempting
10512 to perform, has performed, or has attempted to perform any of
10513 the following acts:
10514 (a) Committing any act in violation of this part.
10515 (b) Violating any rule adopted by the department board
10516 under this part.
10517 (c) Obtaining a registration of an appraisal management
10518 company by fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.
10519 (3) This section does not prohibit an appraisal management
10520 company from requesting an appraiser to:
10521 (a) Provide additional information about the basis of a
10522 valuation, including consideration of additional comparable
10523 data; or
10524 (b) Correct objective factual errors in an appraisal
10525 report.
Page 421 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10526 Section 307. Section 475.625, Florida Statutes, is amended
10527 to read:
10528 475.625 Final orders.—The department board may publish and
10529 distribute, in such manner and form as it may prescribe, any of
10530 its final orders or decisions made under this section, after
10531 they become final by lapse of time or upon affirmance on appeal,
10532 or opinions of appellate courts for the guidance of appraisers,
10533 appraiser users, and the public. The department board may also
10534 publish or withhold from publication the names and addresses of
10535 any parties concerned. This section shall not be construed to
10536 affect compliance with chapter 119.
10537 Section 308. Paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of subsection
10538 (1) of section 475.626, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
10539 475.626 Violations and penalties.—
10540 (1) A person may not:
10541 (c) Make any false affidavit or affirmation intended for
10542 use as evidence by or before the department board or any member
10543 thereof, or by any of its authorized representatives, nor may
10544 any person give false testimony under oath or affirmation to or
10545 before the department board or any member thereof in any
10546 proceeding authorized by this section.
10547 (d) Fail or refuse to appear at the time and place
10548 designated in a subpoena issued with respect to a violation of
10549 this section, unless such failure to appear is the result of
10550 facts or circumstances that are sufficient to excuse appearance
Page 422 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10551 in response to a subpoena from the circuit court; nor may a
10552 person who is present before the department board or a member
10553 thereof or one of its authorized representatives acting under
10554 authority of this section refuse to be sworn or to affirm or
10555 fail or refuse to answer fully any question propounded by the
10556 department board, the member, or such representative, or by any
10557 person by the authority of such officer or appointee.
10558 (e) Obstruct or hinder in any manner the enforcement of
10559 this section or the performance of any lawful duty by any person
10560 acting under the authority of this section, or interfere with,
10561 intimidate, or offer any bribe to any employee member of the
10562 department board or any of its employees or any person who is,
10563 or is expected to be, a witness in any investigation or
10564 proceeding relating to a violation of this section.
10565 Section 309. Section 475.627, Florida Statutes, is amended
10566 to read:
10567 475.627 Appraisal course instructors.—
10568 (1) Where the course or courses to be taught are
10569 prescribed by the department board or approved precedent to
10570 registration, licensure, certification, or renewal as a
10571 registered trainee appraiser, licensed appraiser, or certified
10572 residential appraiser, before commencing to instruct noncredit
10573 college courses in a college, university, or community college,
10574 or courses in a career center or proprietary real estate school,
10575 a person must certify her or his competency by meeting one of
Page 423 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10576 the following requirements:
10577 (a) Hold a valid certification as a residential real
10578 estate appraiser in this or any other state.
10579 (b) Pass an appraiser instructor's examination which shall
10580 test knowledge of residential appraisal topics.
10581 (2) Where the course or courses to be taught are
10582 prescribed by the department board or approved precedent to
10583 registration, licensure, certification, or renewal as a
10584 registered trainee appraiser, licensed appraiser, or certified
10585 appraiser, before commencing to instruct noncredit college
10586 courses in a college, university, or community college, or
10587 courses in a career center or proprietary real estate school, a
10588 person must certify her or his competency by meeting one of the
10589 following requirements:
10590 (a) Hold a valid certification as a general real estate
10591 appraiser in this or any other state.
10592 (b) Pass an appraiser instructor's examination which shall
10593 test knowledge of residential and nonresidential appraisal
10594 topics.
10595 (3) Possession of a permit to teach prescribed or approved
10596 appraisal courses does not entitle the permitholder to teach any
10597 courses outside the scope of the permit.
10598 Section 310. Section 475.628, Florida Statutes, is amended
10599 to read:
10600 475.628 Professional standards for appraisers registered,
Page 424 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10601 licensed, or certified under this part.—
10602 (1) The department board shall adopt rules establishing
10603 standards of professional practice which meet or exceed
10604 nationally recognized standards of appraisal practice, including
10605 standards adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the
10606 Appraisal Foundation. Each appraiser registered, licensed, or
10607 certified under this part must comply with the rules. Statements
10608 on appraisal standards which may be issued for the purpose of
10609 clarification, interpretation, explanation, or elaboration
10610 through the Appraisal Foundation are binding on any appraiser
10611 registered, licensed, or certified under this part, upon
10612 adoption by rule of the department board.
10613 (2) The department board may adopt rules establishing
10614 standards of professional practice other than standards adopted
10615 by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation for
10616 nonfederally related transactions. The department board shall
10617 require that when performing an appraisal or appraisal service
10618 for any purpose other than a federally related transaction, an
10619 appraiser must comply with the Ethics and Competency Rules of
10620 the standards adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the
10621 Appraisal Foundation, and other requirements as determined by
10622 rule of the department board. An assignment completed using
10623 alternate standards does not satisfy the experience requirements
10624 under s. 475.617 unless the assignment complies with the
10625 standards adopted by the Appraisal Standards Board of the
Page 425 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10626 Appraisal Foundation.
10627 Section 311. Section 475.629, Florida Statutes, is amended
10628 to read:
10629 475.629 Retention of records.—An appraiser registered,
10630 licensed, or certified under this part shall prepare and retain
10631 a work file for each appraisal, appraisal review, or appraisal
10632 consulting assignment. An appraisal management company
10633 registered under this part shall prepare and retain an order
10634 file for each appraisal, appraisal review, or appraisal
10635 consulting assignment. The work file and the order file shall be
10636 retained for 5 years or the period specified in the Uniform
10637 Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, whichever is
10638 greater. The work file must contain original or true copies of
10639 any contracts engaging the appraiser's or appraisal management
10640 company's services, appraisal reports, and supporting data
10641 assembled and formulated by the appraiser or company in
10642 preparing appraisal reports or engaging in appraisal management
10643 services and all other data, information, and documentation
10644 required by the standards for the development or communication
10645 of a real estate appraisal as approved and adopted by the
10646 Appraisal Standards Board of The Appraisal Foundation, as
10647 established by rule of the department board. The order file must
10648 contain original or true copies of any contracts engaging the
10649 appraiser's services, the appraisal reports, any engagement
10650 materials or instructions from the client, and all other
Page 426 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10651 documents required by the standards for the development or
10652 communication of a real estate appraisal as approved and adopted
10653 by the Appraisal Standards Board of The Appraisal Foundation, as
10654 established by rule of the department board. Notwithstanding the
10655 foregoing, while general contracts and materials pertaining to
10656 impaneling of an appraiser by an appraisal management company
10657 shall be retained under this section, such contracts and
10658 materials are not required to be maintained within the order
10659 file. Except as otherwise specified in the Uniform Standards of
10660 Professional Appraisal Practice, the period for retention of the
10661 records applicable to each engagement of the services of the
10662 appraiser or appraisal management company runs from the date of
10663 the submission of the appraisal report to the client. Appraisal
10664 management companies shall also retain the company accounts,
10665 correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records in
10666 accordance with administrative rules adopted by the department
10667 board. These records must be made available by the appraiser or
10668 appraisal management company for inspection and copying by the
10669 department upon reasonable notice to the appraiser or company.
10670 If an appraisal has been the subject of or has served as
10671 evidence for litigation, reports and records must be retained
10672 for at least 2 years after the trial or the period specified in
10673 the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice,
10674 whichever is greater.
10675 Section 312. Section 475.630, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 427 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10676 to read:
10677 475.630 Temporary practice.—
10678 (1) The department board shall recognize, on a temporary
10679 basis, the license or certification of an appraiser issued by
10680 another state, if:
10681 (a) The property to be appraised is part of a federally
10682 related transaction.
10683 (b) The appraiser's business is of a temporary nature.
10684 (c) The appraiser registers with the department board.
10685 (d) The person requesting recognition of a license or
10686 certification as an appraiser issued by another state is a
10687 nonresident of Florida.
10688 (2) In order to register with the department board, the
10689 appraiser must:
10690 (a) Pay any required fee as established by rule.
10691 (b) Provide, or cause the state where the applicant may be
10692 licensed or certified to furnish, proof of licensure or
10693 certification along with the copies of the records of any
10694 disciplinary actions taken against the applicant's license or
10695 certification in that or other jurisdictions.
10696 (c) Agree in writing to cooperate with any investigation
10697 initiated under this part by promptly supplying such documents
10698 that any authorized representative of the department may
10699 request. If the department sends a notice by certified mail to
10700 the last known address of a nonresident appraiser to produce
Page 428 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10701 documents or to appear in conjunction with an investigation and
10702 the nonresident appraiser fails to comply with that request, the
10703 department board may impose on that nonresident appraiser any
10704 disciplinary action or penalty authorized under this part.
10705 (d) Sign a notarized statement that the applicant has read
10706 this section and all applicable rules and agrees to abide by
10707 these provisions in all appraisal activities.
10708 Section 313. Section 475.631, Florida Statutes, is amended
10709 to read:
10710 475.631 Nonresident licenses and certifications.—
10711 (1) Any resident state-certified appraiser who becomes a
10712 nonresident shall, within 60 days, notify the department board
10713 of the change in residency and comply with nonresident
10714 requirements. Failure to notify and comply is a violation of the
10715 license law, subject to the penalties in s. 475.624.
10716 (2) All nonresident applicants, certified appraisers, and
10717 licensees shall comply with all requirements of department board
10718 rules and this part.
10719 Section 314. Section 475.613, Florida Statutes, is amended
10720 to read:
10721 475.613 Authority of the department Florida Real Estate
10722 Appraisal Board.—
10723 (1) There is created the Florida Real Estate Appraisal
10724 Board, which shall consist of nine members appointed by the
10725 Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. Four members of
Page 429 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10726 the board must be real estate appraisers who have been engaged
10727 in the general practice of appraising real property in this
10728 state for at least 5 years immediately preceding appointment. In
10729 appointing real estate appraisers to the board, while not
10730 excluding other appraisers, the Governor shall give preference
10731 to real estate appraisers who are not primarily engaged in real
10732 estate brokerage or mortgage lending activities. One member of
10733 the board must represent the appraisal management industry. One
10734 member of the board must represent organizations that use
10735 appraisals for the purpose of eminent domain proceedings,
10736 financial transactions, or mortgage insurance. Three members of
10737 the board must represent the general public and may not be
10738 connected in any way with the practice of real estate appraisal.
10739 The appraiser members shall be as representative of the entire
10740 industry as possible, and membership in a nationally recognized
10741 or state-recognized appraisal organization may not be a
10742 prerequisite to membership on the board. To the extent possible,
10743 no more than two members of the board shall be primarily
10744 affiliated with any one particular national or state appraisal
10745 association. Two of the members must be licensed or certified
10746 residential real estate appraisers and two of the members must
10747 be certified general real estate appraisers at the time of their
10748 appointment.
10749 (a) Members of the board shall be appointed for 4-year
10750 terms. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the board
Page 430 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10751 shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired
10752 term. Upon expiration of her or his term, a member of the board
10753 shall continue to hold office until the appointment and
10754 qualification of the member's successor. A member may not be
10755 appointed for more than two consecutive terms. The Governor may
10756 remove any member for cause.
10757 (b) The headquarters for the board shall be in Orlando.
10758 (c) The board shall meet at least once each calendar
10759 quarter to conduct its business.
10760 (d) The members of the board shall elect a chairperson at
10761 the first meeting each year.
10762 (e) Each member of the board is entitled to per diem and
10763 travel expenses as set by legislative appropriation for each day
10764 that the member engages in the business of the board.
10765 (2) The department board shall have, through its rules,
10766 full power to regulate the issuance of licenses, certifications,
10767 registrations, and permits; to discipline appraisers in any
10768 manner permitted under this section; to establish qualifications
10769 for licenses, certifications, registrations, and permits
10770 consistent with this section; to regulate approved courses; to
10771 establish standards for real estate appraisals; and to establish
10772 standards for and regulate supervisory appraisers.
10773 (3) Notwithstanding s. 112.313, any member of the board
10774 who is a licensed or certified real estate appraiser and who
10775 holds an active appraiser instructor permit issued by the
Page 431 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10776 department, to the extent authorized pursuant to such permit,
10777 may offer, conduct, or teach any course prescribed or approved
10778 by the board or the department.
10779 Section 315. Subsections (2), (8), and (9) of section
10780 476.184, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (11) is
10781 added to that section, to read:
10782 476.184 Barbershop licensure; requirements; fee;
10783 inspection; license display.—
10784 (2) The department board shall adopt rules governing the
10785 licensure and operation of a barbershop and its facilities,
10786 personnel, safety and sanitary requirements, and the license
10787 application and granting process.
10788 (8) Renewal of license registration for barbershops shall
10789 be accomplished pursuant to rules adopted by the department
10790 board. The department board is further authorized to adopt rules
10791 governing delinquent renewal of licenses and may impose penalty
10792 fees for delinquent renewal.
10793 (9) The department board is authorized to adopt rules
10794 governing the operation and periodic inspection of barbershops
10795 licensed under this chapter.
10796 (11)(a) The department shall adopt rules governing the
10797 licensure, operation, and inspection of mobile barbershops,
10798 including their facilities, personnel, and safety and sanitary
10799 requirements.
10800 (b) Each mobile barbershop must comply with all licensure
Page 432 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10801 and operating requirements specified in this chapter, chapter
10802 455, or rules of the department that apply to barbershops at
10803 fixed locations, except to the extent that such requirements
10804 conflict with this subsection or rules adopted pursuant to this
10805 subsection.
10806 (c) A mobile barbershop must maintain a permanent business
10807 address, located in the inspection area of the local department
10808 office, at which records of appointments, itineraries, license
10809 numbers of employees, and vehicle identification numbers of the
10810 licenseholder's mobile barbershop shall be kept and made
10811 available for verification purposes by department personnel, and
10812 at which correspondence from the department can be received.
10813 (d) To facilitate periodic inspections of a mobile
10814 barbershop, before the beginning of each month each mobile
10815 barbershop licenseholder must file with the department a written
10816 monthly itinerary listing the locations where and the dates and
10817 hours when the mobile barbershop will be operating.
10818 (e) The licenseholder must comply with all local laws and
10819 ordinances regulating business establishments, with all
10820 applicable requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act
10821 relating to accommodations for persons with disabilities, and
10822 with all applicable requirements of the Occupational Safety and
10823 Health Administration.
10824 Section 316. Section 476.188, Florida Statutes, is amended
10825 to read:
Page 433 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10826 476.188 Barber services to be performed in a licensed
10827 registered barbershop; exception.—
10828 (1) Barber services shall be performed only by licensed
10829 barbers in licensed registered barbershops, except as otherwise
10830 provided in this section.
10831 (2) Pursuant to rules established by the department board,
10832 barber services may be performed by a licensed barber in a
10833 location other than a licensed registered barbershop, including,
10834 but not limited to, a nursing home, hospital, or residence, when
10835 a client for reasons of ill health is unable to go to a licensed
10836 registered barbershop. Arrangements for the performance of
10837 barber services in a location other than a licensed registered
10838 barbershop may shall be made only through a licensed registered
10839 barbershop. However, a barber may shampoo, cut, or arrange hair
10840 in a location other than a licensed registered barbershop
10841 without such arrangements.
10842 (3) Any person who holds a valid barber's license in any
10843 state or who is authorized to practice barbering in any country,
10844 territory, or jurisdiction of the United States may perform
10845 barber services in a location other than a licensed registered
10846 barbershop when such services are performed in connection with
10847 the motion picture, fashion photography, theatrical, or
10848 television industry; a manufacturer trade show demonstration; or
10849 an educational seminar.
10850 (4) Pursuant to rules adopted by the department, the
Page 434 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10851 practice of barbering may be performed in a location other than
10852 a licensed barbershop when performed in connection with a
10853 special event and by a person who holds the proper license.
10854 Section 317. Section 481.213, Florida Statutes, is amended
10855 to read:
10856 481.213 Licensure and registration.—
10857 (1) The department shall license or register any applicant
10858 who the board certifies is qualified for licensure or
10859 registration and who has paid the initial licensure or
10860 registration fee. Licensure as an architect under this section
10861 shall be deemed to include all the rights and privileges of
10862 registration as an interior designer under this section.
10863 (2) The department board shall certify for licensure or
10864 registration by examination any applicant who passes the
10865 prescribed licensure or registration examination and satisfies
10866 the requirements of ss. 481.209 and 481.211, for architects, or
10867 the requirements of s. 481.209, for interior designers.
10868 (3) The department board shall certify as qualified for a
10869 license by endorsement as an architect or registration as a
10870 registered interior designer an applicant who:
10871 (a) Qualifies to take the prescribed licensure or
10872 registration examination, and has passed the prescribed
10873 licensure or registration examination or a substantially
10874 equivalent examination in another jurisdiction, as set forth in
10875 s. 481.209 for architects or registered interior designers, as
Page 435 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10876 applicable, and has satisfied the internship requirements set
10877 forth in s. 481.211 for architects;
10878 (b) Holds a valid license to practice architecture or a
10879 license, registration, or certification to practice interior
10880 design issued by another jurisdiction of the United States or a
10881 foreign jurisdiction, if the criteria for issuance of such
10882 license were substantially equivalent to the licensure criteria
10883 that existed in this state at the time the license was issued;
10884 or
10885 (c) Has passed the prescribed licensure examination and
10886 holds a valid certificate issued by the National Council of
10887 Architectural Registration Boards, and holds a valid license to
10888 practice architecture issued by another state or jurisdiction of
10889 the United States or a foreign jurisdiction.
10890
10891 An architect who is licensed in another state, another
10892 jurisdiction of the United States, or a foreign jurisdiction,
10893 who seeks qualification for licensure license by endorsement
10894 under this subsection must complete a 2-hour class approved by
10895 the department board on wind mitigation techniques.
10896 (4) The department board may refuse to certify any
10897 applicant who has violated any of the provisions of s. 481.223,
10898 s. 481.225, or s. 481.2251, as applicable.
10899 (5) The department board may refuse to certify any
10900 applicant who is under investigation in any jurisdiction for any
Page 436 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10901 act which would constitute a violation of this part or of
10902 chapter 455 until such time as the investigation is complete and
10903 disciplinary proceedings have been terminated.
10904 (6) The department board shall adopt rules to implement
10905 the provisions of this part relating to the examination,
10906 internship, and licensure of applicants.
10907 (7) For persons whose licensure requires satisfaction of
10908 the requirements of ss. 481.209 and 481.211, the board shall, by
10909 rule, establish qualifications for certification of such persons
10910 as special inspectors of threshold buildings, as defined in ss.
10911 553.71 and 553.79, and shall compile a list of persons who are
10912 certified. A special inspector is not required to meet standards
10913 for certification other than those established by the department
10914 board, and the fee owner of a threshold building may not be
10915 prohibited from selecting any person certified by the board to
10916 be a special inspector. The department board shall develop
10917 minimum qualifications for the qualified representative of the
10918 special inspector who is authorized under s. 553.79 to perform
10919 inspections of threshold buildings on behalf of the special
10920 inspector.
10921 (8) A certificate of registration is not required for a
10922 person whose occupation or practice is confined to interior
10923 decorator services or for a person whose occupation or practice
10924 is confined to interior design as provided in this part.
10925 Section 318. Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of section
Page 437 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10926 481.321, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
10927 481.321 Seals; display of certificate number.—
10928 (1) The department board shall prescribe, by rule, one or
10929 more forms of seals for use by a registered landscape architect
10930 who holds a valid certificate of registration. Each registered
10931 landscape architect shall obtain one seal in a form approved by
10932 rule of the department board and may, in addition, register her
10933 or his seal electronically in accordance with ss. 668.001-
10934 668.006. All final plans, specifications, or reports prepared or
10935 issued by the registered landscape architect and filed for
10936 public record shall be signed by the registered landscape
10937 architect, dated, and stamped or sealed electronically with her
10938 or his seal. The signature, date, and seal constitute evidence
10939 of the authenticity of that to which they are affixed. Final
10940 plans, specifications, or reports prepared or issued by a
10941 registered landscape architect may be transmitted electronically
10942 and may be signed by the registered landscape architect, dated,
10943 and sealed electronically with the seal in accordance with ss.
10944 668.001-668.006.
10945 (2) It is unlawful for any person to sign and seal by any
10946 means any final plan, specification, or report after her or his
10947 certificate of registration is expired, suspended, or revoked. A
10948 registered landscape architect whose certificate of registration
10949 is suspended or revoked shall, within 30 days after the
10950 effective date of the suspension or revocation, surrender her or
Page 438 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10951 his seal to the department executive director of the board and
10952 confirm in writing to the department executive director the
10953 cancellation of the landscape architect's electronic signature
10954 in accordance with ss. 668.001-668.006. When a landscape
10955 architect's certificate of registration is suspended for a
10956 period of time, her or his seal shall be returned upon
10957 expiration of the period of suspension.
10958 (4) Nothing in This part does not shall prohibit a
10959 registered landscape architect from filing plans of work defined
10960 under this part. A state agency or local government may not
10961 refuse to accept the seal of a landscape architect for any of
10962 the professional services delineated in s. 481.303(4),
10963 including, but not limited to, grading and drainage.
10964 Section 319. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6), paragraph
10965 (l) of subsection (8), paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (9),
10966 and subsections (15) and (16) of section 499.012, Florida
10967 Statutes, are amended, to read:
10968 499.012 Permit application requirements.—
10969 (6) A permit issued by the department is nontransferable.
10970 Each permit is valid only for the person or governmental unit to
10971 which it is issued and is not subject to sale, assignment, or
10972 other transfer, voluntarily or involuntarily; nor is a permit
10973 valid for any establishment other than the establishment for
10974 which it was originally issued.
Page 439 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
10975 (b)1. An application for a new permit is required when a
10976 majority of the ownership or controlling interest of a permitted
10977 establishment is transferred or assigned or when a lessee agrees
10978 to undertake or provide services to the extent that legal
10979 liability for operation of the establishment will rest with the
10980 lessee. The application for the new permit must be made within
10981 30 days after before the date of the sale, transfer, assignment,
10982 or lease.
10983 2. A permittee that is authorized to distribute
10984 prescription drugs may transfer such drugs to the new owner or
10985 lessee under subparagraph 1. only after the new owner or lessee
10986 has been approved for a permit to distribute prescription drugs.
10987
10988 The department may revoke the permit of any person that fails to
10989 comply with the requirements of this subsection.
10990 (8) An application for a permit or to renew a permit for a
10991 prescription drug wholesale distributor or an out-of-state
10992 prescription drug wholesale distributor submitted to the
10993 department must include:
10994 (l) The name of each of the applicant's designated
10995 representatives as required by subsection (15), together with
10996 The personal information statement and fingerprints required
10997 pursuant to subsection (9) for each such person.
10998 (9)(a) Each person required by subsection (8) or
10999 subsection (15) to provide a personal information statement and
Page 440 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11000 fingerprints shall provide the following information to the
11001 department on forms prescribed by the department:
11002 1. The person's places of residence for the past 7 years.
11003 2. The person's date and place of birth.
11004 3. The person's occupations, positions of employment, and
11005 offices held during the past 7 years.
11006 4. The principal business and address of any business,
11007 corporation, or other organization in which each such office of
11008 the person was held or in which each such occupation or position
11009 of employment was carried on.
11010 5. Whether the person has been, during the past 7 years,
11011 the subject of any proceeding for the revocation of any license
11012 and, if so, the nature of the proceeding and the disposition of
11013 the proceeding.
11014 6. Whether, during the past 7 years, the person has been
11015 enjoined, temporarily or permanently, by a court of competent
11016 jurisdiction from violating any federal or state law regulating
11017 the possession, control, or distribution of prescription drugs,
11018 together with details concerning any such event.
11019 7. A description of any involvement by the person with any
11020 business, including any investments, other than the ownership of
11021 stock in a publicly traded company or mutual fund, during the
11022 past 4 years, which manufactured, administered, prescribed,
11023 distributed, or stored pharmaceutical products and any lawsuits
11024 in which such businesses were named as a party.
Page 441 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11025 8. A description of any felony criminal offense of which
11026 the person, as an adult, was found guilty, regardless of whether
11027 adjudication of guilt was withheld or whether the person pled
11028 guilty or nolo contendere. A criminal offense committed in
11029 another jurisdiction which would have been a felony in this
11030 state must be reported. If the person indicates that a criminal
11031 conviction is under appeal and submits a copy of the notice of
11032 appeal of that criminal offense, the applicant must, within 15
11033 days after the disposition of the appeal, submit to the
11034 department a copy of the final written order of disposition.
11035 9. A photograph of the person taken in the previous 180
11036 days.
11037 10. A set of fingerprints for the person on a form and
11038 under procedures specified by the department, together with
11039 payment of an amount equal to the costs incurred by the
11040 department for the criminal record check of the person.
11041 11. The name, address, occupation, and date and place of
11042 birth for each member of the person's immediate family who is 18
11043 years of age or older. As used in this subparagraph, the term
11044 "member of the person's immediate family" includes the person's
11045 spouse, children, parents, siblings, the spouses of the person's
11046 children, and the spouses of the person's siblings.
11047 12. Any other relevant information that the department
11048 requires.
11049 (d) For purposes of applying for renewal of a permit under
Page 442 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11050 subsection (8) or certification under subsection (15), a person
11051 may submit the following in lieu of satisfying the requirements
11052 of paragraphs (a), (b), and (c):
11053 1. A photograph of the individual taken within 180 days;
11054 and
11055 2. A copy of the personal information statement form most
11056 recently submitted to the department and a certification under
11057 oath, on a form specified by the department, that the individual
11058 has reviewed the previously submitted personal information
11059 statement form and that the information contained therein
11060 remains unchanged.
11061 (15)(a) Each establishment that is issued an initial or
11062 renewal permit as a prescription drug wholesale distributor or
11063 an out-of-state prescription drug wholesale distributor must
11064 designate in writing to the department at least one natural
11065 person to serve as the designated representative of the
11066 wholesale distributor. Such person must have an active
11067 certification as a designated representative from the
11068 department.
11069 (b) To be certified as a designated representative, a
11070 natural person must:
11071 1. Submit an application on a form furnished by the
11072 department and pay the appropriate fees.
11073 2. Be at least 18 years of age.
11074 3. Have at least 2 years of verifiable full-time:
Page 443 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11075 a. Work experience in a pharmacy licensed in this state or
11076 another state, where the person's responsibilities included, but
11077 were not limited to, recordkeeping for prescription drugs;
11078 b. Managerial experience with a prescription drug
11079 wholesale distributor licensed in this state or in another
11080 state;
11081 c. Managerial experience with the United States Armed
11082 Forces, where the person's responsibilities included, but were
11083 not limited to, recordkeeping, warehousing, distributing, or
11084 other logistics services pertaining to prescription drugs;
11085 d. Managerial experience with a state or federal
11086 organization responsible for regulating or permitting
11087 establishments involved in the distribution of prescription
11088 drugs, whether in an administrative or a sworn law enforcement
11089 capacity; or
11090 e. Work experience as a drug inspector or investigator
11091 with a state or federal organization, whether in an
11092 administrative or a sworn law enforcement capacity, where the
11093 person's responsibilities related primarily to compliance with
11094 state or federal requirements pertaining to the distribution of
11095 prescription drugs.
11096 4. Receive a passing score of at least 75 percent on an
11097 examination given by the department regarding federal laws
11098 governing distribution of prescription drugs and this part and
11099 the rules adopted by the department governing the wholesale
Page 444 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11100 distribution of prescription drugs. This requirement shall be
11101 effective 1 year after the results of the initial examination
11102 are mailed to the persons that took the examination. The
11103 department shall offer such examinations at least four times
11104 each calendar year.
11105 5. Provide the department with a personal information
11106 statement and fingerprints pursuant to subsection (9).
11107 (c) The department may deny an application for
11108 certification as a designated representative or may suspend or
11109 revoke a certification of a designated representative pursuant
11110 to s. 499.067.
11111 (d) A designated representative:
11112 1. Must be actively involved in and aware of the actual
11113 daily operation of the wholesale distributor.
11114 2. Must be employed full time in a managerial position by
11115 the wholesale distributor.
11116 3. Must be physically present at the establishment during
11117 normal business hours, except for time periods when absent due
11118 to illness, family illness or death, scheduled vacation, or
11119 other authorized absence.
11120 4. May serve as a designated representative for only one
11121 wholesale distributor at any one time.
11122 (e) A wholesale distributor must notify the department
11123 when a designated representative leaves the employ of the
11124 wholesale distributor. Such notice must be provided to the
Page 445 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11125 department within 10 business days after the last day of
11126 designated representative's employment with the wholesale
11127 distributor.
11128 (f) A wholesale distributor may not operate under a
11129 prescription drug wholesale distributor permit or an out-of-
11130 state prescription drug wholesale distributor permit for more
11131 than 10 business days after the designated representative leaves
11132 the employ of the wholesale distributor, unless the wholesale
11133 distributor employs another designated representative and
11134 notifies the department within 10 business days of the identity
11135 of the new designated representative.
11136 (15)(16) A permit for a prescription drug manufacturer or
11137 a nonresident prescription drug manufacturer is subject to the
11138 requirements of s. 499.026.
11139 Section 320. Subsection (9) of section 499.0121, Florida
11140 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (16) is added to that
11141 section, to read:
11142 499.0121 Storage and handling of prescription drugs;
11143 recordkeeping.—The department shall adopt rules to implement
11144 this section as necessary to protect the public health, safety,
11145 and welfare. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to,
11146 requirements for the storage and handling of prescription drugs
11147 and for the establishment and maintenance of prescription drug
11148 distribution records.
11149 (9) RESPONSIBLE PERSONS.—Wholesale distributors must
Page 446 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11150 establish and maintain lists of officers, directors, managers,
11151 designated representatives, and other persons in charge of
11152 wholesale drug distribution, storage, and handling, including a
11153 description of their duties and a summary of their
11154 qualifications.
11155 (16) APPLICABILITY TO PRESCRIPTION DRUGS NOT LISTED AS A
11156 CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE.—
11157 (a) An establishment at which prescription drugs not
11158 listed as a controlled substance, as defined in s. 893.03, are
11159 stored, warehoused, or held, solely for the purpose of arranging
11160 for their destruction, is not required to comply with paragraph
11161 (1)(c); subsections (3)-(6); paragraphs (8)(a), (b), and (d);
11162 and subsection (13).
11163 (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), an establishment at
11164 which prescription drugs not listed as a controlled substance,
11165 as defined in s. 893.03, are stored, warehoused, or held, solely
11166 for the purpose of arranging for their destruction must maintain
11167 the following records:
11168 1. The business name and address from which the
11169 prescription drugs were collected.
11170 2. A list of the prescription drugs.
11171 3. The amount, or, if adulterated or altered prior to
11172 collection, an estimate of the amount, of the prescription drugs
11173 collected.
11174 4. The manner, date, and location of destruction of the
Page 447 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11175 prescription drugs.
11176 (c) Records required to be kept pursuant to paragraph (b),
11177 which are kept at the establishment or can be immediately
11178 retrieved by computer or other electronic means, must be readily
11179 available for authorized inspection pursuant to this section. If
11180 such records are not available upon request, the records must be
11181 made available for authorized inspection within 2 business days
11182 after the request. Records kept at a central location outside of
11183 this state which are not electronically retrievable must be made
11184 available for inspection within 5 business days after a request.
11185 (d) Records required to be kept pursuant to paragraph (b)
11186 must be maintained for a period of not less than 5 years from
11187 the date of destruction of the prescription drugs.
11188 Section 321. Subsection (9) of section 499.041, Florida
11189 Statutes, is amended to read:
11190 499.041 Schedule of fees for drug, device, and cosmetic
11191 applications and permits, product registrations, and free-sale
11192 certificates.—
11193 (9) The department shall assess each person applying for
11194 certification as a designated representative a fee of $150, plus
11195 the cost of processing the criminal history record check.
11196 Section 322. Section 624.341, Florida Statutes, is created
11197 to read:
11198 624.341 Authority of Department of Law Enforcement to
11199 accept fingerprints of, and exchange criminal history records
Page 448 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11200 with respect to, certain persons applying to the Office of
11201 Insurance Regulation.—
11202 (1) The Legislature finds that criminal activity of
11203 insurers poses a particular danger to the residents of this
11204 state. Floridians rely, in good faith, on the honest conduct of
11205 those who issue and manage insurance policies and other
11206 insurance instruments in this state. To safeguard this state's
11207 residents, the Legislature finds it necessary to ensure that
11208 incorporators, subscribers, officers, employees, contractors,
11209 stockholders, directors, owners, members, managers, or
11210 volunteers involved in the organization, operation, or
11211 management of any insurer that is authorized to sell insurance
11212 do not have a criminal background.
11213 (2) The Department of Law Enforcement shall accept and
11214 process fingerprints of incorporators, subscribers, officers,
11215 employees, contractors, stockholders, directors, owners,
11216 members, managers, or volunteers involved in the organization,
11217 operation, or management of:
11218 (a) Any insurer or proposed insurer transaction or
11219 proposing to transact insurance in this state.
11220 (b) Any entity that is eligible to be examined or
11221 investigated under s. 624.316.
11222 (3) Each person required to submit fingerprints to the
11223 office must provide a full set of fingerprints to the office or
11224 to a vendor, entity, or agency authorized under s. 943.053(13).
Page 449 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11225 The office, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward the
11226 fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state
11227 processing, and the Department of Law Enforcement shall forward
11228 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
11229 national processing as provided in s. 624.34. Fees for state and
11230 federal fingerprint processing must be borne by the person
11231 submitting the fingerprints. The state cost for fingerprint
11232 processing is as provided ins s. 943.053(3)(e).
11233 (4) The Department of Law Enforcement may, to the extent
11234 authorized by federal law, exchange any state or federal
11235 criminal history records with the office for the purpose of
11236 issuance or continuation of a certificate of authority,
11237 certification, or license to operate in this state.
11238 (5) Fingerprints must be submitted in accordance with
11239 rules adopted by the commission.
11240 (a) Fingerprints may be submitted through a third-party
11241 vendor authorized by the Department of Law Enforcement.
11242 (b) The Department of Law Enforcement shall conduct the
11243 state criminal history background check, and a federal criminal
11244 history background check shall be conducted through the Federal
11245 Bureau of Investigation.
11246 (c) All fingerprints submitted to the Department of Law
11247 Enforcement must be submitted and entered into the statewide
11248 automated biometric identification system established in s.
11249 943.05(2)(b) and available for use in accordance with s.
Page 450 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 607 2026
11250 943.05(2)(g) and (h).
11251 (d) The costs of fingerprint processing, including the
11252 cost of retaining the fingerprints, must be borne by the person
11253 subject to the background checks.
11254 (e) The office shall review the results of the state and
11255 federal criminal history background checks and determine whether
11256 the applicant meets the requirements for the certificate of
11257 authority, certification, or license to operate in this state.
11258 (6) State criminal history records obtained through the
11259 Department of Law Enforcement, federal criminal history records
11260 obtained through the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and local
11261 criminal history records obtained through local law enforcement
11262 agencies must be used by the office for the purpose of issuance,
11263 denial, suspension, or revocation of certificates of authority,
11264 certifications, or licenses issued to operate in this state.
11265 Section 323. Except as otherwise expressly provided in
11266 this act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 451 of 451
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb607-01-c1